
This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 
to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 
to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 
are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other marginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 
publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing this resource, we have taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 

We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain from automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attribution The Google "watermark" you see on each file is essential for informing people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liability can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 



at |http : //books . google . com/ 



tp 2.1(0? 



HARVARD „,COLLEGE 
LIBRARY 




FROM THE BEQUEST OF 

JAMES WALKER 

(Class of 1814) 
President of Harvard College 

**P>re fa p e ace being given to works in the IntellectnU 
and Moral Sdencat** 



I. j 



J 



THE CATECHISM 



POSITIVE RELIGION. 



TRANSLATED FBOM THE FBENGH OF 

(.\:vc^-;^UGUSTE^MTe/ 



BY 

RICHARD CONGREVE. 



*^LONDON: 
JOHN CHAPMAN, 

8, KING WILLIAM STREET, STRAND. 
XDCC01.VUI. 



NAUWIRD COLLEGE LIBIUDY 



LOJTDOVJ 
BATILL A.irD BDWABD8, PBUTTIBS, 
OBAITDOB STBBEX. 



Jt f 



->\ \ '' 



REPUBLIC OF THE WEST. 



ORDER AND PROGRESS. 



THB 

CATECHISM OF POSITIVISM; 

OB, 

Summarg fSa^osftton 

o» 
THE UNTVEESAJ:. EEIiiaiON. 



IN THIBTEBV ST8TBMATI0 OONVEBSATIONS BBTWBEV A WOMAH 
Ain> A PBIEST OF HUXAFITT. 



By AUGUSTE COMTE, 

AUTBoa or "tbb stbtbm or posititb philosoput/' iMD or 

''TBB 8TSTBK OF PoaiTIVB POUTICB." 



Love as our principle, 
Order as onr Imsis, 
Progress as our end. 



CONTENTS. 



PAGB 

Advertisement vii 

Preface 1 

Positivist Library 39 

INTRODUCTION. 

GENERAL THEORY OF RELIGION. 

C0NVKB8ATIOH 1 46 

n. *. 68 

FIRST PART. 

EXPLANATION OP THE WORSHIP. 

CoNVBBfiATiON III. The Worship as a whole .... 82 

,, IV. Private Worship 118 

„ V. Public Worship 139 

SECOND PART. 
iEXPLANATION OP THE DOCTRINE. 

CONVBBSATION VI. The Doctrine as a whole . . . .160 
,, * VII. The order of the External World— 

Inoiganic Matter, Life . . . 201 
,, VIII. Man— first, as a Social, secondly, 

as a Moral Being 228 



VI CONTENTS. 

THIRD PART. 
EXPLANATION OF THE REGIME, OB MODE OF UFE. 

PA6B 

GoNVEBSATiON IX. The lUgime as a wbole .... 270 

„ X. Private Life 306 

XI. Public Life 831 

CONCLUSION. 

OENERAL HlfiTORT OF RELIGION. 

CoNVBBSATiON XII. Fetichism. Conservative Poly- 
theism, or Theocracy .... 368 
„ Xlll. Intellectiial and Sociid Polytheism, 

Monotheism ^80 



Tables A. System of Sociolatry or Social Worship . 429 
f, B. Hierarchy of the Positive Sciences . . . 482 
„ C. Positive Classkication of the internal Func- 
tions of the Brain - 430 

D. Positivist Calendar 483 



ADVERTISEMENT. 



The alterations in the arrangement of the Catechism 
have, in every case, the sanction of Auguste Oomte. 
See Politique Faaitvoe, voL iv. 

The Tables at the end of the volume are given 
from the latest edition of the Author. 

I have felt warranted by an extract from one of 
his letters in inserting the name of Shelley in the 
Calendar. 

In the Preface, p. 4, the formula alluded to is : 
Faire de Vord/re cmec du disordre, You/r tnatencds 
a/re disorder^ toUh them you must organize order. 

In the Positivist Library, Old Mortality should 
be substituted for Woodstock, 



PREFACE. 



'* In the name of the Past and of the Future, the 
servants of Humanity — ^both its philosophical and 
practical servants — come forward to claim as their 
due the general direction of this world. Their 
object is, to constitute at length a real Providence, 
in all departments — moral, intellectual, and material. 
Conseqiiently they exclude, once for all, from poli- 
tical supremacy, all the different servants of God — 
Catholic, Protestant, or Deist — as being at once 
behindhand and a cause of disturbance." With 
this uncompromising announcement, on Sunday, 
October 19th, 1851, in the Palais Cardinal, after a 
summary of ^ye hours, I ended my third course of 
Philosophical Lectures on the General History of 
Humanity. Since that memorable conclusion, the 
second volume of my System of Positive Politics 
has lately given a direct proof how entirely a social 
destination, such as that above indicated, is the 
appropriate destination of Positive Philosophy; for 
it has shown itself able to suggest the most syste- 
matic theory of moral and social order. 

We come forward then, avowedly, to deliver the 
Western world from an anarchical democracy, and 

B 



> 



2 PREFACE. 

from a retrograde aristocracj. We come forward 
to* constitute, as far as practicable, a real sociocracy j 
one which shall be able to combine wisely, in fur- 
therance of the common regeneration, all the powers 
of man, each of course brought to bear according to 
its own nature. In fact we, Sociocrats, are as little 
democi-atical as we are aristocratical. In our eyes, 
these two opposite parties — ^the respectable portion 
of them, that is — ^represent, though on no theory, on 
the one hand, Solidarity, on the other, Continuity. 
These two ideas have hitherto been unfortunately 
antagonistic. Positivism removes this antagonism, 
and replaces it by a subordination of the one to the 
other, by showing Solidarity to be subordinate to 
Continuity. So we adopt both of these tendencies, 
in themselves, singly, incomplete and incoherent; 
and we rise above them both equally. Yet at the 
present time, we by no means condemn equally 
the two parties which represent them. During the 
whole of my philosophical and social career, a period 
of thirty years, I have ever felt a profound contempt 
for that which, under our different governments, 
bore the name of the Opposition ; 1 have felt a secret 
affinity for all constructive statesmen, of whatever 
order. Even those who would build with materials 
evidently worn-out — even them I never hesitated to 
prefer to the pure destructives, in a century in which a 
general rdconstruction is everywhere the chief want. 
Our official conservatives are behindhand, it is true. 
And yet, the mere revolutionist seems to me still 
more alien to the true spirit of the time ; for he 



i 



PREFACE. , 6 

• 

continues blindly, in the middle %f the nineteenth 
century, the negative line of action which' could 
only suit the eighteenth. And he does not redeem 
the stagnation caused by his error by the generous 
aspirations after a universal renovation, which were 
the characteristic of his predecessors. » . • 

Hence it is that, although the popular sympathy 
is instinctively .with the revolutionary party, poli- 
tical power constantly passes into the hands of its 
opponents. For they, at least, recognise the fact, 
that the metaphysical doctrines are powerless to 
organize ; and recognising this, they seek elsewhere 
for principles of reconstruction. With the majority 
of them, their retrograde attitude is, at bottom, 
only provisionally adopted as the least of two evils. 
They adopt it to meet the anarchy which threatens 
them, not because they have really any theological 
convictions. AU our statesmen seem for the moment 
to belong to this school Yet we may be confident 
that all they derive from it is, the formulas which 
they find indispensable for the co-ordination of their 
empirical views. They wait for the more real and 
' more stable connexion to spring from a new doc- 
trine of universal applicability. 

This may certainly be said with justice of the 
only temporal governor of real eminence of whom, 
up to the present time, our century can boast — I 
mean the noble Czar, who, w:hilst he gives the 
immense empire of Bussia all the progress compatible 
with its actual condition, preserves it by his energy 
and prudence from useless ferment. His sagacity, 
b2 



4: PREFACE. 

however empirical, leads him to see that the West 
alone is charged with the glorious and difficult 
mission of laying the foundations of the regeneration 
of society. The East must wait, and without dis- 
turbance make the result its own, as each successive 
step shall be gained. I am even inclined to think 
that the Emperor Nicholas feels that this immense 
elaboration is reserved in especial for the great 
central nation of the Western world. Its spon- 
taneous action cannot but be attended with disorders ; 
but it is the only one which must never be inter- 
fered with, for its action is absolutely indispensable 
to the attainment of a solution applicable to all. The 
agitation that habitually prevails in all the rest of 
the West, though more difficult to restrain than 
that of the East, exercises in reality an almost 
equally injurious influence on the natural course of 
the final regeneration. It has a tendency, which 
can lead to no useful result, to put forward some 
other country as its principal seat, whereas the 
whole pf past history points to France. 

Our situation in the West is so wholly adverge 
to the simply revolutionary point of view, that we 
find the conservative party able to produce the 
maxims of most real value. I do not foi'get the 
memorable practical formula, the author of which, 
M. Caussidi^re, was a democrat fortunately without 
the ordinary literary training. Still it is among 
pure conservatives that the most profound political 
sentence of the nineteenth century had its birth — 
To destroy, you must replace. The author of this 



PREFACE. O ' 

admirable sentence, equally excellent in thought and 
expression, presents nothing remarkable in point of 
intellect. Louis Napoleon s claim- to notice is entirely 
dependent on a rare combination of the three practical 
qualitiea^-energy, prudence, and perseverance. But 
the constructive point of view has, at the present 
time, so direct a tendency to enlarge our conceptions, 
thatj given a fiaivourdble situation, it is capable of 
suggesting to an intellect of small depth a really 
profound principle. This principle is adopted and 
systematically developed by Positivism. 

Be this as it may, the retrograde nature of the 
worn-out ideas which our conservatives prpvisionally 
employ, disqualifies them absolutely for directing 
political action in the midst of the present anarchy. 
For that anarchy has its origin in the irremediable 
weakness of the old beliefs. Western Europe no 
longer submits its reason to the guidance of 
opinions which evidently admit of no demonstra- 
tions ; nay, which are radically illusory. For such 
is the character of all opinions of theological origin, 
whatever the theology be, be it even the purest 
Deism. All now recognise the fact, that the prac- 
tical activity of man must no longer waste itself on 
mutual hostilities, but must set itself peaceably to 
carry forward, in common, the work of developing 
the resources of the earth — man's residence. Still 
less can we persist in the state of intellectual and 
moral childhood in which, for the conduct of our 
life, we look to motives which are absurd and 
degrading. The nineteenth century must never 



b PREFACE. 

repeat the eighteenth, but it must never break off 
from it. It must continue the work of the eighteenth, 
and realize at length the noble object of its wishes, 
a religion resting on demonstration, and directing 
the pacific activity of man. 

Every tendency that is simply negative has, for 
some time, been set aside by the mere force of circum- 
stances. Of the philosophical schools, then, of the 
last century, the only ones which are really discre- 
dited are the illogical, inconsequent sects, whose 
predominance was necessanly very short. Those 
who with Voltaire and Rousseau aim at an incom- 
plete destruction of the older order — who think 
that they can destroy the altar and preserve the 
throne, or vice versd — are fallen without possibility 
of rising. They ruled, such was the destiny allotted 
them, the two generations which prepared and 
carried out the revolutionary explosion. But ever 
since reconstruction has been the order of the day, 
the attention of men has been more and more 
directed to the great and immortal school of Diderot 
and Hume. This is the school which will really 
give its stamp to the eighteenth century, connecting 
it with the seventeenth in the person of Fontenelle; 
with the nineteenth, in that of Condorcet. Equally 
emancipated, both in religion and in politics, those 
powerful thinkers necessarily tended towards a total 
and direct re-organi25ation of society. It mattera 
little that their idea of such re-organization was con- 
fused. All of them would now rally in support of 
the only doctrine which bases the future on the 



PREFACE. 7 

past, and so lays a perfectly firm fouDdation for the 
regeneration of the West. This is the school from 
which I shall always consider it an honour to be 
immediately descended in a direct line through him 
who was indispensable as my precursor, the eminent 
Condorcet* On the other hand, I never expected 
anything but hindrances, intentional or not, from 
the broken remains of the superficial and immoral 
sects who trace their origin to Voltaire and 
Rousseau. 

Sprung from this great stock historically, I have 
never scrupled to connect with it whatever of real 
eminence our latest adversaries have produced, 
whether of the theological or metaphysical school. 
Hume is my principal precursor in philosophy, but 
with Hume I connect Kant as an accessory. Kant's 
fundamental conception was never really systema- - 
tized and developed but by Positivism. So, in 
political science, De Maistre was, in my judgment, 
the necessary complement of Condorcet.. At the 
very commencement of my career, I appropriated all 
» fbe essential principles of De Maistre, which now 
find no adequate^appreciation except in the Posi- 
tive school. [ These7)w it^ and Gall, as my 

^ precursors in scienceji ^are the /six Vimmediate prede- 
cessors who will ever form the ^ connecting links 
between me and the three fathers of the system of 
modem philosophy — Bacon, Descartes, and Leibnitz. 
Carrying on this noble genealogy, the Middle Ages, 
through their intellectual exponents, St. Thomas 

^ Aquinas, Boger Bacon, and Dante, place me in 



S PREFACE. 

direct subordination to the incomparable Aristotle, 
the eternal prince of true thinkers. 

On our progress upwards towards this regular 
fountain-head, we become deeply convinced that, 
since the adequate extension of Home's dominion, 
the more advanced populations are vainly seeking 
for an universal religion. The experience gained 
in this search has made it quite clear that no super- 
natural belief can satisfy this, the ultimate long- 
ing of humanity. Two incompatible Monotheisms 
equally aimed at this necessary characteristic of 
Universality, without which the hum&n race could 
never follow out its natural destiny ; but the efforts 
of the two in opposite directions resulted only in 
neutralizing each other, so that the attribute they 
claimed remained as the heritage of doctrines sus- 
ceptible of demonstration and admitting discussion. 
Five centuries have passed since Islamism renounced 
the conquest of the West, and Catholicism abandoned 
to its eternal rival even the tomb of its pretended 
founder. In vain did the two religions aspire to 
spread themselves over the whole territory coiA 
prised within the dominion of the Roman empire. 
That territory is divided with an almost equal divi- 
sion between the two irreconcilable Monotheisms. 

The East and the West, then, must put aside all 
theology and all metaphysics, and look elsewhere 
for a systematic basis on which to rest their intel- 
lectual and moral communion. This long-desired 
fusion of the two must afterwards gradually embrace 
the whole of our species ; but it can come from no 



PREFACE. ^ 9 

other quarter but Positivism. It must, that is, 
have its origin in a doctrine whose characteristic is 
the constant combination of the real with the useful. 
Liong limited to bhe simplest phenomena, the theories 
of Positivism have, within the sphere of such phe- 
nomena, produced the only convictions which, at 
the present moment, can claim to be universal. 
But this, the 'Natural privilege of the methods 
adopted and the doctrines taugh^ by Positivism, 
cannot be for ever confin^ to the domain o/ mathe^ 
matics and physics. It found its first development 
in the sphere of material order ; it passed naturally 
thence to that of life ; from this it has lately ex- 
tended over that of man, whether viewed in society 
or as an individual Now that Positivism has 
attained this absolute fulness of development, there 
«is no longer any pretext for preserving, by artificial 
means, the theological spirit. This spirit is now, 
in modem Europe, as much a source of disttirbance 
as metaphysics were, of which it is the parent, both 
historically and dogmatically^ Besides, the moral 
^d political degradation of its priesthood has long 
forbidden any hope of restraining, as was the case 
in the Middle Ages, the vices of the doctrine by the 
instinctive sagacity of its best interpreters. 

From henceforth the belief in Monotheism, 
whether • Christian or Mussulman, is left to its 
natural course of inherent decay. In this late stage 
of its existence, it deserves more and more the 
UD&bvourable judgment which, during the three 
centuries of its rise to power, it elicited from the 



10 PREFACE. 

noblest philosophers and statesmen of the Komau 
world. They could at that time only judge the 
system by the doctrine ; and they felt no hesitation 
in rejecting^ as the enemy of the human race, a pro- 
visional religion which oonsidered perfection as con- 
sisting in an entire concentration upon heavenly 
objects. Our modem instinct condemns still more 
stroDgly a morality which proclaims that the bene- 
volent sentiments are foreign to our nature ; which 
so little understands the dignity of labour as to refer 
its origin to a Divine curse ; and which puts forward 
woman as the source of all eviL Tacitus and Trajan 
could not foresee that, during some centuries, the 
wisdom of the Chiistian priesthood, aided by a 
favourable situation, would be able so far to check 
the natural evils of such doctrines as to draw from 
them, provisionally, admirable results for society*t 
But now that the priesthood of the Western world 
has become hopelessly retrograde, the belief which 
it preaches, left to itself without check, has a ten- 
dency to give free scope to the immoral character 
which its anti-social nature inherently involves, {t 
deserved respectful treatment on the part of prudent 
conservatives, only so far as it was impossible to 
find a substitute for it in a better conception of the 
world and of man. Such a conception could not be 
formed without Positivism, and the rise of Positivism 
was necessarily slow. But this laborious initiation 
is now completed, and Positivism proceeds finally 
to eliminate Catholicism, as well as every other form 
of theology. It does so by virtue of the admirable 



PREFACE. 11 

social maxim above quoted — ^it destroys them by 
replacing thjem. 

Positive religion, then, gives fiiU satisfaction to 
the intelligence of man, and to his activity. Im- 
pelled onwards by the character of reality which 
distinguishes it, it has embraced the region of sen- 
timent. This for the future forms its principal 
domain, and becomes the basis of its unity. We 
see no reason to fear, then, that any thinkers worthy 
of the name, whether theoretical or practical, can 
commit the mistake committed at the early period 
of Catholicism, and fail to see the superiority of a 
faith which is real and complete ; which is social 
not by any accident, but by its own inherent nature. 
For the rest, it is for the nascent priesthood of 
Positivism, and for all its true disciples, by their 
conduct as men and as citizens, to secure a due ap- 
preciation of its excellence. Even those who can- 
not be expected to form a judgment on its principles, 
may be led by experience to a favourable conclusion. 
A doctrine which shall be seen to develope all 
human virtue — ^personal, domestic, and civil — will 
soon gain the respect of all honest opponents, how- 
ever strong may be their preference for an absolute 
and egoistic, as opposed to a relative and altruistic, 
synthesis. 

. On such a competition must depend the issue of 
the struggle between Christianity and Positivism ; 
but such a competition is impossible till Positivism 
has been put into a shape which, by its condensa- 
tion, can enable it to become really popular. This 



12 PREFACE. w. 

is the particular object of this small work, which 
stands apart from the genei'al series of my works. 
For it, I interrupt for some weeks my great 
religious construction, the first half only of which 
is as yet actually accomplished. I had thought 
that this valuable episode in my labours should 
be postponed till the entire completion of that 
immense work; but in January, 1851, I had 
written the Positive theory of human unity, and 
1 felt suflSciently forward with my work to allow 
myself an interlude. As such, this present volume 
might follow the one in which the theory above 
mentioned forms the first and most important 
chapter. This hope grew on me as, step by step, I 
worked out that volume — the turning-point of the 
whole system. It became complete when I wrote 
the final pre^M^e of that volume. I realize the hope 
to-day, before I begin the construction of Dynami- 
cal Sociology, or in other words, of the Philosophy 
of History — ^the special subject of the third volume 
of my System of Positive FolUics, to be published 
next year. 

My resolution to publish this Catechism was due to 
my finding my principal conceptions more ripe than 
I had expected. It was greatly strengthened by the 
fortunate crisis which has lately set aside the Parlia- 
mentary regime and instituted a dictatorial republic 
Thesetwostepsarenecessaryasthepreviousconditions 
of any true regeneration. It is quite true that the dic- 
tatorship established by no means wears the character 
which is necessary to its full utility, as explained 



,^ PREFACE. 1 3 

in my course of Positive Lectures, delivered in 1847. 
The most prominent defect is, that it cannot permit 
the co-existence with itself of free and full exposi- 
tion, or even of discussion. And yet such liberty is 
absolutely iudispensable to any re-organization of 
the spiritual power ; not to say, that it is the only 
security which we can have against every form of 
retrograde tyranny. But under one form or another, 
before long, this necessary complement of the new 
order will be attained. Unfortunately its attain- 
ment seems to involve, as the preceding phases of 
our revolution have involved, one last violent crisis. 
Once attained, once established as a mere political 
experiment, it must lead us farther. Its proximate 
consequence will be the peaceful creation of the 
systematic triumvirate which is to give its form and 
expression to the temporal dictatorship, that dicta- 
torship which, in the course of lectures above alluded 
to, I set forth as the proper mode of government 
for the organic period of transition. We may have 
to wait for these two phases of our revolutionary 
experiment j but in the mean time, the actual form 
of dictatorial power already permits the direct pro- 
pagation of all thought that has a tendency to re- 
construction. For it has, at last, broken the power — 
a power which could lead to no good — of mere 
talkers. By so doing, as a natural consequence, it 
secures those who would really construct something 
the liberty of expounding their plans. The enjoy- 
ment of this liberty was naturally a strong induce- 
ment to me to direct the thoughts of women and 



14 PREFACE. 

working men to the question of a thorough renova- 
tion of the social order. ^^ 

My present work, then, is an episode. It ciaims 
to be competent to furnish a systematic basis for 
the active propagation of Positivism. By so doing it 
necessarily forwards my principal construction, 
for it brings the new religion to bear on the classes 
which constitute its true social audience. The intel- 
lectual discipline instituted by Positive Philosophy 
rests on logical and scientific foundations of the 
utmost solidity ; but no solidity can secure its pre- 
valence, so antipathetic is its severe regime to minds 
trained as at present, unless it can gain the support 
of women and the proletary class. That supj)ort 
would lend it irresistible strength. The urgent 
need of it can only be soundly appreciated by these 
two great classes of society. Alien to all pretension 
to teaching, they alone can enforce on their systema- 
tic chiefe the fulfilment of the encyclopedic con- 
ditions demanded by their social office. Therefore 
I was bound not to shrink from introducing into 
the popular language philosophical terms which are 
absolutely indispensable; terms not created by 
Positivism, but which it has systematized in point 
of meaning, and the use of which it has developed. 
I mean, in particular, two pairs of essential value 
in expressing the distinctions of Positivism : — first, 
Static and Dynamic ; then, Objective and Subjective, 
Without these I could not sufficiently explain my 
views. Once properly define these terms, and 
secure their uniform use according to their defini- 



PHEFACE. 15 

tion, then philosophical explanations become much 
easier by their j udicious employment. Otherwise they 
: are but a source of obscurity. I do not scruple, in 
this work, to consecrate these expressions to the use 
of Positive religion. They must pass by its agency 
into universal circulation, considering the high im- 
portance of their use from the intellectual and even 
the moral point of view. 

Thus was I led to compose what is, in the strictest 
sense, the Catechism of the Religion of Humanity ; 
and the first point was to examine, on rational prin- 
ciples, the form always adopted for such exposi- 
tions, the dialogue. I soon found in it a fresh in- 
stance of the happy instinct by which the practical 
sagacity of man often anticipates the conclusions of 
sound theory. Fresh from the work of constructing 
the Positive theory of human language, I felt at 
once that since expression must ever have the com- 
munication of thought, as its object, its natural 
form is the dialogue. 

Further, as combinations are in every case, phy- 
sical and still more logical, binary, the conversation 
of the dialogue admits of only two persons, under 
penalty of confusion if this rule is violated. The 
monologue is in reality only adequate for concep- 
tion. It limits itself to the giving expression to 
conceptions as they arise. It is as if one were 
thinking aloud, without reference to any hearer. 
Whereas, when language is used not merely to assist 
the investigations of the reason, but to communi- 
cate the results, then it requires a new process. It 



16 PBEFACE. 

must be worked into a fresh shape, speoiallj adapted 
to the transfer of ideas from one person to another. 
Then, we must take into account the peculiar state 
of our listener, and foresee the modifications which 
the natural course of such a mode of exposition 
will demand. In a word, the simple statement 
must become a real conversation. Nor can its essen- 
tial conditions be met, imless you assume that the 
second person in the dialogue is throughout the 
same, and unless also it is clear who he is. ' But if 
you choose the person successfully, he may stand as 
a type, capable, in the ordinary use of the dialogue, 
of adequately representing every reader. This is 
necessary, as it is impossible to vary the mode of 
exposition to meet the exigencies of each individual, 
as may be done in actual conversation. 

It would follow from this that there must be an 
essential difference between the exposition which 
aims at being in the fullest sense didactic, and one 
which is simply logical In the latter, the thinker 
follows the course of his own thought freely, paying 
no attention to the natural conditions of communi- 
cation ; and, with a view to avoid the great labour 
of recasting one's thoughts, in general we limit our- 
selves to laying them before others just as we 
originally thought them. This rough method of 
exposition contributes largely to the scanty efficiency 
of most of our reading. The form of the dialogue, 
the proper form for all real communication, is re- 
served for the setting forth of such conceptions as 
are important and ripe enough to justify it. This 



% 

- # 



PREFACE. 17 



is why, in all times, religious instruction is given 
in the form of conversation, and not of mere state- 
ment. This form is by no means a symptom of 
negligence, excusable in cases of secondaiy impor- 
tance. Quite the contrary. When the dialogue is 
rightly conducted, it is the only mode of exposition 
which is really adapted for teaching. It meets 
the wants ^f all orders of intelligence. But the 
new elaboration of our thought is necessarily a 
difficult process, and hence, for ordinary commu- 
nications, we are justified in not adopting it. It 
would be childish to aim at such perfection when 
the instruction to be conveyed was not of funda- 
mental importance. On the other hand, this throw- 
ing our thoughts into a fresh shape for the purposes 
of teaching is only practicable where doctrines are 
so thoroughly worked out that we can distinctly 
compare the different modes of expounding them as 
a whole, and easily foresee the objections to which 
they will naturally give rise. 

Were I bound in this place to point out all the 
general principles applicable to the art of commu- 
nication, I would dwell on the improvement it 
admits in regard to style. The great object of 
poets is to express feelings. They have always felt 
the superiority of verse over prose, froin the power 
which verse has to make the artificial language of 
man more beautiful by bringing it nearer to his 
natural language. Now the same reasons would 
equally apply to the commimication of thoughts, if 
we had to attach as much importance to such com- 
c 



i 



18 PBJBFACE. 



munication. Compression of language, and the aid 
of imageiy, the essential characteristics of all real 
versification, would be as appropriate for perfecting 
the exposition of thought, as the exposition of feel- 
ing. This second improvement, however, for the 
purposes of teaching, must he still more of an ex- 
ception than the first, on the ground of the addi- 
tional labour it requires. It presup^ses even a 
greater maturity in regard to the conceptions to be 
expressed, not only in him who is to interpret 
them, but also in the audience. For the audience 
must also exert itself and at once fill up the gaps 
left by the conciseness of the poet. This is why 
several admirable poems are still only in prose. 
The imperfection of the form was at the time ex- 
cusable, as the range of ideas expressed was not one 
generally femiliar. An analogous motive deterred 
men from putting into verse any religious catechism. 
But the Positive faith is distinguished from others 
by its being real and spontaneous. These two cha- 
racteristics will enable it ultimately to attain this 
last perfection of style in its popular exposition. 
This will be, when it shall begin to be sufficiently 
spread to admit of great conciseness and the free 
use of imagery. Only provisionally then need we 
feel limited to the substitution of the dialogue for 
the monologue. 

In accordance with this theory as to the peculiar 
didactic form to be adopted, I was led not only to 
justify the custom which had hitherto prevailed, 
but even to improve upon it, so fsir as the second 



PREFACE. 19 

person in the dialogue is concerned. £7 leaving 
the hearer absolutely vague, the dialogue, or con- 
versational method, also became necessarily vague, 
not to say illusory. Experience led to the use of 
the dialogue. After explaining the rational grounds 
on which its use rests, I soon felt that it would 
remain incomplete, and if incomplete, inadequate, 
so long as it was not clear who the second person 
was, at least to the author's mind. You must abso- 
lutely suppose yourself really in communication 
with some one, although that some one may be an 
ideal personage, or you will fail in deriving the full 
advantages of the form you adopt. So only can 
you institute a true conversation, and not a state- 
ment thrown into dialogue. 

As soon as I came to apply this clear principle, 
my instinct would naturally lead me to choose 
Madame Clotilde de Vaux. Whilst she lived, I had 
felt her angelic influence for one year only. She 
has now for more than six years, since her death, 
been associated with all my thoughts, and with all 
my feelings. Through her I have at length become 
for Humanity, in the strictest sense, a twofold organ, 
as may any one who has reaped the full advantages 
of woman's influence. My career had been that of 
Aristotle — ^I should have wanted energy for that 
of St. Paul, but for her. I had extracted sound 
philosophy from real science ; I was enabled by her 
to found on the basis of that philosophy the uni- 
versal religion. The perfect purity of our con- 
nexion, which circumstances made exceptional, and 
c2 



20 PREFACE. 

even the admirable superiority of the angel who 
never received her due recognition — on these I need 
not dwell — ^they are already fully appreciated by 
the nobler order of minds. Four years ago I re- 
vealed the source of my inspiration, one beyond all 
compare, by the publication of my Discourse on the 
Si/stem of Positivism. At that time Madame de 
Vaux could only be judged by the intellectual and 
moral results of her inspiration, which that Vork 
brought home to all sympathetic hearts as to all 
synthetic minds. But last year, the three intro- 
ductory pieces, which will ever be the distinctive 
mark of the first volume of my System of Positive 
Politics, allowed every one to form a direct appre- 
ciation of her eminent natural superiority. Hence, 
when recently I published the second volume of the 
same treatise, I was already able openly to congra- 
tulate myself on the touching unanimity of feeling 
which undoubtedly animates both sexes towards 
the new Beatrice. These three antecedent publica- 
tions dispel at once all doubt as to my sainted 
hearer. Where there is the due preparation, the 
reader is sufficiently acquainted with her for our 
conversations to possess an interest of their own, one 
directly connected with the persons of the dialogue. 
Such a catechumen meets perfectly all the condi- 
tions of the dialogue. Superior as she was, Madame 
Clotilde de Vaux was yet so early taken from me 
as to render it impossible sufficiently to initiate her 
in Positivism, naturally the object of all her wishes 
and efforts. Even before death broke off finally 



PREFACE. 21 

the work of affectionate, instruction, pain and grief 
had been very serioiB impeciiments. I was hardly 
able to sketch out to her whilst alive the systematic 
preparation which I now accomplish with her when 
dead My angelic disciple, then, brings with her 
nothing beyond the dispositions essential to a dis- 
ciple, dispositions to be found in most women, and 
even in many proletaries. Positivism has not yet 
reached them, but all I presuppose in them, as in 
her, who is my eternal companion, is a profound 
desire to know the religion which can overcome the 
modem anarchy, and a sincere veneration for the 
priest of that religion. I should even prefer for 
my readers those who instinctively fulfilled these 
two previous conditions, unchecked by any scholastic 
training. 

I have already explained in my Positive Politics 
the general idea of the institution of real guardian 
angels. Those who are familiar with that explana- 
tion are aware that the principal type amongst 
women becomes habitually inseparable - from the 
two others. This sweet connexion holds good even 
in our exceptional case. For my pure and immortal 
companion unites in her own person the subjective 
mother my second life presupposes, and the objective 
daughter who was destined for a time to ^dd her 
grace to my existence. Her invariable reserve after 
some time purified my affection and raised* it to 
the level of her own. From that time all I aspired 
to was an miion which should need no concealment, 
that of a legal adoption, the natural one, consider- 



22 PREFACE. 

ing our disparity in age. When I publish our 
noble correspondence, mj last letter will give a clear 
proof of the holy project, the only one which, under 
our respective destinies, was compatible with repose 
and happiness. 

It is thus perfectly natural for me to use in this 
catechism the terms of father and daughter, the 
habitual language of religious instruction. More 
even than the priesthood of Catholicism, or of any 
other form of theology, the priesthood of Positivism 
requires in its priests complete maturity, if for no 
other reason, yet by virtue of the immense encyclo- 
pedic preparation which it prescribes. This was my 
reason for fixing on forty-two as the age at which 
the priests of Humanity should be consecrated. At 
that age the development of the body and the brain 
is complete, as is also the first social lifa These 
names then, father and daughter, become peculiarly 
appropriate* to the teacher and catechumen, and 
they are in conformity with the old etymology of 
the term#f)riest. By using them, I place myself 
naturally in the relation in which I should hare 
stood tb Madame de Yaux had it not been for our 
fatal catastrophe. 

Whilst however this concentration is necessary, 
and it is only the presiding angel that takes part 
directly in the holy conversation, it ought not to 
escape either the reader or myself that my two other 
patronesses take an appropriate though silent part 
in it. Elsewhere I have spoken 'of the subjective 



PREFACE. 23 

influence of mj venerable mother^ of the objective 
action of my noble adopted daughter. In the 
present work they will always be present to my 
hearty when my intellect shall be duly feeling the 
impulse of the principal angeL These three angels 
are for the future inseparable, and inseparably con- 
nected with me ; so much so, that their constant co- 
operation has lately suggested to the eminent artist 
whom Positivism now claims, an idea of admirable 
beauty, by which a mere portrait becon^es a picture 
of profoimd meaning. 

A didactic conversation on this plan renders my ^^ 
own labour easier as well as that of the reader. 
For in many points such an exposition, meant for 
the public, does not widely differ from the explana- 
tions which I should have given in private to my 
sainted companion in answer to her questions, had 
our objective union lasted longer. This is clearly 
seen from my philosophical letter on Marriage. 
The very period of the year in which I am writing 
this, to me, pleasant work of elaboratiin, recalls 
with peculiar force the wishes she herself expressed, 
during that incomparable year, for a methodical 
initiation. All I have to do, then, is to carry myself 
back seven years. I can then conceive as actually 
spoken to a living object that which I must now 
develope subjectively, by placing myself in 1852 in 
the situation of 1845. To carry myself back in 
this way requires an effort ; but the effort is com- 
^ pensated by the great advantage of being able to 

\ 
\ 

\ 

i 



24 PREFACE. 

give a better idea of her angelic ascendancy over 
me. I know not how to convey a right im- 
pression of its character, except by combining two 
admirable verses, respectively meant for Beatrice 
and Laura — 

Quella che imparadisa la mia mente 
Ogni basso pensier dal cor m'avulse. 

I am late in bringing to its completion the initia- 
tion which my affection had led me to begin. But, 
on the other hand, I bring it more easily into con- 
formity with the sentiments which finally prevailed 
• towards her who will always be associated with me 
as at once my disciple and colleague. Her age has 
become fixed, by the general law of our subjective 
existence. My own, relatively to hers, increases 
daily, so as to sanction no other images but those 
drawn from the filial relation. The existence of both 
of us is thus brought into a more perfect continuity, 
and the harmony of my whole nature is also carried 
to a higtiisr perfection. At the same time then 
that I thus explain the unity of man as constituted 
by Positivism, I am developing and consolidating 
the fundamental connexion between my private and 
my public life. The philosophical influence of the 
angel who inspires me, becomes from this point of 
view as complete and as direct as it ever can be ; 
consequently none any longer contest it. I ven- 
ture then to hope, that to enable me to testify my 
just gratitude, all nobler minds will lend me due ^ 
aid in supplying the deficiency of which I am pro-* 

/ 



PREFACE. 25 

fdundly conscious, in the midst of my best dollar 
prayers — ^a consciousness such as that expressed by 
Dante towards his sweet patroness — 

Non fe raflfezion mia tanto profonda 
Che basti a render voi grazia per grazia. 

This expression of grateful feeling by the public 
must, as well as my own, embrace the two other 
guardian angels who form the complement of the 
presiding one. All three contribute to the influence 
of woman upon me. Far distant, alas ! is now the 
imposing memory of the perfect Catholicism whose 
sway my noble and tender mother obeyed. But 
distant though it be, it shall always make me assert, 
more than I did in my youth, that the constant 
cultivation of the feelings must take precedence of 
that of the intellect, and even of that of activity. 
On the other hand, I might be led, by my keen sense 
of the necessity of basing all real public virtue on 
the foundation of private excellence, to be too ex- 
clusiTe, and to undervalue the importance of civic 
morality, an importance inherent in it, and directly 
its own ; but I should soon correct my error by a 
ri^t estimation of the admirable sociability of my 
third patroness. In undertaking this work, which 
is an episode in my larger one, I have, then, the 
special assistance of all my three guardian angels. 
It is true, one alone actively participates, the other 
two co-operate silently; but this in no way di- 
miiuflhes the claim of those two to the veneration 
of «U my followers. 



26 PBEFAOE. 

Looked at from a more general point of view, 
the form of teaching I have adopted will be seen 
to convey directly a strong impression of the cha- 
racter of the religion to be taught. Spontaneously 
it brings out the fundamental nature of the Positive 
system of life. The great aim of that system is to 
enforce a systematic discipline of all the powers of 
man, and it rests principally on the constant con- 
currence of feeling with reason in the regulation of 
our action. Now the present series of conversations 
always puts forward the heart aod the intellect as 
acting in concert under a religious impulse, in order 
to bring under the influence of morality the material 
power to which the world of action is nec«8earily md^ 
jected. In that world the woman and the priest are, 
as a fact, the two indispensable elements of the real 
moderating power, which must be both domestic and 
civic. This holy coalition in the interest of society 
I here organize, and in doing so I allow each of its 
constituents to proceed in conformity with its own 
nature. The heart states the questions; the i&* 
tellect answers them. Thus the very form of tluB 
Catechism points at once to the great central idea of 
Positivism : man thinking under the in^iration of 
woman, the object being to bring about a con- 
currence of synthesis with sympathy, in order to 
regularise the joint action of the two sexes. 

The adoption of this method for the new religions 
instruction shows that it is meant primarily for the 
sex in which affection predominates. This prefisr- 
ence is in accordance with the true spirit of the 



PREFACE. 27 

final regime. It is equally clear that at is, in an 
especial manner, adapted to the need of the last 
period of the transitional state ; for in this last 
period every influence which shall be recognised by 
the normal state must be working with even greater 
strength, if with less regularity. It is for women, 
then, that this small work is especially meant; 
above aU, for those who have no literary education. 
Not but that the better proletaries will soon, as it 
appears to me, welcome it, and look on it as deciding 
the matter. Still women only can fully understand 
the preponderance that ought to be given to the 
habitual cultivation of the heart, borne down as it 
is by the coarse activity, both in speculation and 
action, which prevails in the modem Western world. 
It is only in the sanctuary of the female heart that, 
at the present day, we can find the noble submissive- 
ness of spirit required by a systematic regeneration. 
During the last four years the reason of the people 
has suflered profoundly from the unibrtunaie exer- 
cise of universal suffrage. It has received a bad 
bias, whereas it had previously been preserved from 
all constitutional sophisms, and from Parliamentary 
intrigues. The rich and the literary class had had 
a monopoly of them. A blind spirit of pride has 
been developed in our proletaries, and they have 
been led to think they could settle the highest 
social questions without any serious study. The 
southern populations of Western Europe have been 
much less tainted by this evil. The resistance of 
Catholicism has sheltered them against the meta- 



28 PREFACE. 

physical influence of Protestantism or Deism. But 
reading negative books begins to spread the spirit 
even there. Turn where I will, it is only with 
women that I can find support. This is the conse- 
quence of their wholesome exclusion from political 
action. With their support, I can secure the free 
ascendancy of the principles which shall in the end 
qualify the proletaries to place their confidence 
aright on points of theory as well as on points of 
practice. 

The deep-seated intellectual anarchy of our time 
is another reason why Positive religion should appeal 
more particularly to the female sex. For that 
anarchy renders more necessary than ever the pre- 
dominance of feeling, as it is feeling alone which 
preserves Western society from a complete and irre- 
parable dissolution. Since the close of the Middle 
Ages, the influence of woman has been the spje, . 
though unacknowledged, check on the moral evils 
naturally resulting from a state of mental alienation^ 
the state to which the West has been more and 
more approximating — and in the West, especially its 
centre — France. This chronic state of unreason is 
now at its height, and since no maxim of social 
experience can resist the corrosive effects of discus- 
sion as actually conducted, it is feeling alone that 
maintains order in the West. And even feeling is 
seriously impaired already, so fatal has been the 
reaction on it of the sophisms of the intellect, 
which are always favourable to our personal instincts, 
in themselves naturally the stronger, x v > 



PREFACE. 2J> 

m 

Our true cerebral constitution off*s us three 
sympathetic tendencies. The first and last^^re 
already much weakened, the second nearly extinct^ 
in the majority of those who take an active part in 
the agitation of the Western world. Penetrate 
beyond the mere exterior of existing fomilies, and 
you find attachment has but little strength left, 
even in those relations of life which are its proper 
sphere. As for the general kindness, so loudly 
vaunted at present, it is far more an indication of 
hatred towards the rich, than of love for the poor. 
For modem philanthropy but too often gives ex- 
jpression to its pretended benevolence in forms that 
^re more appropriate to passion or envy. But the 
third social instinct, which, as the immediate basis 
of all true discipline of man, ought to be the most 
habitual, has suffered even more than the two 
otters. The deteriomtion in this respect may be 
more easily seen in the rich and the educated classes ; 
but it reaches even th^ proletariate, except where a 
wise indifference keeps them from mixing in any 
political movement. 

Still, veneration can continue to exist in the 
midst of the wildest revolutionary aberrations. 
Indeed, it is their best natural corrective. I myself 
experienced this during the profoundly negative 
phasis which necessarily preceded my systematic 
development. At that time it was enthusiasm 
alone that kept me from a sophistical demoralization; 
though this enthusiasm laid me peculiarly open for 
a time to the seductions of a shallow and depraved 



30 PREFAOE. 

juggler. 'Vfieneration, at the present day, is the 
de^^ve charactenstic by which we may distinguish 
in the ranks of the revolutionary party those who 
are susceptible of a real regeneration; a remark 
which is particularly applicable to the case of those 
Communists who are not educated. In the immense 
majority of those who are yet simply negative^ we 
may discover this valuable symptom. In the 
majority of their chiefe, we cannot. pThe existing 
state of anarchy everywhere gives a temporary 
predominance to bad natures. These men are abso- 
lutely unsusceptible of discipline. Yet, though few 
in number, they wield a vast influence, and they 
use that influence to infect with subversive ideas, 
and to ferment the heads of all who are without 
Arm convictions. There is no remedy for this 
plague of Western Europe, except the contempt of 
the populations they address, or the severity of the 
Governments. The doctrine which alone can secure 
the regular action of these two safeguards, can at 
the outset meet with no decided support, except 
from the feeling of women, soon to be aided by the 
intelligence of the proletariate. Unless we secured 
the due intervention of woman, the discipline of 
Positivism would never succeed in driving back 
into obscurity the pretended thinkers, who speak 
with decision on sociological questions, whilst igno- 
rant of arithmetic. For the people shares, in many 
respects, their worst &ults, and so is, as yet, inca- 
pable of seconding the new priesthood in its contest 
with these dangerous -talkers. At least I can, for 



PfiEFACE. 31 

# r 

the moment; hope for no coUectiye assistance from 
any quarter, except from the proletaries, who have 
hitherto taken no part in our political discussions. 
They are not the less instinctively attached, as 
even women are, to the social end proclaimed hy 
the great revolution. To these two classes, then, 
women and proletaries, this Catechism appeals as 
ready £^. its acceptance, i * 

I have stated^e-general grounds which warrant 
my directing my attention chiefly to women. But, 
further, I have now for a long time thought, that 
it is on them that depends for its acceptance Anally 
the solution which the whole of past history points 
to as the right solution of our Western difficulties. 

In the first place, there would he an absurdity 
in expecting to end without them the most thorough 
of all human revolutions. In all previous revolu- 
tions they have had a large share. Were the 
repugnance they instinctively feel for oui* modem 
movement invincible, it would be quite enouigh to 
insure its fidlure. ' That repugnance is the real 
source of the fatal anomaly which places retrograde 
chiefs at the head of progressive populations — ^as 
though dulness and hypocrisy alone could furnish 
o£&cial security for the maintenance of order in the 
West. Till Positive religion has overcome this 
resistance on the part of women, it will never be 
able, in its treatment of the leading partisans of the 
different retrograde systems, to give free scope to 
its decided and just reprobation of their mental 
and moral inferiority. 



32 PREFACE. 

If at the present daj men deny the existence in 
our nature of the disinterested affections, they lay 
themselves open to just suspicion. Their rejection 
on this point of the demonstrations of modem 
science^ must be owing to the radical imperfection 
of their own feelings. As they pursue no good, how- 
ever trifling, but from the hope of an infinite re- 
ward, or from the fear of an eternal punishment, 
they prove their heart to be as degraded as their 
intellect evidently is, considering the absurdity of 
the belief they hold. And yet the direction of 
Western Europe is still entrusted to such men. 
And it is so in consequence of the tacit adhesion of 
women. Such characters will be, and that wisely, a 
sure ground of exclusion from all the higher func- 
tions of society, when Positivism shall have duly 
trained on systematic principles the reason of the 
majority. 

Meanwhile, the religion of Humanity will soon 
strip the retrograde party of the august support wiich 
is given it, solely from a just horror of anarchy. 
In spite of objections which seem warranted by 
experience, women are well disposed to form a right 
estimate of the only doctrine which in the present 
day can thoroughly combine order with progress. 
Above all, they will recognise the fact that this 
final synthesis, while it comprehends every phase of 
our existence, yet gives a greater preponderance to 
feeling than was given by the provisional synthesis, 
which sacrificed to feeling the intellect and action of 
man. Positive Philosophy places morals at the 



PBEFACE. 33 

summit of its encyclopedic construction, and so is in 
perfect agreement with the convictions of women. 
For morals, at once a science and aA art, are neces- 
sarily the most important and the most difficult 
branch of study. In them are summed up all the 
rest, and they rise above the rest. ' The senti- 
; ments 6i tkxvslry i-eceive at length a full develop- 
; naent, and are no longer confined by the conflicting 
; tendencies of the prevalent theological belief. The 
; system of Positive worship looks on woman as the 
; moral providence of our species. In that system 
every true woman, in daily life, is considered the 
best representative of the real Great Being. The 
system of life, or regime^ which answers to the 
worship, constitutes, on systematic principles, the 
family as the normal basis of society. And by that 
constitution, it leads to the due prevalence in the 
fieunily of woman's influence, for in her is vested 
the supreme control, so &.r as that control can be 
^nvate, of the education of alL On all these 
groimds. Positivism will soon be fully appreciated 
by women, once let them be adequately instructed 
in its more marked characteristics. Some might at 
first regret the loss of the chimerical hopes they 
had once cherished ; but even they would not be 
slow to see the moral superiority of the subjective 
immortality offered by Positivism. It is by its 
nature thoroughly altruistic, or unselfish ; and 
therefore, as I said, morally superior to the old ob- 
jective immortality, which could never clear itself 
of the egoistic, or selfish, character. The law of 

D 



34 ^ PBBFAOE. 

eternal widowhood, the characteristic of marriage 
in the Poedtiyist sense, would be> enough, in this 
respect, to decifjA the comparison. 

From the revolution of Western Europe, women 
must no longer stand aloof. In order to secure 
their due incorporation into the movement, its lajst 
phase must be looked on as having for them a deep 
and special interest, in direct relation with the true 
object of women's existence. 

Clear off all superficial adjuncts, and four great 
classes constitute modem society. The four were 
destined to experience in succession the shock which 
the final regeneration of that society rendered in- 
evitable. The convulsion began in the last century 
with the intellectual element. The class which 
represented it rose in insurrection against the 
whole existing system based on the ideas of theology 
and war. The political explosion which was the 
natural result soon followed. It began with the 
middle classes, who had long been eager to take the 
place of the nobility. Throughout Europe the 
nobility resisted, and its resistance could only be 
overcome by calling in the French proletariate to 
support their new political chiefs. Thus led to 
mix in the great political struggle, the proletariate 
of Western Europe put forward its claim — a claim 
which there was no resisting, from its justice— to be 
incorporated into the system of modern society. 
It was put forward as soon as peace allowed the 
proletariate to make its wishes sufficiently clear. 
Still the revolutionary chain is incomplete, for it 



_^ PREFACE. , 35 

does not embrace the most fundamental element of 
the system of human order rightly viewed. The 
revolution, in regard to women, i^st be the com- 
plement of the revolution which took in the prole- ' 
tariate, just as this last consolidated the revolution 
of the middle classes, sprung in its turn originally 
from the philosophical revolution. 

Not till this last step has been taken will our 
modem movement have really prepared all that is 
essential for the basis of the final regeneration. 
Till it takes in women, it can have no other result 
but to prolong the lamentable series of oscillations 
between retrogression and anarchy. But this, its 
final and decisive step to completion, follows as a 
result of the \^hole of the antecedent phases, more 
imturally than any one of those phases sprung from 
its predecessor. In particular, it is connected with 
the popular phase ; for the social incorporation of 
the proletariate is necessarily dependent on the due 
establishment of the principle that woman must be 
set free from the necessity of all labour away from 
her own home. Between the two questions there 
evidently exists the dosest mutual connexion ; for 
unless this exemption be universal, as the indis- 
pensable complement of the abolition of serfage, the 
family of the proletary would be essentially defec- 
tive in its constitution, since in it women would 
remain habitually exposed to the horrible alterna- 
tive of misery or prostitution. 

The best practical summary of the programme of 
modem order will soon be this indisputable prin- 

d2 
f 



36 PREFACE. 

ciple — man ought to support womarij in order that 
woman may be enabled to fulfil properly her holy 
social purpose. -My Catechism will, I hope, set in 
a clear light the close connexion of such a condition 
with the whole of the great movement of renova- 
tion, not merely in its moral, but in its mental, and 
even its material aspect. Influenced by the holy 
reaction of this revolution in the position of women, 
the revolution in that of the proletariate will soon 
clear itself of the subversive tendencies which have 
hitherto neutralized it. Woman's object is every- 
where the same, to secure the due supremacy of 
moral force; so she is led to visit with especial 
reprobation all collective violence. She is still 
less ready to accept the yoke of nunroers than that 
of wealth. Her silent social influence will soon 
modify the two remaining parts of the Western revo- 
lution; and the modifications, though not so directly 
traceable to it, will be equally valuable with those 
already mentioned. Her influence will facilitate 
the advent to political power of the industrial 
patriciate, and of the Positive priesthood; it will do 
so by leading both to set themselves clear once for 
all from the heterogeneous and ephemeral classes 
who were at the head of the transition whilst it 
was in its negative phase. So completed, so puri- 
fied, the revolution of Western Europe will proceed 
in a free and systematic course towards its peaceful 
termination, under the general direction of the true 
servants of Humanity. Their guidance will have 
an organic and progressive character which will 



PREFACE. 37 

completely set aside all retrograde and anarchical 
parties. They will look on any one who persists in 
the Uieological or metaphysical state as .disqualified 
by wea^ess of the brain for government. 

-Hiave gone through the essential conditions, the 
fulfilment of which shows that this Catechism is 
fully adapted to discharge its most important 
office, whether in the present or the future. When 
Positive religion shall have gained sufficient exten- 
sion, this work will be ite best summary for con- 
stant use. For the present it must serve to pre- 
pare the way for the free adoption of Positivism. 
^ It may stand as a general view of the subject, 
suitable for the propagation of the religion, whereas 
hitherto tlierl' was no systematic guidance ac- 
cessible. 

If we look to the form and the course of this 
episode in my great construction, still more if we 
view it as a whole, it expresses all the ^eat intel- 
lectual and moral attributes of the new faith. It 
will be felt that I have ^conBtantly kept in sight the 
due subordination of the reason of man to the feel- 
ing of woman. This ss necessary, in order that the 
h^brt may bring all the powers of the intellect to 
bear on the most difficult and important province 
of teaching. Ultimately it will react on another 
poiitt. It will secure respect for, and even the ex- 
tension to others of my own pertsonal worship, of 
the aagel from whom I derive at onee its chief 
fluggeatioois and th» best mode of expounding them, 
fiueh services will soon reader my sainted hearer 



38 PKEFACE. 

dear to all who shall have undergone a true regene- 
ration. Henceforward her glorification is insepa- 
rable from mine ; it will constitute my most valued 
reward She is for all time incorporated into the 
true Supreme Being, of whom her tender image is 
allowed to be for me the best representative. In. 
each of my three daily prayers I adore both toge- 
ther, and I sum up all my wishes for personal per- 
fection in the admirable form by which the sub- 
limest of Mystics was led to prepare, in his own 
manner, the moral motto of Positivism (Live for 
others). 

Amen te plus qu^ me, nee me nisi propter te. 

AUGUSTE CoMTE, 

Founder of the Religion of Humanity. 

Paris, 25th Charlemagne 64, 
Sunday, 14th July, 1862. 

To increase the usefulness of this Catechism, I 
add to its prefiice an improved edition of the short 
catalogue of books which I published October 8th, 
1851, with the view of guiding the more thoughtful 
minds among the people in their choice for con- 
stant use. No other priesthood could discharge 
this office. The Positive priesthood is enabled to 
do so by the encyclopedic character of its educa- 
tion and teaching, which thus becomes more easily 
appreciable. Both the intellect and the moral 
character suffer grievously at the present time from 
irregular reading. This fSact is sufficient to indicate 
the increasing value of this small work, conceived 



PBEPACE. 39 

in a synthetical spirit. The collection named has 
not yet been formed, still each one can without 
difficulty even now collect in one shape or another 
its separate parts. 



Positivist Library for the Nineteenth Centv/ry, 

150 Volumes. 

I. POETRY. (Thirty Volumes.) 

The Iliad and the Odysseyi in one Yolnmei without notes. 

iBschylus, The King (Edipus of Sophocles, and Aristophanes, 
in one Tolume, without notes. 

Pindar, Theocritus, Daphnis and Ohloe, in one volume, with- 
out notes. 

Plautus and Terence, in one volume, without notes. 

Virgil, selections from Horace, Lucan, in one volume, without 

note^. 
Ovid, TibuUus, Juvenal. 

Fabliaux of the Middle Ages, by Legrand D'Aussy. 
Dante, Ariosto, Tasso, Petrarca, in one volume, in Italian. 
Select Plays of Metastasio and Alfieri, also in Italian. 
I Promessi Sposi, by Manzoni, in one volume, in Italian. 

Don Quixote, and the Novels of Cervantes, in Spanish, in one 
volume. 

Select Spanish Dramas, a collection edited by Don Jos6 Segundo 
Florez, in one volume, in Spanish. 

The Bomancero Espanol, a selection, with the poem of the Cid, 
one volume, in Spanish. 

Select Plays of P. Comeille. 

Molidre. 

Select PUiys of Bacine and Volture, in one volume. 

La Fontaine's Fables, with some from Florian and Lamotte. 

Gil Bias, by Lesage. 



40 PREFACE. 

The FrinoeBB of Oleres, Paul and Virginia, and the Last of 
the Abencenages, to be collected in one volume. 

The Martyrs, by Chateanbriand. 

Select Flays of Shakspeare. 

Milton — Faradise Lost and Lyrical Foems. 

Robinson Gnisoe and the Vicar of Wakefield, in one rolnme. 

Tom Jones, by Fielding, in English, or translated by Gb^ron. 

The seven masterpieces of Walter Scott — Ivanhoe, Qnentin 
Dnrward, the Fair Maid of Ferth, the Legend of Montrose, 
Woodstock, the Heart of Midlothian, the Antiquary. 

Select works of Byron, Don Juan in particolar to be suppressed. 

Select works of GK>ethe. 

The AxahiAn Nights. 

n. SCIENCE. (Thirty Volumes.) 

Condorcet's Arithmetic, Algebra and G^eometry of CUirant, 
the Trigonometry of Lacroix or Legendre, the three to form 
one volume. 

The Analytical GFeometry of Auguste Comte, preceded by the 
Geometry of Descartes. 

Statics, by Foinsot, with all his Memoirs on Mechanics. 

The Course of Analysis given by Navier at the Ecole Folytech- 
nique, followed by the Essay of Camot on Equilibrium and 
Motion. 

The Theory of Functions, by Lagrange. 

The Popular Astronomy of Auguste Oomte, followed by the 
Worlds of Fontenelle. 

Fischer's Mechanical Physics, translated and annotated by 
Biot. 

Alphabetical Manual of Practical Philosophy, by John Carr. 

The Chemistry of Lavoisier. 

Chemical Statics, by Berthollet. 

Elements of Chemistry, by James Ghraham. 

Manual of Anatomy, by Meckel. 

The General Anatomy of Bichat, preceded by his Treatise on 
Life and Death. 



PBEFAOB. 41 

The first volume of Blainville on the Organization of Animals. 

The Physiology of Blcherand, with Notes by B^iard, and the 
Physiology of Glande Bernard. 

Systematic Essay on Biology, by Segond, and his Treatise on 
General Anatomy. 

NouTeaux ^l^ments de la Science de PHomme, Barthez (2nd 
edition, 1806). 

Zoological Philosophy, by Lamarck. 

Dnmerirs Natural History. 

Bnffon — Discourses on the Nature of Animals. 

The Art of Prolonging Human Life, by Hufeland, preceded 
by Hippocrates on Air, Water, and Situation, and fol- 
lowed by Comaro's book on Sobriety, to form one volume. 

The History of Chronic Inflammation, by Broussais, preceded 
by his Propositions de M^decine. 

The liloges des Savans, by Fontenelle and Oondoicet. 



in. HISTORY. (Sixty Volumes.) 

The Abr^g^ de GF6ographie IJniverselle, by Malte Brun. 

Bienzi — (Geographical Dictionary. 

Cook's Voyages, and those of Chardln. 

Ifignet — ^History of the French B«volu^on. 

Heeren — Manual of Modem History. 

Voltaire— Sificle de Louis XIV. 

Memoirs of Madame de Motteville. 

The Political Testament of Bichelieu, and the LaU of Cromwell, 
to form one volume. 

Hemolrs of Benv^uto Cellini, in Italiaa. 

Memoirs of Commines. 

The Abr^g^ de THistoire de Fiance, by Bossuet. 

The Bevolutions of Italy, by Denina. 

The History of Spain, by Ascargorta. 

Bob^rtson — Charles V. 

Hume — History of Enghind. 



4:2 PBEFAGE. 

Hallam — ^Middle Ages. 

Pleury — Ecclesiastical History. 

Gibbon — Decline and Fall. 

Manual of Ancient History — Heeren. 

Tacitus. 

Herodotus, Thucydides, in one Tolume. 

Plutarch's Lives. 

CsBsar's Commentaries, and Arrian*s Alexander, in one volume. 

The Voyage of Anachands, by Barthelemy. 

The History of Art among the Ancients, by Winckelmann. 

Treatise on Fainting, by Leonairdo da Vinci, in Italian. 

Memoirs on Music, by Qx^try. 

IV. SYNTHESIS. (Thirty Volumes.) 

Aristotle's Ethics and Politics, in one volume. 

The Bible. 

The Ooran. 

The City of God, by St. Augustin. 

The Confessions of St. Augustin, followed by St. Bernard on 
the Love of God. 

The Imitation of Jesus Christ, the original, and the French 
translation by Comeille. 

The Catechism of Montpellier, preceded by the Exposition of 
Catholic Doctrine, by Bossuet, and followed by St. AuguB- 
tin's Commentary on the Sermon on the Mount. 

History of Protestant Variations, by Bossuet. 

Descartes — Discourse on Method, preceded by Bacon's Novum 
Organum, and followed by the Interpretation of Nature, 
by Diderot. 

Pascal's Thoughts, followed by those of Vauvenargues, and 
Madame de Lambert's Conseils d'une Mdre. 

Bossuet's Discourse on Universal History, followed by Condor- 
cet's Esquisse Historique. 

De Maistre's Treatise on the Pope, preceded by Bossuet's 
Politique Sacr^e. 



PREFACE. 43 

Hume's Philosophical Essays, preceded by the two Dissertations 
on the Deaf and the Blind, by Diderot, and followed by 
Adam Smith's Essay on the History of Astronomy. 

Theory of the Beautiful, by Barthez, preceded by the Essay 

on the Beautiful, by Diderot. 
Oabanis — Les Eapports du Physique et du Moral de 1' Homme. 

Treatise on the Functions of the Brain, by Gall, preceded by 
GJeorges Leroy's Letters on Animals. 

Broussais — Treatise on Irritation and Madness. 

The Positive Philosophy of Anguste Comte (condensed by Miss 
Martineau), his Positive Politics, and Positivist Catechism. 

Paris, 5th Dante 66 (Tuesday, 18th July, 1854). 



INTRODUCTION. 



GENERAL THEORY OF RELIGION, 



CONVERSATION I. 

The Woman. — I have often asked myself this ques- 
tion, my dear &ther. Your doctrine rejects every 
form of belief in a supernatural power; why do 
you persist in calling it a Religion ? But on reflec- 
tion the fact struck me, that the term, Religion, is, 
in common use, given to many systems, not merely 
different, but even incompatible the one with the 
other. Each of these systems claims exclusive 
possession of it ; yet no one of them has at any time 
been able, if you take the whole race into account, 
to I'eckon up as many adherents as opponents. I 
was hence led to think that this fundamental term 
must have some one general acceptation, radically 
independent of every special form of faith. Once ar- 
rived at this point, I felt convinced that it was on 
this essential meaning of the term that you fixed, 
and that you were justified therefore in applying it 
to Positivism, in spite of the greater contrast that 
exists between it and the previous doctrines, which 



46 INTBODUCTION. 

openly avow that their mutual points of difference 
are quite as serious as the points in which they 
agree. Still, as this explanation seems to me yet 
far from clear, would you begin your exposition by 
explaining at once and in precise language the ra- . 
dical sense of the word Edigion? 

The Prie^. — Looking to the etymology of the 
term, my dear daughter, we find as a fact that it 
has no necessary connexion with any opinions 
whatever that may be considered useful for attain- 
ing the end it sets before us. In itself it expresses 
the state of perfect unity which is the distinctive 
mark of man's existence, both as an individual and 
in society, when all the constituent parts of his 
nature, moral as well as physical, are made habitu- 
ally to converge towards one common purpose. 
Thus the term religion would be equivalent to 
synthesis, were it not that this last, not by force 
of its composition, but by nearly universal custom, 
is now limited entirely to the domain of the intel- 
lect, whilst the other embraces all the attributes of 
man. Religion, then, consists in regulating each 
one's individual nature, and forms the rallying [mint 
for all the separate individuals. These are but two 
distinct forms of one and the same prpblem , for 
every man, at different periods of his life, differs 
from himself not less than at any one time he 
differs from those around him ; so that for the in- 
dividual, as for the community, the laws of perma- 
nence and participation are identical. 

The full attainment of this harmony, for the in- 



IHTRODUCTIOK. 47 

di-vidual or for the society, is never possible, so 
complicated is our existence. This definition of 
religion, consequently, is meant to convey an idea 
of the unchanging type towards which, by a com- 
bination of all our exertions, we gradually approxi- 
mate. Man's happiness and merit consist in draw- 
ing as near as possible to this unity. Its gradual 
development is the best measure of our real pro- 
gress towards perfection, as individuals, or as so- 
cieties. As the various attributes of man come into 
fi-eer play, it becomes more important that they 
should habitually act in concert. But, at the same 
time, this would become more difficult, were it not 
that their evolution has of itself a tendency to make 
lis more susceptible of discipline. This I will ex- 
plain soon. 

Now, as a high value was always set on this 
synthetical state, attention was naturally concen- 
trated on the means of attaining it. Thus men 
were led to take the means for the end, and to 
transfer the name of religion to any of the systems 
of opinions which it represented. At first sight, these 
numerous forms of belief appear irreconcilable '^^^'^y® 
Positivism, however, can bring them into an ' ' ^^ 
sential agreement, by viewing each in referenc* /^ ^ 
the purpose it answered in its own time ai ^^''^ 
country. There is, at bottom, but one religion, & ^^hers, 
once universal and final. To it all the partial an *'^^®**" 
provisional religions more and more pointed, so fg*^* •*•* 
as the whole state of things at the time allowec ^"^^^7 

The '-arious religions of man have been empirica?^ ®® 
^ '^ body. 



48 IXTBODUOnON. 

We Bubstitate for them a systematic religion, deve- 
loping the tmity of man ; for it has at length be- 
come possible to constitute such a religion imme- 
' diately and completely, by combining the results of 
our previous unsystematic state. As a natural con- 
sequence, then, of its principles, PositiTism re- 
moves the antagonism of the different religions 
which have preceded it, for it claims as its own 
peculiar domain that common ground on which 
they all instinctively rested. Nor could the doc- 
trine of Positivism ever be universally received, 
were it not for its relative character. This secures 
for it, in spite of its anti-theological principles, by 
the nature of the case, strong affinities with every 
form of belief that has been a1}le for a time to form 
the guidance of any part of the human race. 

The Womcm, — Your definition of religion will set 
me completely at ease, my father, if you can succeed 
in clearing up a serious difficulty, which seems to 
be the consequence of its too great comprehensive- 
ness. In stating your idea of man's unity, you take 
in his physical as well as his moral nature. They 
oare, in fact, so bound up together, that no true har- 
formy is possible if you separate them ; and yet I 
distv'it difficult to accustom myself to look on health 
eve a part of religion, so as to make morality really 
frcke in medicine. 

dii The FriesL — And yet, my daughter, the arbitrary 

di^paration of the two, which now exists, and which 

ne>u wish to perpetuate, would be directly contrary 

) our unity. The origin of that separation 



1 



nwBODucflpioir. 49 

reality, the inadequacy of the last provisional reli- 
gion, Catholicism, which found itself unable to dis- 
cipHne the soul, unless it gave into profene.hands 
the management of the, body In the ancient 
theocracies, the most complete and most durable 
form of the supernatural r^ghney this groundless 
division did not exist In them the art of preserv- 
ing health and of curing diseases was always a mere 
adjunct of the priestly functions. 

Such is really the natural order of things. Posi- 
tivism comes forward to restore it and to consoli- 
date it ; and it does so by virtue of the complete- 
ness which chara<5terizes it. The art of man and 
the science of man are each of them inseparable 
from the othefrj they have a common destination, 
though the object they have in view may present 
itself under different aspects. But it is not, there- 
fore, divisible; on the contrary, all its parts are 
intimately connected. No sound treatment of 
either body or mind is possible, now that the phy- 
sician and the priest make an exclusive study, the 
one of the physical, the other of the moral nature 
of man—not to speak of the philosopher, who, in 
our modem anarchy, wrests from the priesthood the 
domain of the intellect, leaving it only the heart. 

The diseases of the brain, besides many others 
daily prove the powerlessness of aU medical treat^ 
ment which limits itself to the lowest organs. It 
is quite as easy to see the inadequacy of every 

priesthood which aims at guiding the soul, and does 

1^ take into account its subordination to the body. 



•J 



M omiomponoa; 

Uttder bdtk |>oiBts of Tiew the separation is anar- 
d&icaL The domain of the priesthood must be 
reoonstituted in its integrity ; medicine must again 
become a part of it. This will be the case when 
the dergy of Positive religion shall have adequately 
fulfilled the encyclopedic eonditions required of 
them. As a matter of faot^ the precepts of health 
oan secure active obedience only when they are 
rested on moral grounds. This is true equally of 
the individual and the society. It is easily verified 
by the fhiitlessness of the efibrts made by our 
physicians in Western Europe to regulate common 
diet. 'Hiey have been fruitless ever since the old 
religious precepts lost their hold. Men will not 
generally submit to any practical inoonvenience on 
the ground of their own mere personal health, — 
eaflh one is left, on this ground, to judge for himself. 
And we are often more sensible of actual and 
certain annoyance than of distant and doubtful 
advantages. We must call in an authority supe- 
rior to all individual judgment, to be able to pre- 
fioribe, even in unimportant points, rules which 
shall have any real efficacy. Such rules will then 
rest on a view of the needs of society, which shall 
admit of no hesitation as to obedience. 

The Wonum. — Now that I have surveyed, in all 
its extent, the natural province of religion, I should 
be glad to know, my father, what are the general 
conditions on which it depends. I have been often 
told that it exclusively concerns the heart But I 
have always thought that the intellect is also con* 



INTBODUCTION. 51 

cemed with it. Could I gain a clear idea of the 
parts respectively assigned them 1 

The Frieat, — A right judgment on this point, 
ray daughter, follows &om a searching examination 
of the word religion, the best, perhaps, in point of 
composition, of all the terms used by man. It is so 
constructed as to express a twofold connexion, 
>vhich, if justly conceived, is sufficient as a resiime 
of the whole abstract theory of man's unity. To 
constitute a couiplete and durable harmony, what 
is wanted, is really, to hind together man's inner 
nature by love, and then to hind the man to the 
outer world by faith. Such, generally stated, is 
the necessary participation of the heart and the 
intellect respectively, in reference to the synthe- 
tical state, or unity, of the individual or the so- 
ciety. 

Unity implies, above all, one feeling to which all 
our different inclinations can be subordinated. For, 
as our actions and our thoughts are always swayed 
by our affections, harmony would be unattainable 
by man if these affections were not co-ordinated 
under the preponderance of one instinct. 

This is the condition on which our internal unity 
depends. But it would be inadequate, did not our 
intelligence make us recognise, outside of us, a 
superior power, to which our existence must always 
be in subjection, even whilst we attempt to modify . 
it. To qualify us better for subjects of this ultimate 
rule, — ^this is the primary reason why our moral 
iiarmony, as individuals or as societies, is indiapen- 
b2 



52 INTBODUCTION. 

sable. Aixd, reversing the process, this predomi- 
nance of the external tends to regulate the internal, 
by favouring the ascendancy of that instinct which 
most easily accepts such a necessity. So there is a 
natural connexion between the two general con- 
ditions on which religion depends^ especially when 
the external order of things can become the object 
on which the inward feeling can rest. 

The Woman. — This abstract theory of our unity 
presents, my father, one radical difficulty, viz.; as 
regards the question of moral influence. In your 
consideration of the internal harmony, you seem to 
me to forget that our personal instincts have, un- 
fortunately, greater energy than our sympathetic 
tendencies. Now the preponderance of these per- 
sonal instincts, which seems a reason for their being 
made the natural centre of our moral existence, 
would, on the other hand, make our personal unity 
almost incompatible with any social unity. Yet 
the harmony of the individual has been found not 
irreconcilable with that of the society, so thaW I 
need some fresh explanations to show that the two 
are in themselves entirely compatible. 

The Priest. — You have touched, my daughter, on 
the most difficult problem of man's existence. That 
problem is, to secure the gradual predominance of 
sociability over personality ; whereas, when left to 
themselves, personality is predominant. The better 
to understand how this may be done, we must begin 
by comparing the two opposite forms which our 
moral unity might naturally take, according as its 



INTRODUCTION. ^ 53 

internal basis should be egoistic or altruistic (per- * 
sonal or relative). 

You used the plural in speaking of our person- 
ality, and you by so doing involuntarily bore witness 
to the fact that personality is radically powerless to 
constitute any real and lasting harmony, even in 
the case of a being quite cut off from society. 

The monstrous unity so formed would require 
not merely the absence of every impulse of a sym- 
pathetic character, but also the preponderance of 
one single selfish instinct. Kow this is only found 
in the lowest animals. With them the instinct of 
nutrition absorbs everything, especially when there 
is no distinction of sex. But except in them, and 
most particularly in man, this primary want once 
supplied, there is scope left for the prevalence in 
succession of several personal instincts. These are 
nearly equal in point of energy, and so would 
mutually neutralize the conflicting claims of each 
to the entire command of our existence as moral 
lyings. Unless they were all brought into subor- 
dination to affections resting on some outward 
object, the heart would be for ever agitated by 
internal conflicts between the impulses of the 
senses and the stimulus of pride or of vanity, sup- 
posing that avarice, strictly so called, should cease 
to reign, together with the purely bodily wants. 
Moral unity, then, is impossible, even in a solitary 
existence, in the case of any being absolutely under 
the dominion of personal affections, which prevent 
his living for others. We find instances in several 



54 INTRODUCTIOK. 

of the wild animals. They are seen, putting aside 
some temporary congregation, to oscillate generally 
between a disorderly activity and an ignoble 
torpor, the result of their not finding outside of 
themselves the principal motives for their conduct^ 

The Woman, — I understand dqw, my father, the 
natural coincidence that exists between the condi- 
tions on which the individual, and those on which 
the harmony of society, depends. Still, however, I 
find the same difficulty exists — that of conceivii^ 
that the strongest instincts can be habitually set 
aside. 

Ths Priest, — The difficulty, my daughter, is one 
which will easily disappear. Only remark that 
unity in the altruistic sense does not, as the egoistic 
unity does, require the entire sacrifice to itself of the 
inclinations which are contrary to it in principle. 
All it asks is, that they shall be wisely subordinate 
to the predominant affection. When it condenses 
the whole of sound morality in its law of Livejfbr 
others, Positivism allows and consecrates the con- 
stant satisfaction of our several personal instincts. 
It considers such satisfaction indispensable to our 
natural existence, which is and always must be the 
foundation for all our higher attributes. Allowing 
this, it blames, however estimable the motives that 
lead to them often may be, any austerities which, 
by lessening our strength, make us less fit to serve 
others. It recommends attention to ourselves in 
the interest of society, and so at once raises and 
regulates such attention. We avoid equally the 



iNTRODucrnoiF. 5i!f 

two extremes of excessive care aad culpable neg- 
ligenca 

Tho Woman. — ^But, mj &.ther, as the egointk 
indinations^ in theioselves stronger, are^ further, 
Goxxstantly excited by our bodily wantSy it seema to 
me that, even thus limited, the sanction of them is 
incompatible with the habitual superiority of our 
-weak sympathetic impulses. 

The FriesL — ^Yes, and therefore it is, my daugh- 
ter, that our moral improvement will always form 
the principal object on which man must exert his 
art. Our constant efforts, both as individuals and 
societies, though they bring us nearer to it, never 
enable us to realize it completely. The solution of 
your difficulty is a progressive one. Its possibility 
rests entirely on the social existence of man, in 
accordance with the natural law which develops or 
restrains our functions and our organs in propor- 
tion to their exercise or disuse. As a &ot, our 
domestic and civic relations have a tendency to 
keep within due bounds our personal instincts, as 
the result of the struggles between individuals to 
which these instincts give rise. On the other hand, 
these same relations favour the growth of our 
feelings of benevolence, the only ones that admit of 
a simultaneous development in alL And this 
development is, by its nature, continuous, as the 
mutual stimulus is continuous, although it finds 
necessarily a limit in the aggregate of the material 
oomditions of our existence. 

Tou have here the reason why a real moral 



56 INTBODITOnOK. 

unity could only come into existence in the case of 
man. For social progress must be the exclusive 
possession of the best organized of the races capable 
of society, except so £Eur as others may join it as 
free auxiliaries. Still, though such a harmony 
cannot be developed elsewhere, it is easy to trace 
its beginning in many of the higher animals. From 
them were in &ct drawn the first scientific proofs 
of the natural existence of disinterested affection. 
This great conception, of which, even previous to 
all scientific proo^ all had a presentiment, was long 
in being placed on a systematic ground j otherwise 
no one would, at the present day, impute the cha- 
racter of sentimental affectation to a doctrine which 
may b§ directly verified in so many of the inferior . 
species. 

The Woman, — ^Your explanation meets my difli- 
culties. I have only, my father, to ask you to 
clear up one last point of a general character — I 
mean, the intellectual conditions of religion. I see 
the incoherence of the various special forms of belief; 
but I do not see, beyond that incoherence, what is 
the essential province of &ith. And yet it must 
be possible to say what faith is, independently of 
all systems, and in a sense applicable to them all. 

The Priest. — Practically, my daughter, the faith 
of man never had but one object, if you press to the 
root of the matter. This was, to form a conception 
of the order under which man lives, ^th the view 
of determining our relation generally to that order. ^ 
Man might ascribe that order to fictitious causes. 



nrrBODucTXON. 



57 



or he might study its real laws ; in either case, his 
object was to estimate that order which was inde- 
pendent of him, with the view of submitting to it 
better, and of attaining a greater power of modify- 
ing it. Every system of religious doctrines neces- 
.sarily rests on some explanation, no matter what, 
of the world and of man — ^the twofold object at 
fkU times of our thoughts, whether directed to specu* 
jation or to action. 

'^ Faith, in 'the-3Positive sense, has for its proper 
office the setting forth of the real laws of the dif- 
ferent phenomena that are open to observation, 
iRrhether internal or external. By the laws of phe- 
nomena I mean, their unvarying relations of suc- 
cession and resemblance, by which we are able to 
foresee some by virtue of our knowledge of others. 
Such faith puts aside, as absolutely beyond our reach 
and essentially conducive to no useful result, every 
inquiry into the causes^ properly so called, either 
first causes or final, of any events whatever. In its 
theoretical conceptions, it never explains why a thing 
is j it limits itself to the question, how it is. But 
when it is pointing out the means of guiding our 
activity, it takes the contrary course, and puts for- 
ward in constant prominence the end to be attained, 
as in such cases the practical effect is certainly the 
result of an intelligent will. 

Yet though, in its direct results, vain, the search 

*afber cause% was, at the outset, indispensable and 

inevitable, as a substitute and preparation for the 

knowledge of laws, a knowledge which pre-supposes 



6S nvTBODuonoK. 

la long previous introdnction. This I vnil explain 

'more in detail. Men sought the why, Shnd conld 
not find it ; in the search they discoyered the hoWy 
though they had not bent their studies immediately 
in that direction. We need not blame them for 
this^ but we may blame the childishness of persist* 
ing, as our literary men so commonly do, in the 

\ attempt to penetrate to causes when the laws are 
known. These last alone have any influence on 

\ conduct, so that the search after the others becomes 

las useless as it is chimerical. 

' The Universal religion, then, adopts, as its funda^ 
mental dogma, the fact of the existence of an 
order, which admits of no variation, and to which 
all events of every kind are subject. This order 
is at once objec^e and autjectwe ; in other words, 
it concerns equally the object contemplated and the 
subject which contemplates. Physical laws, in fiict, 
imply logical laws, and vice versd. If our under- 
standing did not of itself obey any rule, it would 
never be able to appreciate the external harmony. 
And as the world is simpler and more powerful than 
man, the regular action of man would be still less 
compatible with the absence of order in the world. 
All Positive belief, then, rests on this twofold har- 
mony between the object and the subject. 

That there is such an order can be shown as a 
fact, but it cannot be explained. So far from it, it 
supplies the only possible source of »ny rational* 
explanation. Such explanation consists in bringing 
under general laws each particular event, whidi 



DrtPEODUCTIOK. 59 

-bhus comes within the sphere of prevision based on 
eiystematic principles, the really distinctive end that 
all true science proposes to itself. And therefoi-e 
the Universal order was not recognised so long as 
the idea prevailed of an arbitrary will, to which 
men naturally at first attributed all the most im- 
portant phenomena. It was recogfiised at last in 
xeference to the simplest events, iii defiance of the 
contrary opinions^ on the evidence of experience 
constantly recurring and never belied. From the 
simpler, its recognition gradually extended to the 
\nore complex events. Not till our own time was 
its recognition complete, for it embraces now its last 
domain ; it represents as subject to invariable laws 
the highest phenomena — Oman's intelligence and his 
sodal existence — a point still denied by many culti- 
vated minds. This final discovery led to Positivism 
as its natural immediate result. It was the com- 
pletion of our long scientific initiation. As such it ne- 
cessarily closed the preliminary era of human reason. 
The Woman. — This first general view, myfiiAker, 
leaves me with the impression that the Positive 
faith is very satisfactory for the intellect, but 
scarcely favourable enough to the action of man. 
It seems to place this last under the control of ati 
inflexible destiny; and yet you often say that the 
Positive spirit had its origin, in aU cases, in the 
practical part of man's life, so that it can hardly be 
^n contradiction with that part. I would gladly 
have a clear conception how the two are brought 
into general agreement. ^ 



60 INTBODUCTION. 

' The Priest, — To get this conception, my daughter, 
all you have to do is to rectify your judgment so 
fiur ad it led you to look on actual laws as not 
susceptible of modificatijjn. Whilst phenomena 
were attributed to the arbitrary will of some being, 
an absolute fate was a conception necessary as the 
correction of an hypothesis, the direct consequence 
of which was the non-existence of any real order. 
Later^ the discovery of natural laws had the same 
general tendency; for the laws first difiicovered 
were those which regulated the events of astro- 
nomical science — events entirely out of the reach 
of man's interference. But as the knowledge of 
the order of things gradually extended, men came to 
regard that order as essentially admitting modifica- 
tions, even by the agency of man. It becomes 
more susceptible of modification as the phenomena 
become more complicated, as I will explain to 
you shortly. At the present day, we do not 
consider even the order of the heavenly bodies 
exempt from the idea of modification. Its superior 
simplicity allows us more easily to conceive improve- 
ments in it The object of such conception would 
be to correct the spirit of blind respect; though our 
weakness in regard to physical means may for ever 
debar us from realizing the improvements we con- 
ceive. 

All events equally, even the most complex, de- 
pend on some fundamental conditions which admiif 
of no change. But in all cases, even the most 
simple, it is also true that the secondary arrange- 



INTRODUCTION. 61 

ments may be modified, and" very generally they 
may be so by our intervention. The modifications 
introduced in no way impair the validity of the 
general principle, that th^ laws of nature are inva- 
riabla For the modifications never can be arbitrary. 
In their nature and degree they must obey appro- 
priate rules which ' are the complement of the do- 
main of science. An entire immutability would be 
so contrary to the very idea of law, that this idea 
in all cases expresses constancy perceived in the 
midst of variety. 

We find, then, that the order of nature always 
answers to the idea of a necessity admitting modifi- 
cations, and as such becomes the indispensable basis 
of the order which man introduces. Our life is 
really destined to be a compound of resignation 
and actioiL The two are not incompatible; far 
from it. Action rests directly on the foundation of 
resignation. A sound judgment leads us to submit 
to the fundamental laws which concern us, as the 
only means of preventing all our purposes, of what- 
ever nature, from becoming vague and uncertain; 
the only means therefor^ of enabling us to practise 
a wise interference in accordance with the secon- 
dary rules. You thus see how the dogmatic sjrstem 
of Positivism dii'ectly sanctions our action, whereas 
no theological synthesis could comprehend it. We 
even find that in Positivism, the free development 
of our activity is the chief regulator of our scientific 
^labours in regard to the order of the world, and the 
different modifications it admits. 



62 INTBOlWOTIOir. 

The Woman. — After this explanation, I have 
yet, my father^ to learn how Positive faith and our 
feelings can be brought into full harmony. They 
seem to me by nature diametrically o^^osed to 
one another. I can understand, however, that the 
fundamental dogma of that faith supplies us with a 
strong basis for moral discipline, in two ways : first, 
by bringing our personal inclinations under the con- ^ 
trd of an external power j secondly, by awakening' 
our instincts of sympathy to make us more wisely 
submit to or modify the necessity which presses on 
us all in common. These are valuable attributes. 
But still Positivism does not seem to offer enough 
of direct stimiilus to the holy affections, which seem 
properly to constitute the most important province 
of religion. 

The Priest. — I am free to confess, my daughter, 
that hitherto the Positive spirit has been tainted 
with the two moral evils which peculiarly wait on 
knowledge. It pu£& up and it dries the heart, by 
giving free scoj)e to pride and by turning it from 
love. These two tendencies will always be suffi- 
ciently strong in it to makp it necessary habitually 
to adopt systematic precautions. Of them I will 
speak later^ Still in the main, on this point, your 
reproaches are the result of an inadequate judgment 
of Positivism, the consequence of your looking at 
it solely as it exists in a state of incompleteness in 
the greater number of its adherents. They limit 
themselves to the philosophical conception which in 
the of&pring of the scientific preparation; the} 



urTfioi>0Czioii. 63 

will not go on to the religious GODoln&don in which , 
alcme Positive Philosophy, as a vhole, finds its ade* I 
quate expression. If we do not stop short at this ^ 
point, but complete the study of the real order oi 
nature, then we see the Positive system of dogmas 
finally group itself aroxind a synthetic conception, 
as faTourable to the heart as it is to the intelleot. 
. The imaginary beings, whom religion provision- 
ally introduced for its purposes, were able to inspire 
lively affections in man; affections which were even 
most powerM imder the least elaborate of the 
fictitious systems. The immense scientific prepara- 
tion required as an introduction to Positivism, for 
a long tinie seemed to deprive it of any such valu- 
'ahle aptitude. Whilst the philosophical initiation 
only comprehended the order of the material world, 
nay, even when it had extended to the order of 
living beings, it could only reveal laws which were 
indispensable for our action, it could not furnish 
us with any direct object for an enduring and con- 
stant affection. This is no longer the case since 
the completion of our gradual preparation by the 
introduction of the special study of the order of 
man^s existence, whether as an individual or as a 
society. 

This is the last step in the process. "We are now 
abke to condense the whole of our Positive concep- 
ticins in the one single idea of an immense and 
emal Being, Humanity, destined by sociological 
la^s to constant development under the prepon- 
ating influence of biological and cosmologioal 



/ 

64 INTRODUCTION. 

necessities. This, the real Great Being, on whom 
all, whether individuals or societies, depend as the 
prime mover of their existence, becomes the centre 
of onr affections. They rest in it by as spon- 
taneous an impulse as do our thoughts and om 
actions. This Being, by its very idea, suggests a^ 
once the sacred formula of Positivism : — L<yoe cu out 
principle; Order as our bads; amd Progress as <m< 
end. Its compoimd existence is ever founded oii 
the free concurrence of independent wills. All dis- 
cord tends to dissolve that existence, which, by it 
very notion, sanctions the constant predominance ( 
the heart over the intellect as the sole basis of ou 
true unity. So the whole order of things hence 
forth finds its expression in the being who studic 
it and is ever perfecting it. The struggle of Hi. 
manity against the combined influences of tl'^ 
necessities it is obliged to obey, growing as it doe^ 
in energy and success, oflers the heart no less tha 
the intellect a better object of contemplation the 
the capricious omnipotence of its theological pre 
cursor, capricious by the very force of the ter-^ 
omnipotence. Such a Supreme Being is more withr. 
the reach of our feelings as weU as of our conceptioiis 
for it is identical in nature with its servants, at tjiJ 
same time that it is superior to them. As suchjj / 
more powerfully excites them to an activity, the all': 
of which is its preservation and amelioration. 

Tlie Woincm, — Still, my father, the physii 
labour necessitated by our bodily wants seems I 
me directly in opposition with this tendency 



ii 
ii. 



INTRODUCTION. 65 

affection whicli you claim for Positive religion. 
Surely sucli activity can never be free from a cha- 
racter of egoism, extending even to the scientifio 
efforts it induces us to make. Now this alone 
would be enough to prevent the actual predomi- 
nance of love as an all-pervading influence. 

The FriesL — I cherish the hope, my daughter, 
that I shall shortly get you to allow that it is pos- 
sible to effect a thorough transformation of the 
spirit of selfishness originally inherent in human 
labour. As man's action on matter becomes more 
and more collective, it tends more and more to 
assume an altruistic character, though the impulse 
of egoism must ever be indispensable to set it in 
motion. For as each habitually labours for others, 
he developes by such a conduct of his life the sym- 
pathies of others, granting that such conduct meets 
with sufficient appreciation. The toilsome servants 
of Humanity stand in need of nothing but a com- 
plete and fEtmiliar consciousness of the true nature 
of their life. This consciousness is destined to be 
the natural result of an adequate extension of Posi- 
tive education. You would even now see that this 
is the tendency of pacific activity, were the industrial 
life, which is at present subject to no systematic 
discipline, organized as the soldier's life is, the only 
organization as yet in existence. But the 'great 
moral results obtained formerly in the case of the 
soldier, and of which there are still traces even in 
his present degraded state, are a sufficient indica- 
tion of what the industrial life will produce. The 
p 



66 DTTBODUCnOK. 

instinot of construction may even be expected to 
react in the direction of sympathy with greater 
directness and completeness than the instinct of 
destruction. 

The Woman. — This last part of your explanations, 
my &.ther, makes me feel that I begin to master 
the general harmony of Positivism. I see how ia 
it the activity of man, by its nature subordinate to 
faith, can also be made subordinate to love, though, 
at first sight it seemed to reject its sway. And 
seeing this, I seem at length to see that your doc- 
trine fulfils all the essential conditions of Religion^ 
according to your definition of the term. It is 
adapted equally to the three great divisions of our 
existence — loving, thinking, acting — ^which were 
never before so perfectly combined. 

The Priest. — The more you study the Positire 
synthesis, the more you will feel, my daughter, how 
by virtue of its reality it is more complete and 
efficacious than any other. The habitual predomi- 
nance of altruism over egoism, to secure which is 
the great problem for man, is in Positivism the 
direct result of the constant harmony between our 
best inclinations and all our labours, theoretical 
as well as practical. The life of action, represented 
by Catholicism as hostile to our inward progress to 
perfection, becomes in Positivism its most powerful 
guarantee. You now find no difficulty in conceiv- 
ing this striking contrast between two systems, the 
one of which admits, whilst the other denies, the 
existence in our nature of disinterested afiection. 



INTRODUCTION. 67 

The bodily wants, which seemed destined to be a 
perpetual cause of separation, may for the future 
lead us to a closer union than if we were exempt 
from them. For action developes love better than 
wishes; and besides, what wishes could you form 
for those who wanted nothing ? It is easy also to 
see that the ideal yet real existence peculiar to 
Positivists necessarily surpasses, even in regard to 
the feelings, the chimerical life promised to the 
disciples of theological systems. 

The Woman. — This our introductory conversa- 
tion needs one thing to complete it. I should be 
glad, my father, if you would shortly explain your 
general division of Religion. Each essential con- 
stituent will remain for future exposition. 

The Priest, — Such a division, my daughter, re- 
qtiires as its previous condition a just appreciation of 
the whole of the existence which religion must 
direct. The body of doctrine, the worship, and the 
system of life, respectively concern our thoughts, 
feelings, and our actions. The initiation in our 
religion must begin by an elaboration of its theory, 
so iax as to make clear our conception of Humanity. 
We then proceed to the worship, or, in other words, 
to the system by which we cultivate the feelings 
adapted to the mode of existence prescribed us. 
After this, we resume our elaboration of the doctrine 
of Positivism, and explain the order on which it 
rests. Lastly, we proceed to the direct regulation of 
all human conduct. So you see how Positive reli- 
gion embraces at once the three great continuous 
f2 



68 INTRODUCTION. 

constructionB of man, Poetry, Philosophy, Politics. 
But everything, in that religion, is subordinate to 
morals, be it the free play of our feelings, the deve- 
lopment of our knowledge, or the course of our 
actions ; so that morality is our constant guide in 
our threefold research after the beautiful, the true, 
the good. 



CONVERSATION II. 
HUMANITY. 

The Woman, — Our first conversation, my father, 
has left a sense of alarm, so deeply do I feel my 
incompetence in presence of the " great argument" 
which you are going to set forth. The system of 
doctrine in Positive religion is one and the same 
thing as Positive Philosophy. Either from weakness 
or want of preparation, my mind seems unable to 
grasp the explanation of it, however simple you may 
make it. I bring with me nothing beyond a full 
confidence, a sincere respect, and an active sympathy 
for the doctrine which seems calculated, after so 
many failures, to overcome the prevailing anarchy. 
But I cannot but feel afraid lest something more 
than these moral dispositions is needed for me to 
enter with any chance of success on so difficult a 
study. 

The Priest — Your uneasiness, my daughter, leads 
to some introductoiy remarks which I hope will 
soon reassure you. All we have to do, in the case 



INTRODUCTION. 69 

of the new religion, is to give a general exposition 
which shall be the equivalent of that which formerly 
taught you Catholicism. This second operation 
ought to be even easier than the former, for your 
reason is now mature, and the doctrine that is pre- 
sented to it is, by its nature, demonstrable, and 
therefore more easily understood. I would have 
you also call to mind the admirable maxim which 
our great Moli^re puts into the mouth of the man 
of taste in his last masterpiece — 

Je oonsens qu'une femme ait des claries de tout;* 

and remark further, that what was then "I consent," 
would be now, " It is right.'* 

In strict truth, the priesthood and the public had 
always one and the same intellectual domain. The 
difference lay in the difference of cultivation, which 
was systematic in the case of the priesthood, left to 
its natural course in the public. Without such an 
essential agreement, no religious harmony would be 
conceivable. In Positivism it becomes at once more 
direct and more complete than it could ever be 
under any theological system. The true philo- 
sophical spirit has, in reality, equally witb simple 
good sense, to know what is, in order to foresee 
what shall be, with a view of bettering it where 
possible. One of our best Positive precepts even 
teaches that every attempt to systematize is fiiulty, 
or at any rate premature, if not preceded and pre- 



* Femmes Sceoantes, act I. bc. iii. 



70 UTTBODUCnON. 

pared by a sufficient progress attained by a man's 
own efforts. This rule is an immediate consequence 
of the dogmatical verse by which PositiyisixL cha- 
racterizes our existence as a whqle — 

To act from affection, and to think in order to act. 

The first half answers to the natural and spontaneous 
development; the second, to the systematic one 
which follows upon it. Action, unguided by 
reflection, may occasion many inconveniences j but 
nothing else can, as a general rule, supply the raw 
material for effectual meditation, on which the 
improvement of our action will depend. 

Lastly, take into account this &ot, that the intel- 
lect cannot, in any case, abstain from forming some 
opinion or other as to the general order of things^ 
whether in the outer world or in the world of man. 
You are now aware that at all times this has been 
the object of every dogmatic system of religion ; 
and that it is now the object of such system, only 
with this difference, that the knowledge of laws is 
henceforth to take the place of the search after 
causes. And surely illusory hypotheses as to causes 
could never seem to you equally intelligible with 
real notions upon laws. 

My exposition is mainly meant for women and 
proletaries. They cannot and they ought not to 
become teachers, neither do they wish it. But 
all should master to a certain extent the spirit 
and the method of the Universal doctrine, other- 
wise they cannot enforce on their spiritual chiefs 



nnnoDTToriON, 71 

an adequate scientific and logical preparation, tb^e 
necessaiy foundation for the systematic exercise of 
the pdestly office. Now as this discipline of the 
intellect is at the present day entirely contrary to 
the habits resulting from our modem anarchy, it 
never could prevail, unless enforced by the general 
body of both sexes, on those who claim to be their 
guides in matters of opinion* And as the discipline 
depends on this condition socially, there will always 
attadi a great value to the general spread of reli- 
gious instruction, over and above its proper object 
of guiding the conduct of men, whether as individuals 
or as societies. But the service rendered by reli- 
gious instruction, at all times important) is at the 
present day of capital importance. For we must 
look to it to bring to a decided close the anarchy of 
the Western world, the prominent characteristic of 
which is the revolt of the intellect against all legi- 
timate control. Oould this Catechism but product 
in women and proletaries the conviction, that those 
who daim to be their spiritual guides are radically 
incompetent to deal with the high questions, the 
solution of which is in Mind confidence left them, 
it would largely help to calm the West. The 
conviction on this point should be unanimous. To 
produce it we must depend on a sufficient appre- 
ciation of the system of Positivism, the last of 
the series of religious systems. That appreciation 
must place beyond all liability to dispute the 
general conditions of its systematic cultivation. 
As for the difficulties which now frighten you in 



72 INTEODUCnOK. 

this indispensable study, you attach too little weight 
for overcoming them to your excellent moral dis- 
position. No existing school would hesitate to pro- 
nounce, ex cathedrd, that the intellect thinks in 
complete independence of the heart. But women 
and proletaries have never lost sight of the powerful 
reaction of the feelings on the intellect — a reaction 
explained at last by Positive Philosophy. Yout 
sex in particular, which, in the unconscious exercise 
of its gentle of&ce, has handed down to us, as for as 
was possible in the midst of our modem anarchy, 
the admirable feelings of the Middle Ages, offers 
daily proof of the error of that metaphysical heresy 
which separates these two great attributes. The 
beautiful maxim of Vauvenargues is right; the 
heart is necessary to the intellect for all its most 
important inspirations. If so, it must also be of 
use in appreciating their results. Its powerful 
assistance is peculiarly needed in the case of moral 
and social conceptions; for in them more than 
elsewhere the sympathetic instinct can furnish large 
aid to the spirit of synthesis. Without that aid its 
greatest efforts could not overcome the inherent 
difficulties of such questions. But the heart may 
also lend its aid in the case of the less important 
theories, by virtue of the necessary connexion that 
exists between all the speculations of man so &r as 
they deal with realities. 

There are two fundamental conditions of religion 
— ^loye and faith. Of these two, it is the first that 
takes precedence. Faith may be well adapted, to 



INTEODUCTION. 73 

strengthen love ; but the inverse action, that of love 
on faith, is stronger and more direct Not only does 
feeling direct our thoughts when left to their spon- 
taneous action in the stage preparatory to any 
systematic development, but it sanctions and pro- 
motes this development, when it has once felt its 
importance. No woman with any experience but 
is aware that too frequently our best affections offer 
but a weak security, when not aided by firm con- 
victions. The word " convince" if we look to its 
etymology, would remind us of the aptitude of 
deep-seated belief to strengthen our internal union 
by connecting it with the world without 

Lastly, your fear lest your intellect should be too 
weak for the subject, rests on the^^eneral confusion 
of instruction with intelligence. You are familiar 
with and you admire the unrivalled Moli^re ; yet 
this has not freed you from the vulgar error on this 
point — an error carefuUy kept up by our Trissotins 
of all professions. And yet we ought to blush at 
being in the present time behind the Middle Ages. 
Then, everybody saw clearly the profound intel- 
lectual eminence of persons who were quite un- 
lettered. Have you not sometimes found in such 
people much more real capacity than in most of 
our professors ? Now more than ever instruction 
is only really necessary to construct and develop 
science. Science must always be so arranged, as a 
whole, that it may become directly within the 
reach of all sound intellects, otherwise our best doc- 
trines would soon degenerate into dangerous mystifi- 



74 nrTBODUonov. 

cations. All tiieoricians are naturally indined to 
this deviation. The only effectual chedk on them is 
in a due surveillance on the part of the large 
majority of both sexes. 

The Womom, — I feel encoura^d by l^is intro- 
duction, my &>ther, and I would ask you now to 
enter on a systematic exposition of Positive doc- 
trine. Would you begin by explaining move directly 
and fully that one doctrine on which it all rests % I 
already understand that the Great Being, in yoar 
conception, is, by its very nature, the expression of 
the whole order of things — ^not merely of the order 
of man, but of the external world. As this is the 
case, I feel to want a clearer and more precise 
definition as regards this Being, the fundamental 
idea which gives unity to Positivism. 

The Priest, — As a first step, my daughter, you must 
define Humanity as the whole of human beings, past, 
present, and future. The word whole points out dearly 
that you must not take in all men, but those only who 
are really capable of assimilation, in virtue of a real 
co-operation on their part in furthering the common 
good. All are necessarily bom children of Hu- 
manity, but all do not become her servants. Many 
remain in the parasitic state, which, excusable 
during their education, becomes blameable when 
that education is complete. Times of anarchy 
bring forth in swarms such creatures — nay, even 
enable them to flourish — ^though they are, in sad 
truth, but burdens on the true Great Being. Often 
have you been reminded by them of the ener- 



DPEBODUOWON. 75 

g^iic reprobation of Anoeto, borrowed from 
IjSorace — 

I Venuto al mundo sol per far letame : 

J "Bom upon the earth merely to manure it ;" 

land, still better, of the admimble condenmation of 

I Dante— 

Ohe visser senza infamia e senza lodo 
• « « « 

Cacciarli i ciel per non esser men belli, 

Nd lo profondo inferno li riceve, 

Ch'alcuna gloria i rei avrebber d'elli, 
« « • ♦ 

Non ragioniam di lor, ma guarda e passa. 

InfemOy iii. 36 — 51. 

"WhoUyed 

Without or praise or blame 

Heaven drove them forth 

Not to impair his lustre ; nor the depth 

Of Hell receives t^em, lest the accursed tribe 

Should glory thence with exultation vain. 

« « « • 

Speak not of them, but look and pass them by." 

Cabt's Translation. 

So 70a see that in this respect, as in all others, the 
imipiration of the poet was iax in advance of the 
systematic Tiew of the philosopher. Be this as it 
•may, these mere digesting machines are no real 
part of Humanity. Tou may reject them, and to 
make up for the loss associate with the new 
Supreme Being all the animals who lend a noble 
aid. Wherever we find habitual co-operation in 
forwarding the destinies of man, and that co-ope- 



76 U9TBODUCnON. 

ration given voluntarily, there the being which 
gives it becomes a real element of this compound 
existence ; and the degree of importance it attains 
is proportioned to the dignity of the species to 
which it belongs, and to its own individual value. 
To form a right estimate of this indispensable com- 
plement of human existence, let us imagine our- 
selves without it. We should then be led without 
hesitation to look on many horses, dogs, oxen, 
<kc., as more estimable than certain men. 

Such is our primary conception of the combined 
system of human action. In it naturally our 
attention is directed on solidarity, rather than on 
continuity. This last idea must, however, in the 
end be the predominant one, though at first it 
attracts less notice, as it requires a deeper exami- 
nation to discover it ; for in a very short time the 
progress of society comes to depend more on the 
idea of time than on that of space. It is not a 
feeling confined to the present day, by which each 
man, as he exerts himself to estimate aright the 
amount of his obligations to others, acknowledges 
that his predecessors as a whole, in comparison 
with his contemporaries as a whole, have much the 
larger share in these obligations. We find the 
same superiority clearly allowed, though in a less 
degree, in the most remote periods. We see an 
indication of its recognition in the touching wor- 
ship at all times paid to the dead, as was beautifully 
remarked by Vico. 

We find, then, that the social -existence of man 



INTRODUCTION. 77 

really consists much more in the continuous suc- 
cession of generations than in the solidarity of the 
existing generation. The living are always, by the 
necessity of the case — ^and the more so the more we 
advance in time — under the government of the 
dead. Such is the fundamental law of human 
order. 

To enable us to grasp it more fully, let us dis- 
tinguish the two forms of existence which are the 
portion of each true servant of Humanity. The 
one is but for a time, but it is conscious. This 
constitutes the life of man, properly so called. The 
other, with no direct consciousness on the part of 
man, is yet permanent, and does not begin till 
after death. The first involves the presence of the 
body, and may be termed objective, to mark more 
clearly its contrast with the^secoiodT That second 
leaves each one to exist only in the heart and in- 
tellect of others, and deserves the name of stdh 
je<^e. This is the noble immortality, necessarily 
disconnected with the body, which Positivism allows 
the human soul. It preserves this valuable term — 
soul — ^to stand for the whole of our intellectual and 
moral functions, without involving any allusion to 
some supposed entity answering to the name. 

Following out this high conception, the human 
race, in the true sense of the term, is composed of 
two bodiesj both of which are essential. Their 
proportion is constantly varying ; and the tendency 
of this variation is to secure a greater influence for 
the dead over the living in every actual operation! 



78 nrraoDTrcTioK. 

The action and its result are most dependent on the 
objective element ; the impulse and the regulating 
power are principally due to the subjective. We 
have received large endowments from the liberality 
of our predecessors; we hand on gratuitously to 
our successors the whole domain in which man 
lives and moves; and the addition made in each 
successive generation becomes smaller and smaller 
in proportion to the amount received. Our exer- 
tions are necessarily gratuitous. They meet with 
an adequate reward in our subjective incorporation, 
by which we are enabled to perpetuate our services 
under an altered form. 

A theory such as this seems at the present day to 
be the last effort of the human intellect under 
systematic guidance. And yet we can trace the 
germ of it, anterior to all such guidance, in the 
most remote periods of our race's progress, and can 
see that it was felt even then by the most ancient 
poets. The smallest tribe, nay, even every &imily 
of any considerable size, soon comes to look on 
itself as the essential stock of Humanity. It con- 
siders itself the original source of that composite 
and progressive existence, the only limits to which, 
in time or in space, are the limits of its normal 
state, as fixed by the constitution of the planet it 
occupies. The Great Being is not yet fully formed ; 
yet no jar of its component parts was ever able to 
keep out of sight its gi'adual progress towards 
formation. This, its evolution, rightly judged and 
rationalljr directed, is now the only possible basis of 



DTTRODUCTION. 79 

unity, which is our final object. Even during the , 
prevalence of the egoistic doctrine of Christianity 
— fi^m which the stem St. Peter drew the charac- » ^ 
teristic maxim of the system, "Aa strcmgers and pUr- 
grims'' — we see the admirable St. Paul even then 
led by his feeling to anticipate the conception of 
Humanity, in the figurative expression which 
touches us, whilst we see the contradiction it in- 
volves, " We are even/ one members one of amoth&r^'* 
Tke central principle of Positivism could alone dis- 
close the one stem to which, by the law of their 
being, these members belong. In the absence of 
such a conception, they seemed to have a confused 
existence. 

The Woman. — I feel compelled, my father, to 
admit this fundament^il cpnception, though it is by 
no means as yet cleai* of difficulty ; but when I 
look on such an existence, the sense of my own 
nothinguess alarms me. Before its immensity, I 
seem to be reduced to nothing, more completely 
than I was before the majesty of a God with whom, 
feeble as I am, I felt myself in some definite and 
direct relation. Now that you have completelyc^. 
mastered me by the ever-growing preponderj^pcfr'gt \ 
the new Supreme Being, I feel the need of ftk^v^itii^ 4^ 
awakening in me a just consciousness of my^^ii •: 
vidnal existence. ^'" 

The Pm«<.^— The desired result will follow, my 
daughter, from a more complete appreciation of the 
dogmatic system of Positivism. Humanity, as a 
whole, must ever constitute the principal i^tor of * 



80 INTBODUCTIOK. 

4 every operation we undertake, be it phTsical, in- 
tellectual, or moral. At the same time, we must 
^ never forget — and this is sufficient to meet your 
wishes — that the Great Being cannot act except 
through individual agents. This is the reason why 
the objective part of the race, though brought more 
^d more into subordination to the subjective, must 
always be indispensable to the subjective for it to 
exert any influence. The objective element col- 
lectively shares in this agency. Analyse this col- 
lective action, and we arrive at the fact that it is 
the result of the free concurrence of the efforts of 
simple individuals. Each of these individuals, if 
worthy of his position, can assert himself in pre- 
sence of the new Supreme Being more than he 
could before its predecessor. In fact, God had no 
real need of any service on our part, except to give 
him vain praises, the childish eagerness for which 
tended to degrade him in our eyes. Remember the 
verse of the Imitation, in which this is put out of 
doubt : — 

I am necessary to thee, thou art useless to me. 

*ft OS doubtless true that but few of us are war- 
^cantedr in thinking ourselves indispensable to Hu- 
manity. Such language is only applicable to those 
to whom are really due the principal steps in our 
progress. Still, every noble human b^ing may, and 
should habitually, feel that his personal assistance 
in this immense work of the evolution of the race 
is of use ; for that work would be ended at once if 



INTBODUCTION. 81 

all its individual oo-operators were at any one** 
time to disappear. The development, and of 
course also the preservation, of the Great Being* 
must then depend, in any case, on the free services 
of its different children, though the inactivity of 
any one in particular is, generally speaking, not an 
irreparable eviL 



iixsi |art. 



EXPLANATION OF THE WOESHIP. 



OONVEBSATION IH. 
THE WORSHIP AS A WHOLE. 

The Womcm. — In our second introductory con- 
versation, you have cleared up, my &ther, the diffi- 
culties I originally felt as to the conception of 
Humanity, the centre of the whole Positive system. 
You have, in fact, revealed to me the goddess 
whom I am, as a Positivist, to serve. You must 
now teach me to love her more, that I may serve 
her better. It is my hope that, in the end, I shaJl 
be found worthy to be incorporated into her. Thus 
accepting my position as a Positivist, even prior to 
any more detailed explanations of the doctrine, I 
naturally change my attitude, and our conferences 
assume more completely the character of real con- 
versations. I shall not in this part lay before you 
doubts on important points, requiring long explana- 
tions. I shall only interrupt you to clear up or set 
forth more fully points on which you do not suffi- 
ciently dwell. I even hope, in the case of the wor- 
ship, to take an active part, and assist you by an- 



THE WORSHIP. 83 

ticipating some of your explanations, so as to make 
your exposition more rapid, without detracting 
from its completeness. We are now entering on 
the domain of feeling, and in this domain the in- 
spiration of woman, though it keep its empirical 
character, can really aid the priesthood in its con- 
struction. 

The Priest — I look with great hope, my daughter, 
to this spontaneous co-operation, as likely to shorten 
this part of our CatechisuL But, in order to make 
as much use as possible of your present disposition, 
this new conversation, which concerns merely the 
worship in general, must begin by a systematic 
account of the general plan of our religion, though 
you are already fiimiliar with it. 

Combinations must in all cases be binary. This 
is true of physical combinations; it is still more 
true of logical ones. This is pointed out clearly by 
the etymology of the word. This rule is applicable, 
necessarily, to any division whatever. In our funda- 
mental division of religion we obey the rule instinc- 
tively, by partitioning out the domain of religion 
between the two, love and faith. In every case 
where the evolution of the individual or of the 
society follows its normal course, love comes first and 
leads us to faith, so long as the growth is spon- 
taneous ; but when it becomes systematic, then the 
belief is constructed in order to regulate the action 
of love. At the point we have reached in our 
Catechism, you are in sufficient possession of the 
faith for me to proceed to strengthen and develop^ 
g2 



84 FIRST PART. 

the love which always inspired you. This capital 
division of religion is equivalent to the general 
division between theory and practice, if rightly 
viewed. As we have sufficiently for our purpose 
Btudied the theoretic domain of Positive religion, 
we may pass on to its practical domain. 

Now, this practical domain necessarily breaks up 
into two, as a consequence of the natural distinction 
between feeling and action. The theoretical part 
of religion meets the want of the intellect, the only 
possible basis of belief j but the practical part em- 
braces the whole remainder of our existence, quite 
as much our feelings as even our acts. Uniyersal 
custom, prior to all theory — and such custom is the 
best rule of language — gives a direct sanction to 
this view ; for it applies the name religious prac- 
ticea to our habits of worship, and applies it quite 
as much, if not more, to them, as to those habits 
which more particularly concern the regime. There 
is here an apparent confusion, but it rests on a 
basis of profound though empirical wisdom. For it 
was a wise instinct by which the mass of men, and 
still more of women, early leamt, as the priesthood 
had leamt, that to improve our feelings is a more 
important and difficult task than the immediate im- 
provement of our actions. As love in Positive 
religion never becomes mystic, Positive worship in 
its normal condition is part of the practical domain 
of true religion. We love more, in order to serve 
better. But, on the other hand, from the true reli- 
gious point of view, our acts always may have an 



THK WORSHIP. 85 

essentially altruistic character, since the main object 
of rdigion is to dispose us and to teach us to live 
for others. Our actions, then, are suggested by 
love, and, in their turn, they tend to develope love. 
In the caae of our intellectual improvement, when 
it is rightly guided, this capability of our action is 
directly evident. It holds good also in the case of 
our material progress, provided that such progress 
proceed on right principle& You see, therefore, 
how the regime, under its religious aspect, forms part 
of the domain of love as much as the worship does. 
These two principles, which make our worship 
practical, our regime affective, and yet never con- 
fuse the two, could not be discovered whilst religion 
remained in its theological stage, for then the worship 
and the regime were thoroughly heterogeneous. 
The one had God for its object ; the other, man. 
The worship stood higher than the regime, but it 
did Bo only because the second of the two beings 
was necessarily subordinate to the first. Both were 
essei^tially ^oistic in character, the result of the 
very constitution, thoroughly and entirely individual 
in its tendencies, of a faith which never could be 
reconciled with the existence in our nature of the 
instincts of benevolence — an existence allowed by no 
religion but the Positive. Under the older faith, 
the division between the rigime and the worship 
was as broad as that which separates the worship 
from the doctrine ; so that the general plan of reli- 
gion became tinintelligible, the result of our just 
dislike to ternary combinations. 



86 FIRST PART. 

In religion, in its ^nal stage, on the contituy, the 
divisions are as favourable to the reason as to the 
feelings. The doctrine differs from the worship 
and the regime much more than these last do from 
one another. So the primary division is binary, 
whilst the ordinary constitution is ternary. This 
is attained simply by adding one subdivision as a 
complement to the first primary division, whereas 
previously such subdivision was absurdly placed on 
a level with it. These three parts together ulti- 
mately form a regularly progressive series, by virtue 
of the natural homogeneity of its different elements. 
In this series we pass from love to faith, or from 
faith to love, according as we take the subjective or 
the objective course, respectively appropriate to 
the two most important ages of our religious initia- 
tion, the one of which is under the direction of 
woman, the other under that of the priest. But 
whichever of these two directions we take — and 
both are equally in use — the worship always holds 
the same place, as the result of the doctrine, or the 
source of the regime. This alone is sufficient to 
explain its capacity of standing, in daily life, as the 
representative of the whole of religion. 

The Woman, — My very natural eagerness to 
enter at once on the dii'ect study of our worship 
made me wish at the outset to leave out, my father, 
the general preamble you have just set before me. 
I now feel how nec^ssaiy it was in order to gain a 
clear conception of the plan of religion. I had not 
previously co-ordinated its three parts. This valuable 



THB WOBSHIP. 87 

explanation^ however^ seems to me now so far com- 
plete that I hope to study immediately the general 
system of the Worship due to our divinity. 

The Priest, — ^We adore her, not as his worshippers 
adored God, with vain compliments, my daughter^ 
but in order to serve her better by bettering our- 
selves. It is important to remember that this is 
the normal object of Positive worship; it is im- 
portant, in order to anticipate, or correct in it, the 
tendency to degenerate into mysticism. We are 
liable to this whenever we pay too exclusive atten- 
tion to the feelings, as we are then disposed to neg- 
lect, or even to forget, the acts which those feelings 
should control. I am naturally more prone than 
you to such an error, by my greater tendency to 
system. The evil results on your practice would soon 
become clear to you by your own native good sense; 
nay, you would even know how to remedy them by 
a fortunate inconsistency in your theory. It is of 
particular importance for me to avoid this mistake 
in the present conversation, for by its more abstract 
and more general character it renders me more 
liable to it, and the consequences would be more 
serious. You would bring me back at last, I doubt 
not, into the right path, by the suggestions of your 
experience ; but it would often be too late, so that 
I shotdd have sometimes to make laborious efforts 
to repair the consequences of my error. 

Keeping this precaution constantly in view, let 
us look on the whole worship as having for its object 
to form a systematic connexion between the doc- 



88 FIB8T PABT. 

trine and the regime, by idealizing both the one and 
the other. As the result of -the doctrine^ the wor- 
ship completes that doctrine, and ^presses it ificK* 
short form. It places before us, in a more familiar 
and more imposing point of view, the conception of 
Humanity, by means of an ideal representation of 
it. The worship also typifies the life, and so must 
have a direct tendency to ameliorate our feelings. 
For this, it must never lose sight of the modifications 
they habitually undergo in the three different con- 
ditions of human lif&— the personsd, domestic, and 
social At first sight, these two ways of forming a 
general conception of the worship and of instituting 
it may seem irreconcileable ; yet they are naturally 
in agreement, and such agreement is the result of 
th^e aptitude inherent in any worthy idealization of 
the Great Being to consolidate and develope the love 
which is the basis of its whole existence. If so, the 
original difference has in no way a tendency to 
break up the worship into two separate domains — 
one belonging exclusively to the intellect, the other 
to feeling. Such a division would be, as a genenii 
rule, as impracticable as the distinction generally 
drawn between algebra and arithmetic. They can 
really be separated only in veiy few cases, and these 
mostly of our own making; and yet the two 
methods, though constantly mixed, are never con- 
fused. This comparison gives a right idea of the 
d^eness of the connexion which naturally binds 
together the two aspects, intellectual and moral, or 
theoretical and practical, under which we are justi* 



Nr 



THE WORSHIP. 89 

fied in viewing either the whole system of Positive 
worship, or each of its'^parts. Still, in spite of the 
tim that such ^connexion is the spontaneous result 
of the religious system, which both are concerned 
with, to combine them wisely is really the chief 
difficulty to be met in instituting our worship. For 
this worship, quite as much, nay, even more than 
the doctrine, is liable to d^enerate into mysticism 
or mere empiricism, according as generalization and 
abstraction respectively are carried to excess or are 
deficient. Thesi^ two contrary tendencies to error 
produce, in the moral point of view, equal evils ; for 
the social efficiency of man's feelings is equally im* 
paired by their becoming too refined or too coarse. 

The* W&tncm. — ^To enable me better to estimate 
this general difficulty, I may, may I not, my &,ther, 
gtate it in another and less general form, as the 
difficulty of rightly instituting the subjective life. 
For it is on this subjective life that rests, of neces- 
sity, the whole system of Positive worship, whether 
we view it intellectually or morally. In the com- 
position of our Great Being the dead occupy the 
first place, then those who are yet to be bom. 
The two together are far more numerous than the 
living, most of whom too are only its servants, 
without the power at present of becoming its 
oi^ns. There are but few men, and still fewer 
women, who admit of being satisfiictorily judged in 
this respect before the completion of their objectivl 
career. During the greater part of his actual. life, 
each one has it in his power to balance, and even 



90 FIRST PART. 

far to outbalance, the good he has done hj the 
evil he may do. So the human population is 
made up in the main of two kindft of subjective 
elements; the one determinate, the other indefi- 
nite. These are brought into immediate and close 
connexion solely by the objective element of that 
population, the proportion of which to the others 
is constantly becoming indefinitely small. If so, I 
conceive that, in order to present to us the true 
Great Being, Positive worship must freely develope 
in each of us our subjective life. By so doing it will 
further become eminently poetic in character. At 
the same time, the exertion of our poetical powers, 
where thought works chiefly by the aid of imagery, 
has a natural fitness for the direct cultivation of 
our best feelings. 

It seems to me, then, quite possible to reconcile 
the intellectual condition with the moral object of 
this worship, on the principle which you have just 
given me ; but in the means you declare necessary 
to attain that object I seem to see a new general 
difficulty. For I find it difficult to conceive how it 
will be possible to institute, still more how it will 
be possible to secure in universal practice, the daily 
realization of the subjective life — its realization in 
the individual and in the society; and yet, to make 
it an universal practice is indispensable for our 
religion. I allow, of course, that in this respect, 
Ihe entire regeneration of education will procure 
us immense resources, to an extent difficult to esti- 
mate at the present time. Nevertheless, I fear that 



THE WORSHIP. 91 

these resources will always leave us unable to sur- 
mount this difficulty ; and when I look at the Past, 
I seem to gain no direct ground for hope, as fkr as 
the great body of men is concerned. 

The Priest, — On the contrary, my daughter, I 
hope soon to set you free from your uneasiness on 
this point, natural though it be ; and I rely on a 
judicious survey of the Past — the long initiation of 
our race, now finally ended, as is clearly shown by 
the very feet of my dmwing up this Catechism. 
Judge the past rightly, and it is impossible not 
to see the natural capacity of our species for 
living a . subjective Hfe. For in the past we see 
such a life, under different forms, prevail during 
forty centuries. All who are emancipated from the 
older belief now know, that during this long pro- 
bation, the minds of men habitually recognised the 
sway of purely imaginary beings — we see them to 
be imaginary, their worshippers believed in their 
real and distinct existence. Nor is this the judg- 
ment only of those who are emancipated. The 
partisans of the different forms of theological belief 
have nearly the same conviction in this respect ; for 
they each judge all but their own on this principle. 
And yet the supporters of the other forms, put 
together, always outnumber, by an immense ma- 
jority, the supporters of any one form, especially in 
the present day, when no form of supernatural belief 
is common to large masses. Each one thinks illusion 
the rule, his own fiction the solitary exception. 

So prone are we to this subjective life, that we 



92 FIB8T PART. 

find it more prevalent the nearer we ascend to the 
naive age of a purely spontaneous helief, in the in- 
dividual or in the society. The greatest effort our 
reason is required to make, is in the opposite di- 
rection. It is to hring the subjective into sufficient 
subordination to the objective ; it is to enable our 
minds, in their inner workings, to I'epresent the 
external world with the clearness required by the 
position we occupy. For the external world claims 
an unvarying predominance over us, whether for 
action or impression. This, the normal result, is 
only attained, in the individual as in the species, 
in the period of our complete maturity. It con- 
stitutes the best sign of that maturity. The 
tendency of this transformation is to a radical 
change in the conduct of the human understanding. 
But no such change will ever prevent our developing 
the subjective life, even beyond the needs of Posi- 
tive worship. We shall always require a certain 
amount of discipline to keep within due limits our 
natural disposition to substitute too completely the 
inward for the outward. You need feel, then, on 
this head no serious uneasiness, unless you judge 
man as he will be, by the present tendency of special 
scientific pursuits to crush the imagination and 
to wither the heart. This, however, is really only 
one of the natural symptoms of modem anarchy. 

The only essential difference between subjectivity 
in its later and in its primitive shape is this. In its 
later shape we must be fully conscious of it, and 
openly avow it, no one ever confusing it with 



w 
*. 



THE WOKSHIP. 93 



J 



objectivity. Our religious contemplations will con- •. ^ \ 
sciously be carried on internally. Our predecessors, ' 
on the contrary, vainly endeavoured to see without 
them what had no existence but within. Of course 
it was understood that they might fall back off a ^ 
future life for the ultimate realization of their 
visions. This general contrast between the two 
may be summed up by a statement of the different 
ways of conceiving the principal subdivision of the 
intellect. In the normal state of existence contem- 
plation, even when inward, is easier and less eminent 
than meditation ; for in contemplation our intel- 
lect continues nearly passive. In one word, we 
contemplate in order to meditate, because our 
studies^ mainly regard the external world. On the 
contrary, with men in the theological state, medita- 
tion must always seem less difficult and far more 
common than contemplation. In this last, therefore, 
they placed the highest effort of our understanding. 
They only meditated in order to contemplate, and 
to contemplate beings which were always eluding 
their grasp. A familiar sign will soon mark this 
distinction as regards the greater part of private 
worship. The Positivist shuts his eyes during his 
private prayers, the better to see the internal 
image; the believer in theology opened his, v() 
enable him to perceive outside an object which was 
an illusion. 

2^he Woman, — This explanation has set me quite 
at ease where I was uneasy. Yet I continue, my 
father, to look on the institution of the subjective 



94 FIB8T PART. 

life as the capital difficulty in Positive worslup. 
The new subjectivity appears to me, it is true^ 
always to admit of being reconciled with the 
thoroughly real character which is the distinction 
of ^^r faith. But allowing this agreement, it seems 
to me, it must always require special efforts. 

The Priest. — You have a right idea, my daughter, 
as to the essential condition which I must now 
fulfil To compare the worship and the regime, 
the best way is to assign each its respective domain : 
to the one, the subjective, to the other, the objec- . 
tive life. True, they are simultaneously connected 
with both ; yet the subjective evidently is most 
important in the worship, the objeoiive in the 
regime, Ko better characteristic of the higher 
dignity of the worship could be selected Such 
superiority is the necessary consequence of the pre- 
ponderance of subjectivity over objectivity through- 
out the whole of man's existence, as seen even 
in the individual, but still more clearly in so- 
ciety. 

TJie Woman. — Your systematic sanction of the 
conclusion to which I had been led by the na- 
tural process of my own thought induces me, my 
father, now to ask you what is the true theory of 
Mie subjective life. It is impossible here to do 
more than give an outline of such a doctrine; but it 
seems to me that to state the principle on which it 
rests is indispensable. No Positivist can do with- 
out a general explanation of this point; for Lis 
worship, public or private, will require it almost 



THE WOBSHIP. _^' 95 

for everyday use, as a preventive against any de- 
generation into mysticism or empiricism. - - 
. The Frisat, — ^Your legitimate desire must be 
satisfied, my daughter. Conceive then the funda- 
mental law of the subjective life to be, the due ^pA>- 
ordination of that life to the objective. The world 
within is essentially at all times under the regu- 
lating power of the world without, from which 
also it draws its nourishment and stimulua This 
is true of the life of the brain, as much as of our 
^ore strictly bodily life. Let our conceptions be as 
fiintastical as they may, they must always bear the 
stamp of the rule of the outer world j a rule not 
self-chosen, and one which becomes less simple, as 
well as less complete, in proportion as it becomes 
more indirect. AH this is but the necessary con- 
sequence of the indisputable principle on which I 
rested our whole theory of the intellect, the dy- 
namical as well as statical theory, thus brought 
into connexion with the fundamental system of 
biologicieJ conceptions. 

The order which man produces can never be any- 
thing but the improvement of the order of nature. 
And the improvement mainly consists in develop- 
ment. So we are led to feel here, as everywhere 
else, and even more here than elsewhere, that the 
true liberty of man is essentially the result of due 
submission. But in order properly to apply to the 
subjective life this general rule of the objective, we 
must begin by examining, under this fresh aspect, 
the constitution of the whole order of nature. For 



96 FIRST PABT. 

the laws which combine to form it are far from 
beiDg equally applicable to the subjective life. To 
make ydiir ideas more definite^ I will specify but 
one case, the simplest and the most common — ^viz., 
^sHien in our subjective worship we wish to call 
back into existence one whom we have loved. Were 
I not to specify some such case, in which the heart 
aids the inteUect, it would be easy to go astray in 
the study of such a domain. But all the ideas 
formed in this way, in a case taken from our most 
private worship, and quite within our range, will 
be easily applied, with the suitable modifications, to 
the rest of sociolatry. 

The Womcm, — I feel grateful to you, my fiither, 
for your consideration, which I feel to be indis- 
pensable for me. The doctrine is no less novel than 
difficult ; for the problem could not be stated even, 
so long as belief in a supernatural power prevailed. 
Such a belief forbade us to represent to ourselves 
the dead otherwise than in a mysterious condition, 
generally left utterly vague. This state allowed of 
no analogy on essential points between us and them. 
Supposing us free from all uneasiness as to their 
ultimate fate, we were never allowed to form for 
them a subjective life. To do so was an act of 
impiety, for it gave the creature the affection due to 
the Creator. But if the power to state this affecting 
question is, by the necessity of the case, peculiar to 
Positivism, not less peculiar to that system is the 
general answer, as the only system which has 
revealed the true laws of man's intellect. I can 



THE WORSHIP. 97 

then form a conception at once of the general 
method of subjective worship, and of it« normal 
basis, which makes this ideal existence the ^mple 
continuation of our real life. But would you 
explain to me directly the modifications of which 
our life, so continued^ JU-suaceptible? 
--^"TKe^rieBi, — These modifications consist, my 
daughter, in the suppression, or at least in the 
neglect of, all the lower laws, in order to give 
greater predominance to the higher ones. During 
the objective life, the dominion exercised by the 
outer world over the world of man is as direct as 
it is unbroken. But in the subjective life the out- 
ward order becomes simply passive. It ceases to 
have any but the indirect influence attaching to it 
as the original source of the ideas we wish to cherish. 
The dead we love are no longer under the dominion 
of the rigorous laws of the material world, nor even 
under the general laws of life. On the contrary, 
the laws peculiar to man's existence, particularly to 
his moral existence, though not excluding his social, 
govern, with a firmer government than during life, 
the existence which the dead retain in our brain. 
This existence is by its very nature merely an intel- 
lectual and affective existence. It is essentially 
ideal \ and the ideas it raises bring back the feelings 
with which the being we have lost inspired us, and 
the thoughts to which he gave rise. Our subjective 
worship aims, then, at nothing more than a species 
of internal evolution, the gradual result of our 
exercise of the brain according to the appropriate 

H 



98 FIBST PART. 

laws. The image we form always remains less 
clear andless lively than the object it is to represent^ 
in obedience to the ftindamental law of our intellect^ 
But since the contrary is often the case in diseases 
of the brain, a successful cultivation of ourselves' 
may bring us, in our normal state, nearer to the 
necessary limit, far nearer than could possibly be 
believed hitherto, whilst this beautiful domain 
remained vague and dark. 

With a view to getting a more exact conception -nk 
of this general subordination, observe that the sub- 
jective evocation of the loved object should always 
be connected with our last objective impressions of 
him. This is most evident as to age^ for death 
prevents any increase of that. I^ then, we lose our 
friends prematurely, the effect is to invest them with 
eternal youth. This law, binding on the original 
adorer, must of necessity be obeyed by his most 
distant adherents. No one will ever be able to 
represent to himself Beatrice, the gentle patroness 
of Dante, otherwise than as Dante did, as twenty- 
five years old. We may think of her as younger, * 
we cannot imagine her older. 

The objective and the subjective life, then, differ 
fundamentally in this : — The first is "under the 
direct control of physical laws ; the second under 
that of moral laws. The laws of the intellect axe 
equally applicable to both. This distinction loses 
something of its marked character, when we see that, 
in both cases, the more general order always comes 
before the more special For so the difference is 



THE WORSHIP. 99 

limited simply to the mode in which we estimate 
generality; we egftimate it first in* reference to 
.phenomena, in the second case in reference to our 
/conceptions. This remark will be explained when 
we come to the doctrine. 

Be this as it may, the necessary preponderance of 
moral laws, in the case of the subjective life, is in 
perfect conformity with our nature. So much so, 
that not only was it involuntarily respected, but it 
was known and appreciated, at the earliest stage of 
man's intellectual growth. You know that, as a 
fact, the great moral laws had been stated, though 
empirically, in their leading features at least, long 
previous to any real recognition of the lowest 
physical laws. At a time when poets, in their 
fictions, set aside without scruple the general con- 
ditions of the order of the outer world, and even 
those of life, they observed with admirable exact- 
ness the leading ideas of social, and still more 
moral order. Men found no difficulty in admitting 
the existence of invulnerable heroes and of gods 
who took any shape at pleasure. But the instinct 
of the great mass, as well as the genius of the poet, 
would at once have rejected any moral incoherence — 
i^ for example, a writer had ventured on attributing 
to a 9user of a~oowaxd.llbeKaliliy.or courage. 

The Womcm, — By the light of your explanations 
I see, my father, that, in our subjective worship, 
we may neglect physical laws, whilst we cling 
more closely to moral laws; for- it is on the real 
knowledge of these last that the new order of institu- 
h2 



100 FIRST PABT. 

tions must depend for its advance. The imagination 
easily frees itself from the most general conditions, 
even those of space and time, provided that the 
requirements of moral feeling are always respected. 
But I should wish to know how we are to use the 
liberty thus given us to &cilitate our attainment of 
the main end of subjective worship— I mean, our 
mental evocation, by the agency of the brain, of the 
objects of our affections. 

The Priest. — So stated, my daughter, your ques- 
tion is easily answered. It is a self-evident pro- 
position, that the better to concentrate our strength 
on this holy object, we must divert none of it on 
superfluous modifications of the order of life, nor 
even of the order of matter. Be careful then that 
no change take place in the outer circumstances. 
The person you adore should in this respect 
be as he was in life. Use them even to reani- 
mate more effectually his image. You will find, on 
this point, in my System of Positive Politics^ an 
important observation : — " Our recollection of our 
friends becomes at once clearer and more lasting, if 
we fix with precision the mq,terial environment, 
before we place in it the living imaga" I would 
even advise you, as a general rule, to break up this 
arrangement of the outward circumstance into its 
three essential parts, always proceeding from without 
inwards, according to the principle of our hierarchy. 
This rule of worship is obeyed, by first getting a 
precise idea of the place, next of the seat or the 
attitude, and lastly of the dress, appropriate to 



THE WORSHIP. 101 

each particular case. Our heart may feel impatient 
at the delay thus caused ; but we soon come to feel 
its efficacy when we see the loved image gradually ^ 
acquire by these means a vividness and a clearness 
which at first seemed impossible. 

These operations are essentially within the pro- 
vince of esthetics. They become easier to under- 
stand if we place them by the side of the opei».tion3 
of science, as we may do by virtue of the necessary 
identity of the chief laws of both. In strict truth, 
science, when it points out beforehand a future often 
distant, ventures on a still bolder effort than art does, 
when it would call up some cherished memory. Our 
brilliant success in the former case, though there 
the intellect derives much less aid from the heart, 
authorizes us to hope for more satisfactory results 
in the other, where alone we have the certainty of 
" arriving at some solution or other. This certainty 
rests, to say the truth, entirely on the knowledge of 
the laws of the brain, of which our conceptions are 
still very confused. Our astronomical previsions, 
on the other hand, depend more than anything on 
the simplest and ^ best known of external laws. 
But whilst this distinction is adequate to explain 
\ the inequality of our success in the two cases, it 
\ shows us that such inequality is simply provisional. 
/\ WheiTthe^u^er laws shall be sufficiently known, 
. the Positive priesthood will draw from them results 
' more precious, and susceptible of greater regularity, 
tlian those of astronomy, even when most successful. 
For astronomy becomes uncertain in its previsions, 



102 FIRST PART* 

and even fails altogether, as soon as the questions 
become very complicated. This is generally tlie 
qase with comets. We need not justly incur any 
charge of chimerical presumption when we say that 
the providence of man can, and ought to, secure 
more complete regularity in the order which is 
most amenable to its action, than can prevail, as 
regards the majority of events, in the order which 
obeys simply a blind fatality. The greater compli- 
cation of the phenomena will ultimately be over- 
come, in these high cases, by the powerful sagacity* 
of man, the modifying agent. All that we need is 
a sufficient knowledge of the order of man's 
world. 

The Worrum, — I feel, my father, that to subordi- 
nate the subjective to the objective, is at once the 
constant obligation and the most important resource 
of Positive worship. You have made me quite 
understand that, far from wishing to withdraw our- 
selves from this necessary yoke, we ought freely to 
accept it, even when we might neglect it. For 
such a complete submission makes our subjective 
life much easier, at the same time that it economizes 
all our most valuable strength. But here I stop. 
I do not see, from this point onwards, in what 
properly consists our action in this internal exis- 
tence \ and yet this existence ought, it seems to me, 
in its own way to be less passive even than our 
external one. 

TJiA Priest, — Our action consists, my daughter, 
in idealizing. This is almost always to be done by 



THE WOBSHIP. 1D3 

sabtraction, rarely by addition, even when, in add- 
ing, we observe all proper precautions. The ideal 
must be an amelioration of the real, or it is inade- 
quate for its moral purpose. This amelioration is, 
for the ideal, the true normal compensation of its 
inferiority to the actual in clearness and liveliness. 
But the ideal must be subordinate to the real, 
otherwise the representation would be untrue, and 
the worship would become mystical. A too servile 
adherence to reality, again, would leave it empirical. 
Our rule avoids equally these two contrary devia- 
tions. We find a natural indication of its sound- 
ness in our tendency to forget the defects of the 
dead, whilst we only recall their good qualities. 

From this point of view, I would have you see in 
the rule nothing more than a particular deduction 
from the dogmatic conception of Humanity. Our 
Divinity only incorporates into herself the dead who 
are really meritorious. But in doing so, she puts 
away from each the imperfections which in all 
cases dimmed their objective lifa Dante had, in 
his own manner, an anticipation of this law when 
he formed that beautiful fiction, which makes the 
preparation for blessedness consist in drinking first 
of the river of oblivion, then of Eunoe, which calls 
up only the memory of good. In ameliorating, 
then, those whom you choose as representatives of 
Humanity, add but very secondary improvements, 
not such as impair the real impression even of their 
outward form, much less that of their moral cha- 
racter. But give free scope, always of course with 



104 FIB8T PART. 

prudence, to your natural disposition to clear them 
of their different faults. 

The Womcm, — In the true theory then, my 
father, of the subjective life, our worship ultimately 
leaves the order of the otyer world such as it actu- 
ally is, with the view of concentrating with greater 
effect on man's world our chief efforts for improve- 
ment. The noble existence which thus perpetuates 
us in others is the worthy continuation of the one 
by which we deserved immortality; the moral pro- 
gress of the individual and the race is ever the 
most important destination of both lives. The dead 
with us are set free from all necessity to obey the 
laws of matter or the laws of life. We remember 
that they were once subject to them, but we do so 
only that we may be better able to recall them such 
as we knew them. But they do not cease to love, 
and even to think, in us and by us. The sweet 
exchange of feelings and ideas that passed between 
us and them, during their objective life, becomes 
closer and more continuous when they are set free 
from their bodily existence. And yet although, 
under these conditions, their life is deeply mixed 
up with our own, they preserve unimpaired their 
originality — their own distinct moral and mental 
character, supposing that they ever had a reaDy 
distinct character. We may even say that their 
more prominent characteristics become more marked, 
in proportion as this close intercourse becomes more 
free. 

This Positive conception of the future life is cer^ 



THE WOBSHIP. 105 

tainly nobler than that of any theological school, at 
the same time that it alone is true. When I was 
a Catholic, in the period of my most fervent belief, 
I could not help being deeply shocked on studying 
the childish conception ^f blessedness which we 
find in a father of such high moral and intellectual 
eminence as St. Augustin. I was almost angry when 
I found him hoping some day to be free from the 
laws of weight, and even from the need of taking 
food. By a gross contradiction, he kept the power 
of eating what he liked, without any fear, it would 
seem, of becoming inordinately fat. The contrast 
is well adapted to make us feel how greatly Posi- 
tivism improves immortality, at the same time that 
it places it on a firmer footing, when it changes it 
from objective to subjective. Still, clear as the 
superiority is, I cannot but regret, in the old wor- 
ship, its great institution — prayer. Prayer does 
not seem to me to be compatible with the new 
faith. 

The Priest, — ^Were there really such an omission, 
my daughter, it would be extremely serious; for 
the regular practice of prayer, private or public, is 
the capital condition of any worship whatever. 
Far from failing to fulfil this condition. Positivism 
satisfies it better than Catholicism; for it purifies 
the institution of prayer, at the same time that it 
developes it. Your mistake on this point is the 
result of the low notion generally formed of prayer. 
We make it consist in asking for something — too 
often in asking for the supply of our bodily wants, 



106 FIRST PART. 

in accordance with the profoundly egoistic character 
of every form of theological worship. For ns, on 
the contrary, prayer is the ideal of life; for to pray 
is at one and the same time to love, to think, and 
even to act, since expression is always, in the true 
sense of the word, an action. Never can the three 
aspects of human life be united with so intimate an. 
union as in our admirable effusions of gratitude and 
love towards our great Divinity, or her worthy 
representatives and organs. No interested motive 
is any longer allowed to stain the purity of our 
prayers. 

Still, as the practice of daily prayer greatly im- 
proves the heart, and even the intellect, we are 
warranted in keeping in sight this valuable result. 
Nor need we fear that the intrusion in this degree 
of our personality will ever degrade us. The Posi- 
tivist prays in order to give expression to his best 
affections. This is his main object. He may also 
ask, but he asks only for a noble progress, which 
he ensures almost by the very asking. The fervent 
wish to become more tender, more reverential, more 
courageous even, is itself in some degree a realiza- 
tion of the desired improvement. At least it con- 
tains the first step to any.improvement — ^the sincere 
confession of our actual imperfection. This holy 
influence of prayer may extend to the intellect, were 
it only by urging us to new efforts to improve our 
thought. On the contrary, to ask for an increase 
of riches or power would, in our worship, be as 
absurd as it is ignoble. We do not envy the 



THE WORSHIP. 107 

believers in theology the unlimited command ovet 
the external world which they hope to obtain by 
prayer. All our subjective efforts are limited to 
perfect, as far as is possible, the world of man^ 
which is nobler and also more susceptible of modifi- 
cation. In a word, Positivist prayer takes com- 
plete possession of the highest domain of all, that 
once set apart for supernatural grace. The Positive 
idea of sanctification systematizes moral progress. 
Previously such progress had been looked on as 
rejecting any idea of law, although its pre-eminence 
was quite acknowledged. 

The Womcm, — I accept your explanation as deci- 
sive; and I now beg you, my father, to point out 
to me the general course to be adopted in regard to 
Positivist prayer. 

The Priest, — For that purpose you must divide it, 
my daughter, into two separate and successive parts 
— the one passive, the other active. They concern 
respectively the past and the future, with the pre- 
sent for connecting link. Our worship must always 
be the expression of love, springing from and deve- 
loping gratitude to the past, a gratitude ever on 
the increase. All prayer, then, private or public, 
ought to begin by commemoration as a prepara- 
tion for effusion, this last occupying half the time 
the former occupies. When a happy combination 
of signs and ideas has sufficiently rekindled the 
warmth of our feelings towards the object of our 
adoration, we then pour them forth with real fer- 
vour. Such fervour has a tendency still further to 



108 , FIKST PART. 

strengthen the feelings, and so to make us more 
ready for the evocation with which we conclude. 

The Woman, — Satisfied with these hints, I would 
ask you, my father, to complete your general view 
of our worship, by directly explaining to me, in its 
more important features, its influence on our im- 
provement. I feel that I understand it thoroughly ; 
yet I could not define it so as to state it to others 
in a shape to secure a fair judgment. This is why 
I ask you, on this point, for a systematic explana- 
tion, as a guide for me — ^first, in my own practice ; 
next, in my efforts to convert others. 

The Priest, — Our worship improves the heart 
and the intellect simultaneously; yet it is important, 
my daughter, to separate in our view its reactioa 
on our moiul state, and its influence on our intel- 
lect. 

Its result, in the first case, is an immediate con- 
sequence of the first law of animal life ; for worship 
is always a real eosercisCy and more truly so thaa 
anything else. This is pointed out by ordinary 
language, here, as elsewhere, the faithful picture of 
human existence. Above all does such a view of it 
admit of no dispute when prayer is complete — that 
is to say, when it is oral as well as mental. We 
actually bring into play in expression, whether by 
sounds, or by gestures, or attitudes, the same muscles 
that we do in action. So every expression of right 
feelings has a tendency to strengthen them and 
develope them, in the same way as the acts to which 
they lead would do, if we performed them. 



THE WOBSHIP. 109 

1 am bound, however, on this point, to guard 
against a dangerous exaggeration, and I do so by 
urging you never to confuse these two great mural 
influences — ^the influence of our expressions, and the 
influence of our actions. It is true that the laws 
which govern them both are essentially similar ; 
but in no case can they, therefore, be looked on as 
of equal value. It is the result of universal expe- 
rience, fiiUy confirmed by our cerebral theory, that 
action will always have more effect than prayer, 
not merely on the external result, but also on the 
amelioration of our nature. Still, second to the 
practice of good actions, nothing is better adapted 
to strengthen and develope our best sentiments 
than their due expression, supposing it become as 
habitual as it ought to be. Now, this general 
means of amelioration is ordinarily more within 
our reach than action ; for acting often requires 
materials or circumstances beyond our reach, so as 
at times to confine us to the mere barren wisL By 
virtue of their being thus accessible, the practices 
of our worship come to be, for our moral progress, 
a valuable supplement to our active life ; and there 
is no difficulty in reconciling the two, such is the 
perfect homogeneity of Positive religion. 
\ The Womcm, — I now understand the moral influ- 
ence of our worship. I need, my father, more full 
explanations as to its influence on our intellect. I 
am by no means so clear as to this. 

TheFHeat — You must keep distinct, my daughter, 
its two main cases — ^the one, in which its efficiency 



110 FIRST PABT. 

is limited to the sphere of art; the other, in which 
it passes into that of science. 

From the first point of view, the power of Posi- 
tive worship on the mind is direct and striking — 
first, as regards the most general art; next, as it 
regards the two special arts, those of sound ol form. 
Poetry is the soul of our worship, as science is of 
the doctrine, and industry of the regime. Every 
prayer, private as well as public, becomes in Posi- 
tivism a real work of art, inasmuch as it is the 
expression of our best feelings. In prayer, nothing 
can free us from the obligation of constantly form- 
ing our prayers ourselves ; so that every Positivist 
must be, in some respects, as it were; a poet — at 
least, for his own private worship. We must use 
fixed forms of prayer, in order to secure more r^u- 
larity; but these forms must originlilly, in all cases, 
be drawn up by him who uses them, or he will find 
that they have no great efficiency. However, though 
the form remains the same, the prayer admits of 
some degree of variety, as it is the aHificial digns 
only that are fixed. Their uniformity only brings 
into a stronger light the spontaneous variations of 
natural language. Such language, whether musical 
or mimic, is always more estbetical than the other. 

This poetical faculty of originating our praye];^ 
will be largely developed when the regeneration of 
education shall have sufficiently trained all Posi> 
tivists in the views it requires, and even in such 
compositions. This I will point out to you in the 
Third Part of this Catechism. When we have 



^-K 



THB WORSHIP. Ill 

reached that pointy the general art will always derive 
suitable assistance from the special arts. All will; 
then be familiar with singing, which is essentially , 
the basis of music. All will be familiar also with 
drawing, the general source of the three arts of 
form- f-painting, sculpture, and architecture. Lastly/ 
when we draw out our form of worship, we may 
generally introduce special ornaments, chosen with 
judgment from the accumulated stores of human 
art, the esthetic treasures of Humanity. Additions 
of this kind seem, at first sight, limited to public 
worship; but private worship is equally open to 
them, and equally benefited by them, provided 
it borrows with discretion and moderation. All 
true poets have, at all times, given expression to the 
leading feelings of our nature. As that nature 
remains the same^ their productions are always in 
sufficient consonance with our own emotions. When 
the agreement, without being entii^ely complete, is 
nearly so, we may borrow from the poets, and find 
in what we- borrow more than the merely intellec- 
tual merit of a more perfect expression — ^we find, 
what is &r more, the moral charm of a personal 
sympathy. The older the source jfrom which wo 
borrow our ornaments, the more suitable they are ; 
kfor they lend a sanction to our affections, seen thus 
to be in spontaneous harmony, not merely with those 
of the great poet^ but also with those of all the 
generations which, in succession, that poet has aided 
in the expression of their feelings. To secure, how- 
ever, the full efficiency of this valuable aid, it must 



112 FIRST PABT. 

ijever assume any other than a secondary place. It 
must remain an addition^ though the degree in 
which it may be admitted must vary as the cases 
vary, as I will shortly point out to you. 

The- Womom, — ^Before you explain to me the 
influence of the Positive worship on our intellect, 
would you, my father, clear up a serious difliculty, 
naturally arising from the preceding exposition. 
Worship and poetry seem, in our religion, to melt 
so entirely one into the other, that the simultaneous 
growth of the two would appear to require a priestly 
class quite distinct from that which is to develope 
and teach the doctrine. I feel that this separation 
would have a very dangerous tendency. The rivalry 
of the two bodies would be very difficult to deal 
with. They would compete for the ultimate direc- 
tion of the regime, and their claim would be equaL 
So serious does such a conflict seem, that you can- 
not avoid meeting the difficulty. If you did, you 
would compromise the very organization of our 
priesthood ; for a divided priesthood would be in- 
capable of presiding over private life, and still more 
over public life. But then, again, I do not see how 
we can completely avoid it, as the cultivation of the 
poetical faculty and the training of the philosophical 
seem to require a treatment wholly diflTerent. / 

The Priest. — ^Your error, my daughter, is one 
which it is important to correct. One of the lead- 
ing features of our modem anarchy is the general 
tendency to a dispersive, special action. It is a 
lamentable waste of strength. Such special action 



THE WORSHIP. 113 

is as absurd as it is immoral. In the normal state, 
it is only in the sphere of practice that you have 
special results. There it is necessary, as no one can 
do everything. But as each one must embrace the 
whole range of conception, the cultivation of the 
intellect must, on the contrary, always remain in- 
divisible. In the sphere of theory there must be no 
specialty. If there is, we have in such division the 
first sign of anarchy. So thought the ancients 
under the theocratic regime, the only instance, as 
yet, of a complete organization. The separation of 
the poet from the priest was the sign of the decay 
of theocracy. 

Though the genius for philosophy and the genius 
for poetry cannot ever, at one and the same time, 
£nd a high destination, intellectually they are iden- 
tical in nature. Aristotle might have been a great 
poet, Dante an eminent philosopher, had the time 
in which they lived been such as to call for less 
scientific power in the one, or less esthetic power in 
the other. All these scholastic distinctions were in- 
vented and maintained by pedants, who, themselves 
entirely destitute of genius, could not even appre- 
ciate it in others. Whatever the career it chooses, 
mental superiority is always the same in kind. The 
choice of each is fixed for him by his position, espe- 
cially his position in time ; for the race always 
exerts a commanding influence over the individual. 

The only real difference that exists in this re- 
spect is this, that the services of philosophy are na- 
turally uninterrupted, whereas the services rendered 
I 



114 FIBST PART. 

hj poets are necessarily intermittent. None bnt great 
poets are of use, even for the intellect, but still more 
from the moral point of view. All other poets do 
much more harm than good ; whereas quite second- 
rate philosophers can be made of real use, supposing 
them to have honesty, good sense and courage. 
' Art is meant to develope in us the feeling of perfec- 
tion; so it cannot tolerate mediocrity. True taste 
implies lively distaste. From Homer to Walter Scott, 
we have, in the Western world, only thirteen poets 
really great, two in ancient times, eleven in modem. 
In this number I include three prose writers. Of 
all the rest there are not more than seven you could 
name as fit for daily reading. The others will, 
without doubt, be completely thrown aside, as 
being equally hurtful to the intellect and the heart, 
when the regeneration of education shall have 
allowed us to extract whatever useful materials 
they contain, especially for the purposes of history. 
Sociocracy, less even than theocracy, requires a 
fixed class exclusively devoted to the cultivation of 
poetry. The priests, whose habitual character is 
the philosophical, will become, for the time, poets, 
when our Divinity shall stand in need of fresh efiu- 
sions for general use, sufficient for the wants of 
several ages, both in public and private worship. 
Compositions of secondary importance, which na* 
turally are more frequent, will be generally left to 
the spontaneous impulses of women or proletaries. 
As for the two special arts, the long apprenticeship 
they require, particularly the art of form, will com- 



THE WORSHIP. 

pel US to devote to them some select masters. The 
choice will not be difficult, for the directing priest- 
hood will have ample opportunities in the natural 
course of Positive education. These masters will 
become actual members of the priesthood, or will 
merely receive pay from it, according as, by their 
nature, they are more or less synthetical. 

The Wbmcm, — After these remarks, you may pass 
at once, my father, to your last general explanation 
of the efficiency of the worship. Its adaptation to 
esthetic purposes seems to me evident ; but I do not 
see in what lies its influence on the intellect 

The Priest, — In this, my daughter, that it devft- 
lopes more fully, in all its parts, the universal logic. 
This logic always rests on a combination of signs, 
images, and feeling, as assisting the mind in its work- 
ing. The logic of feeling acts more directly and ener- 
getically than any other, but its method is deficient 
in precision and pliancy. Artificial signs are very 
accommodating, and can be increased at need. By 
these two properties they make up for their inferi- 
ority in logical power, the result of the weakness and 
indirectness of their connexion with our thoughts. 
The aggregate of intellectual aids which the two form 
must receive its complement from images. These 
alone can form it into a whole. They do so by their 
nature as an intermedium. Now it is especially 
in reference to this normal bond of true logic 
that the worship is efficacious, though it also 
developes its two other constituents. In this re- 
spect, the child who prays rightly is exercising 
i2 



116 FIBST FAST. 

more healthily his meditative organ s than the 
haughty algebrist who, from a deficiency of tender- 
ness and imagination, is really only cultivating the 
organ of language by the aid of a particular jargon, 
which, rightly used, is of very limited application. 

You may get a clear glimpse by this of the most 
important intellectual result of Positive worship. It 
is thus seen to touch only the method properly so 
called ; to have very little to do with the doctrine. 
We except, of course, the moral, nay, even the in- 
tellectufll notions, naturally arising from our reli- 
gious practices. But the method will always have 
more value than the doctrine, as feelings have more 
value than acts, morals than politics. The scien- 
tific labours hitherto accumulated have, to speak 
generally, for the most part, merely a logical value. 
What they teach is often useless, at times even worse 
than useless This provisional contrast between the 
method and doctrine will necessarily not be so 
strong when our encyclopedic discipline shall have 
delivered us from all the rubbish of the schools. Yet 
the true logic will always stand higher than 
science properly so called. This will be most 
true, of course, for the great mass, but in a degree 
also for the priesthood. 

The Wcynum. — All that remains, my father, is to 
ask you what is the special object of the two other 
conversations you promised me on the Positive 
worship. However much I may feel that we have 
not thoroughly explored its fair domain, I do not 
see to what point we are now to direct our efforts. 

ThA Friest. — You will see this, my daughter, if 



THE WORSHIP. 117 

you consider that our worship must be, if it is to 
succeed at all, first private, then public. These two 
will be respectively treated in the two following 
conversations. But first, you must attend to a 
general point — ^you must bring your judgment to 
bear directly on the important subordination of the 
public worship to the private. For on this subor- 
dination really depends, after all, the chief efficacy 
of Positive religion. 

The better to understand it, look on these two 
branches of worship as addressed respectively, the 
private to Woman, the public to Humanity. You 
will then feel that our Divinity can be sincerely 
honoured by those only who have prepared them- 
selves for her august worship by the practice of 
private prayer. That prayer consists in a noble 
homage daily paid to her best organs. These organs 
are for the most part subjective, but not to the 
exclusion of the objective. In a word, the true 
Church has for its original basis the simple Family. 
This is even more true in reference to the moral 
than to the purely social order. The heart can as 
little avoid this first step, the Family — it can as little 
avoid looking to it afterwards as an habitual stimu- 
lus — ^as the intellect can disdain the lower steps in the 
encyclopedic scale, in order to rise at once to the 
highest. For these highest constantly enforce on it 
the necessity of renewing its strength by recurring 
to the original source. 

It is the constant practice of private worship 
that, more than anything else, will ultimately 
distinguish true Positivists &om the &lse brethren 



118 FIRST PABT..- . ^ 

with whom we shall be burdened as soon as the 
true religion shall gain ascendancy. Without this 
mark, hypocrisy would be easy, and the hypocrite 
would usurp the consideration due only to the sin- 
cere worshippers of Humanity. Between Humanity 
and the Family we must also develope the normal 
intermediate step. We find this in the natural 
feelings, at the present day vague and weak, which 
bind us specially to our country properly so called. 
These intermediate affections require, for their right 
cultivation, an association of a limited size. This 
requirement will be the best ground on which to 
rest the reduction of the large kingdoms of the 
present day to simple cities with their due adjuncts 
— a process I shall explain later. . — --'^' 

CONVERSATION IV. 

PRIVATE WORSHIP. 

Tfie Woman, — ^It seems to me, my fisither, that 
private worship must fall into two parts, as private 
life does, and those parts quite distinct — the one 
personal, the other domestic. To keep them sepa- 
rate seems necessary for our explanation. 

The Friest. — Your division is the natural one. 
I was bound not to mix it up with my main division 
of the worship ; but it gives us, my daughter, the 
plan of our present conversation. In it we shall 
deal with two great institutions of sociolatry. The 
one relates to the true guardian angels, the other to 
the nine social sacraments. They will constitute 



PEIVATB WORSHIP. 119 

the respective characteristics, first of our personal, 
next of our domestic worship. The reasons for 
making the latter subordinate to the former are, 
though in a less degree, essentially similar to those 
which represent the whole of private worship as 
the only solid basis of public. More our own than 
any other, our personal worship alone can develope 
in us the habits which can test our adoration 
whether it be sincere or not. Without these habits, 
our domestic ceremonies, and still more our public 
solemnities, could have no moral efficacy. Thus 
sodolatry forms for each one a natural progressive 
series. Individual prayers are the right preparation 
for the celebration of our social rites, by the regular 
intermedium of the consecrations that concern us 
as members of a Family. 

The Womom, — Since our personal worship is thus 
made the primary basis of all our religious practices, 
I beg you, my father, to explain to me directly its 
real nature. 

The Priest, — ^It consists, my daughter, in the 
daily adoration of the best types which we can 
find to personify Humanity, taking into account the 
whole of our private relations. 

The existence of the Supreme Being is founded 
entirely on love, for love alone unites in a voluntary 
union its separable elements. Consequently the 
affective sex is naturally the most perfect representa- 
tive of Humanity, and at the same time her 
principal minister. Never will art be able worthily 
to embody Humanity except in the form of Woman. 



120 FIBST PART. 

But the moral providenoe of our Divinity is not 
exercised solely by the action of your sex collectively 
upon mine. This its fundamental office is a conse- 
quent of the personal influence that every true 
woman constantly exerts in the bosom <3i her own 
family. The domestic sanctuary is the continual 
source of the holy impulse which can alone preserve 
us from the moral corruption to which we are 
exposed in active or speculative life. The collective 
action of woman upon man must have its root in 
private life, or it will be found to have no perma* 
nent effect. It is within the £ftmily also that we 
gain the means of rightly appreciating the affective 
sex ; for no one can know more of that sex than 
what he gains from the types of it with which he 
is brought into daily contact 

You see then how, in the normal state, each 
man finds in his &,mily circle real gua/rdiom angels, 
at once the ministers and representatives of Hu- 
manity. The secret adoration of them strength- 
ens and developes their continuous influence. It 
thus tends directly to make us better and happier, 
by ensuring the gradual predominance of altruism 
over egoism ; by affording free scope to the former, 
by controlling the latter. Our just gratitude for 
benefits already received, thus becomes the natural 
source of fresh progress. The happy ambiguity of 
th^ French word, patron, mari^s sufliciently this 
twofold efficacity of our personal worship. Eor in 
it each angel must be equally invoked as a protector 
and as a model. 



PRIVATE WORSHIP. 121 

TJve Womtjm. — This first general view leaves me, 
my father, quite undecided as to what the personal 
type is to be. It would seem that we might, 
with equal reason, choose any one of the leadbg 
relations of domestic life. 

Ths Priest — ^We must really, my daughter, duly 
combine three of them, if we wish the worship of 
angels to have its full effect. We find in the 
theory of Positivism an indication of the necessity 
of this plurality. For we there find that the sympa- 
thetic instincts are three in number, and each of 
the three finds a special female influence to corre- 
spond with it. The mother, the wife, the daughter, 
must in our worship, as in the existence of which 
that worship is the ideal expression, develope in us, 
respectively — ^the mother, veneration; the wife, at- 
tachment; the daughter, kindness. As for the 
sister, the influence she exercises has hardly a very 
distinct character, and she may, in succession, be 
ocmnected with each of the three essential types. 
The three together represent to us the three 
natural modes of human continuity — the past, the 
present, the future — as also the three degrees of soli- 
darity which bind us to our superiors, our equals, 
and our inferiors. But the spontaneous harmony of 
the three can only be Mly maintained by observing 
their natural subordination. So the maternal angel 
must habitually take the first place, yet so that her 
gentle presidency never impair the force of the 
other two. 

This personal worship, as a general rule, has for its 



122 FIB8T FABT. 

object to guide the maturity of each worshipper. At 
that time one of the three feminine types has most 
frequently become subjective, whUst another remains 
objective. The two influences, subjective and ob- 
jective, are normally mixed, and our homage is 
more efficacious for the mixture ; for it secures a 
better combination of strength and clearness of 
imagery with consistency and purity of feeling. 

The Womcm. — Your explanation seems to me 
very satisfactory, yet I feel, my fether, that it leaves 
a great want as to my own sex. Our moral wants 
appear neglected. True, tenderness is our special 
distinction ; yet we can hardly therefore be above 
the need of some such habitual cultivation of ten* 
demess as the institution of guardian angels implies. 

The Priest, — ^You have, my daughter, an easy 
solution of your difficulty in the plurality of our 
angelic types. This is the proper way of meeting 
it, otherwise it would be impossible to overcome it. 
In fact, the principal angel alone must be common 
to both sexes. Each sex must borrow from the 
other the two angels that complete the institution. 
For the mother has, for both sexes equally, a pre- 
ponderance, not merely as the main source even of 
our physical existence, but still more as normally 
presiding over the whole of our education. The 
mother, then, is the object of adoration to both 
sexes. To her your sex must add the worship of 
the husband and the son, on the same grounds as 
I have assigned above for the man's worship of the 
wife and daughter. We need not go further ; the 



PRIVATE WORSHIP. l23 

difference is enough to meet the wants of both 
sexes. They require a patronage, in the case of 
woman specially adapted to develope energy ; in the 
case of man, tenderness. 

The WoTTUjm, — ^I feel already the strong attrac- 
tion of this great institution. But I find still in it, 
my father, two general imperfections. First, why 
does not it ' use all our private relations % next, is 
there sufficient allowance made for the too frequent 
inadequacy of the types in actual life ? 

The Priest — These two difficulties disappear, my 
daughter, if you take into account the several sub- 
ordinate types which have a natural connexion with 
each of our chief types, from their exciting similar 
feelings and standing in a similar relation to us. 
Around the mother we group naturally, first the 
father^ and sometimes the sister, then the master 
and protector, over and above any similar relations 
which may be largely increased in number both 
within the family and without. Extend the same 
method to the other two types, and we form a series 
of objects of adoration, becoming constantly less 
personal and more general. The result is, a gradual 
transition, so gradual as to be almost insensible, 
from private to public worship. This, the normal 
development, enables us also to supply, as far as 
possible, any exceptional deficiencies, by substi- 
tuting, in case of need, in the room of one of the 
primary types its most prominent subordinate. 
So we are enabled, subjectively, to re-create the 
family when it is formed of bad elements. 



124 FIRST PART. 

The Woman, — These remarks complete the subject. 
It remains for me, my fitther, to ask you for some 
more precise explanations as to the general system 
of prayers adapted to this fundamental worship. 

The Priest, — It requires, my daughter, three 
daily prayers — on getting up, before going to sleep, 
and in the midst of our daily occupations whatever 
they be. The first prayer must be longer and more 
efficacious than the other two. Each man should 
begin his day by a due invocation of his angels. 
This alone can dispose us to the right use habitually 
of all our powers. In the last prayer, we express 
the gratitude we owe to them for their protection 
during the day, and we hope thus to secure its con- 
tinuance during our sleep. The mid-^y prayer 
must, for a time, disengage us from the various im- 
pulses of thought and action, and must carry into 
both that influence of affection from which they 
have a tendency to alienate us. 

The object of these prayers of itself points out 
their respective times and mode of performanca The 
first precedes the work of the day ; it takes -place at 
the domestic altar, arranged so as to revive our best 
memories, and the attitude is kneeling, the proper 
attitude of veneration. The last prayer will be 
said when in bed, and ought, as far as possible, to 
continue till we fall asleep, in order the better to 
ensure a calm brain, at the time when we are least 
protected from evil tendencies. The period for our 
mid-day prayer cannot be so accurately stated. It 
must vary with individual convenience. It is, how- 



PBIYATE WOBSHIP. 125 

ever, important that each one should, in his own 
way, fix it strictly. If he does so, he will find it 
easier to ensure the frame of mind it requires. 
^ The respective length of our three daily prayers 
is also pointed out by their peculiar object. The 
morning prayer should be, in general, twice as long 
as the evening. That at mid-day should be half as 
long. When our personal worship is completely 
organized, the chief prayer naturally occupies the 
first hour of each day. This len^h is requii'ed, 
because we divide its opening part into two, each 
as long as the conclusion. We begin with the 
proper commemoration of the day; then comes that 
which is appointed for the week. The result is, 
that we usually divide the morning prayer into 
three parts of equal length, and in the three we 
give precedence respectively, first to images, then 
to signs, and last to feelings. The two other 
prayers do not admit of the same proportioh 
between commemoration and effusion. In the 
morning, efiusion in all lasts only half as long as 
commemoration. You invert this proportion in 
the evening, and you equalize the two at mid-day. 
You will find no difficulty in these minor differences. 
But I would call your attention to the fact that 
the total length of our daily worship only reaches 
two hours, even in the case of those who find it 
useful during the night to repeat the prayer appro- 
priate for mid-day. 

Every Positivist then will devote to his daily 
personal improvement less time than is now ab- 



126 FIBST PABT. 

sorbed by reading books of no value, or by useless 
or even pernicious amusements. In prayer alone 
can any decided progress of our subjective life take 
place, for in prayer we identify ourselves more and 
more with the Being we adore. The image of that 
Being is gradually purified and becomes more clear 
and vivid as we enter on each new ylsar.of our 
worship. By these private practices we prepare 
ourselves to feel aright the awakening of our sym- 
pathies due to the publicity of our other sacred rite& 
The moral qualities formed by such habits will, I 
hope, when combined, enable the rules of sociolatry 
to overcome, in the best of both sexes, the present 
coarseness of manners. Men of ordinary and un- 
cultivated mind still regard as lost, whatever time 
is not occupied by work in the common sense. 
Where there is cultivation, there we find a reco- 
gnition of the inherent value of pure intellectual 
exertion. But since the close of the Middle Ages^ 
there has been a general forgetfulness of the direct 
higher value of moral cultivation properly so called^ 
We should be half inclined to blush were we to 
devote to this moral cultivation as much time as 
the great Alfred allotted it daily, without in any 
way impairing his admirable activity. 

To complete this special theory of our daily 
prayers, I must point out to you that the orna- 
ments we borrow for it from the esthetic treasures 
of Humanity, must always be kept subordinate. 
Nor are they equally divided between the three 
prayers. By their nature, they are more adapted 



PRIVATE WOBSHIP. 127 

to aid our efifusioiis than oiir commemoration. As 
such, the aid they give us is more available in the 
evening than in the morning. But the special 
purpose of them is, to free us from the necessity of 
making our mid>day prayer ourselves. We often 
find this difficult to do; and in this case the 
effusion with which we end may consist almost 
entirely in a judicious choice of passages from the 
poets. When singing and drawing shall have 
become as familiar as speaking and writing, by the 
aid of this help from without we shall be more 
able to meet our internal wants at times when, as 
is too frequently the case, our best emotions are 
languid. 

The Woman. — ^Now that I understand our per- 
sonal worship, I am endeavouring, my father, to 
anticipate your exposition by forming a conception 
of the domestic worship properly so called. But I 
cannot of myself, as yet, get a satisfactory idea of it. 
I quite see that the domestic, as well as the personal 
worship, can institute a constant adoration of the 
types common to the whole femily. It can also in 
this, the elementary society, avail itself of the col- 
lective invocations which in publii; worship are 
addressed directly to Humanity. These two kinds 
of religious practices, under the natural priesthood 
of the head of the feimily, are susceptible, no doubt, 
of a high moral influence. Still, something is want- 
ing to stamp on our domestic worship a character 
quite its own, so as to keep it distinct from the two 
which it is to connect. 



128 FIBST PART. 

The Priest. — ^We meet this, my daughter^ by the 
institution of the social sacraments. They distin- 
guish the domestic worship from the two others. 
They also form a natural transition. In these 
sacraments we consecrate each of the sucoessire 
periods of our private life by connecting it with 
public life. Hence our nine social sacraments — 
Presentation, initiation, admission, destination, mar" 
riage, mattMrity, retirement, troMsfornuUion, and 
lastly incorporation. They succeed one another in 
an unbroken series, and form so many preparations 
by which, during the whole of his objective life, the 
worthy servant of Humaiiity proceeds, in a gradual 
course, to the subjective eternity which is idti- 
mately to constitute him in the strictest sense an 
organ of the Divinity we worship. 

The Woman. — ^Within the normal limits of this 
Catechism you cannot, my father, give me a really 
complete explanation of all our sacngnents. Still 
I hope you will be able to give me some idea of 
each. 

The Priest — In its first sacrament, my daughter, 
our religion, the final one, gives a systematic 
consecration to every birth. To this all previous 
religions had been instinctively led. The mother 
and the father of the new scion of Humanity come 
to present it to the priesthood. The priesthood 
receives from them a solemn engagement to fit the 
child for the service of Humanity. This natural 
guarantee is made more complete by two additional 
institutions, the germ of which Positivism thinks 



PRIVATE WOBSHIP. 129 

it ah honour to borrow from Catholicism. It 
deTelopes that germ under the impulse of its social 
principles. An artificial couple, chosen by the 
parents, with- the approbation of the priesthood, 
ensures the new servant of the Supreme Being a 
fresh protection. That protection is mainly spi- 
ritual, but at need becomes temporal, and all the 
special witnesses concur in it. He also receives 
from his two &niilies two particular patrons, one 
chosen from among the theoretical, the other from 
the practical, servants of Humanity. The names 
he derives from these two he must complete by a 
third; for at the time of his emancipation he must 
give himself a third name, selected, as the other 
two, from among the consecrated representatives of 
Humanity. 

In the ancient civilization, this first sacrament 
was often refused, especially to those who were 
thought incap^y^le of the destructive activity 'which 
was then in especial request. But as the constitu- 
tion of modem society more and more finds a use 
for natures of every order, the presentation will be 
almost invariably accepted by the priesthood, allow- 
ing for certain cases which are too entirely excep- 
tions to need prevision. 

The second sacrament bears the name oflniticUian, 
as marking the first entrance into public life, when the 
child passes, at the age of fourteen, from its unsys- ^ 
tematic training under the eye of iti» mother, to the 
systematic education given by the priesthood. Till 
that period, the advice of the priest is given solely to 



130 FIBST PABT. 

the parents, whether natural or artificial, to remind 
them of their essential duties during the first period 
of childhood. But now, the boy receives himself 
the advice from the priest, and no longer through, 
his parents. The aim of that advice is especiaUy, 
to strengthen his heart against the injurious influ- 
ences which too often accompany the intellectual 
training which he is now to underga This second 
sacrament may be put off, and sometimes refused, 
though very seldom, if the home education has been 
very imsuccessful. 

Seven years later, the young disciple who has 
been first presented, then initiated^ receives, as the 
consequence of his whole preparation^ the sacrament 
of admission. By it he is authorized freely to serve 
Humanity, whereas hiiJierto he received everything 
from Humanity and gave nothing in return. In 
civil legislation we find a constant recognition of 
the fact that it is necessary to put off, and even to 
refuse, this emancipation, in the case of those whose 
extremely defective organization, uncorrected by 
education, condemns them to perpetual infancy. 
The priesthood, as more qualified to form an accu- 
rate judgment, will not shrink from having recourse 
to measures of equal severity. But the direct con- 
sequences of their severity must never extend be* 
yond the spiritual domain. 

By this third sacrament, the child becomes a 
servant of Humanity. It does not, however, yet 
mark out his special career. This wiU often be 
different frx>m that which it was supposed to be 



PKIVATE WOBSHIP. 131 

whilst his practical apprenticeship, and the educa- 
tion of his intellect, were proceeding together. He 
alone is the proper judge on this point; and he 
must judge on trial of himself for a sufficient length 
of time. Hence a fourth social sacrament. At the 
age of twoDty-eight, allowing for a delay — a delay 
which may be either at his own request or enjoined 
— the sacrament of destination sanctions his choice 
of a career. Th^ ol4^wor^p ofii^red us the rudi- 
ment, as it were, of this institution, confined to the 
case of the highest functions, in the ordination of 
priests and the coronation of kings. But Positive 
religion must always consider every useful profes- 
sion a fit subject for social institution, with no dis- 
tinction of public and private. The humblest ser- 
vants of Humanity will come to receive in her 
temples, from the hands of her priests, this solemn 
consecration of their entering on any co-operative 
function whatsoever. This is the only sacran\ent 
that admits of being really repeated, though such 
repetition must be an exception. 

The Woman. — I imderstand, my father, this series 
of consecrations prior to marriage, itself to be 
followed by our four other sacraments. As for 
marriage, the most important of them all, and 
which alone gives completeness to the whole series 
of man's preparation, I already know the main 
points of the Positivist doctrine. Above all, I 
sympathize most deeply with the great institution 
of eternal widowhood, long looked for by the hearts 
of all true women. I recognise its importance for 
k2 



132 FIRST PART. 

the fiemiily, and even for the city. But I see besides 
this, that under no other condition can we suffi- 
ciently develope our subjective life ; under no other 
condition can our minds rise to the familiar repre- 
sentation of Humanity, by means of an adequate 
personification. All these precious notions had I 
made almost my own before I became your cate- 
chumen. I know also that you will return to this 
subject from another point of view, when explaining 
the regime. We may then enter on the last series 
of our consecrations. 

The Priest, — First however, my daughter, we 
must settle what is the normal age for receiving 
the chief social sacrament. As marriage is to 
follow, and not precede, the choice of profession, 
men can only be admitted to it so- £eu* as it is a 
religious ordinance when they have accomplished 
their twenty-eighth year. The priesthood will even 
advise the Government to give the head of the 
femily a legal veto, up to the age of thirty, in 
order the better to guard against any precipitation 
in the case of the most important of all our private 
actions. In the case of women, the sacrament 
of destination necessarily coincides with that of 
admission ; for their vocation is always known and 
happily is uniform. They are therefore . ready for 
mai'riage at the age of twenty-one, the age best 
fitted to secure the harmony of the marriage union. 
These are the lower limits of age, and must not be 
lowered for either sex, save on very exceptional 
grounds, which the priesthood must thoroughly 



PRIVATE WORSHIP. 133 

weigh, and take the moral responsibility of sanc- 
tioning. But in general, the higher limits should 
not be fixed, though women should almost always 
marry before twenty-eight, men before thirty-five. 
This is the rule for married life under its best form. 

The Womcm, — The first sacrament after marriage 
seems to me, my father, sufficiently explained by 
the mere explanation of the term. You had already 
drawn my attention to the fact, that the full develop- 
ment of the human organism coincides in time with 
the completion of the man*s social preparation, 
nearly at the age of forty-two. I am now thinking 
only of your sex, for mine is not concerned with 
the sacrament of maturity. The social function of 
women is at once too uniform and too fixed to re- 
quire either of the two consecrations that precede 
and follow marriage. 

jTAe Priest — You have succeeded, my daughter, 
in forming, without any help from me, a right idea 
of our sixth sacrament. StiU you would hardly be 
able, if you stopped at this point, to appreciate 
rightly its peculiar impoi-tance. During the twenty- 
one years which elapse between the sixth and the 
seventh sacrament, the man is going through the 
second period of his objective life, on which alone 
depends his subjective immortality. Previously, 
our life is simply a preparation. Naturally we are 
liable to mistakes, and those sometimes of a serious 
character, but never beyond reparation. From this 
time forwards, on the contrary, the faults we commit 
we can hardly ever repair, whether in reference to 



134 FIEST PART. 

ourselves or to others. It is important, then, that 
there should be a solemn ceremony when we impose 
on the servant of Humanitj the responsibility from 
which he can now no longer shrink. In this cere- 
mony we must never lose sight of his peculiar 
function, now clearly determined. 

The Woman, — ^The next sacrament, so &.r as I 
see, my father, is simply destined to mark the 
normal termination of that great period of complete 
and direct action, of which the sixth consecration 
marked the beginning. 

Ths Priest — On the contrary, my daughter, the 
sacrament of retirement is one of the most august 
and best determined of our sacraments. You will 
see that this is so, if you consider the last funda- 
mental duty which is then discharged by each true 
servant of Humanity. It is an institution of Posi- 
tivism, that every functionary, especially every tem- 
poral functionary, names his successor, subject to the 
sanction of his superior, and allowing for exceptional 
cases of moral or mental unworthiness, as I shall 
shortly explain to you. You see at once that there 
is no other means of adequately securing the con- 
tinuity of man's work. When at sixty-three, the 
citizen comes forward, of his own free will, to 
renounce active life, as his active powers are 
exhausted, and to have scope for the future for his 
legitimate influence as an adviser, he then solemnly 
exercises this last act of high authority, and by so 
doing publicly places such under the control of the 
priestly and popular elements of society. Their 



PBIVATB WOESHIP. l35 

inflaence may lead him to modify bis own action 
therein. The rich also transmit their office in 
obedience to the same rules ; and to make their 
transmission complete^ they hand over at the same 
time that portion of the capital of the race which 
forms the stock of the functionary, after he has 
made provision for his own personal wants. 

The Womam, — ^Now, my fether, I see the full 
social bearing of our seventh sacrament I looked 
on it at first as a kind of feimily festival 

As for the eighth, I am familiar enough with the 
true religion to understand of myself in what it 
consists. It is to be the substitute for the horrible 
ceremony of the Catholic rituaL Catholicism, free 
from all jcheck on its anti-social character, openly 
tore the dying peison from all his human affections, 
and made him stand quite alone before the judg- 
ment-seat of God. In our transforrMition, the 
priesthood mingles the regrets of society with the 
tears of his fieanily, and shows that it has a just 
appreciation of the life that is ending. It first 
secures, where possible, compensation for errors 
committed, and then it generally holds out the hope 
of subjective incoi'poration. It must not, how- 
ever, compromise itself by a premature judgment. 

The Priest, — Your appreciation, my daughter, of 
the last objective sacrament is adequate. I will 
now explain to you the final consecration. 

Seven years after death, when the passions that 
disturb the judgment are hushed, and yet the best 
IKmices of information remain accessible, a solemn 



236 FIBST PABT. 

judgmenti an idea which, in its germ, sodocracy 
borrows from theocanuej, finally decides the let of 
each. If the priesthood pronounces for incarpora- 
twrif it presides over the transfer, with due pomp, 
of the sanctified remains. They had previonaly 
been deposited in the burial-place of the dty; they 
now take their place for ever in the sacred wood 
that surrounds the temple of Humanity. Every 
tomb is ornamented with a simple inscription, a 
bust, or a statue^ according to the degree of honour 
awarded. 

4s to the exceptional caaes of marked tmworthi- 
ness, the sign pf disgrace consists in transporting, 
in the proper way, the ill-omened burden to the 
waste place allotted to the reprobate, amongst those 
who died by the hand of justice, by their 6wn hand, 
or in duel. 

The Woma/n, — ^I hare a clear idea of the nine 
social sacraments ; but I feel, my father, a regret ajs 
regards my sex in general. It does not seem to me 
that we are sufficiently considered. I make no 
objection to our exclusion from three of these con- 
secrations. . Such exclusion is natural, and rests on 
grounds which are in the highest degree honourable 
to women. Their life is quieter, and requires thercr 
fore less attention on the part of religion. But I 
caimot conceive why the subjective paradise should 
be closed against those whom our religion proclaims 
most qualified to merit admission, I do not, how- 
ever, see how women should, as a general rule, have 
this individual incorporation ; for it must, in all case^ 



PRIVATE WORSHIP. 137 

it seems to me, be the result of a public'life ; whereas 
public life is wisely forbidden our sex, except in 
very rare cases. „ 

The Friest, — You will supply, my daughter, this 
serious defect, when you consider that the incorpora- 
tion of the man includes all the worthy auxiliaries 
of every true servant of Humanity, not even 
excepting the animals who have contributed their 
aid. 

The most important duty of woman is to form 
and perfect man. It would be, then, as absurd as 
it would be unjust to honour a good citizen, and 
neglect to honoiir the mother, the wiib, to whom 
his success was mainly due. Around, and at times 
within, each consecrated tomb, the priesthood will 
be bound to collect, in the name of Humanity, all 
the individuals who helped its inmate, *while alive, 
to perform the services she rewards. Your sex, by 
its superior organization, can taste more keenly the 
pure enjoyment that results from the mere growth 
and exercise of good feelings; but it should not, 
therefore, renounce its claim to just praise — much 
less should it renounce the subjective immortality 
whose value it so thoroughly appreciates. 

The Woman, — This explanation completes your 
previous ones. It remains for me, my father, to 
ask you, wherein lies the obligation for each to re- 
ceive our different sacraments 1 

The Priest, — ^They must always, my daughter, be 
purely optional, so far as any legal obligation is 
concerned. They bind a man; but they bind him 



138 FIBST PABT. 

with a simply moral obligation, the existence of 
which is proved by our education and sanctioned 
by opinion. 

The better to preserve this their purely spiritual 
character, on which more than anything else they 
depend for their efficiency, our sacraments mustggiot 
be the only ones accessible. Side by side with 
them there shoidd be parallel institutions, estar- 
blished and maintained by the temporal power, and 
these last alone can be eufgrced in every case. The 
judgment of the temporal power, less discrimi* 
nating and less strict, will dispense with the reli- 
gious rites tn the case of those who may feel alarm ' 
at them, and who yet can render society services / 
which it would be a pity to lose or impair. ' " 

■"For instance, we must not look on civil marriage 
as an anarchical institution, though it is of revolu* 
tionary origin. It is to be regarded as the ' neces- 
sary preliminary for a religious marriage, and it 
may dispense legally with this latter. The con- 
trary custom was the result of an usurpation on the 
part of Catholicism, which Positivism will 'never 
imitate. Those who shrink from the law of widow- 
hood, essential to the performa^Lce of a Positivist 
marriage, must contract a civil union, to preserve 
them from vice and secure the legal rights of their 
children. The same holds good, though in a less 
degree, for most of our social sacraments, especially 
for admission and destination. The priesthood 
ought, in case of need, to urge the Government to 
institute legal rules with the object of moderating 



fUBLIC WOESHIP. 139 

the just strictness of our religious prescriptions. 
The observance of our sacraments will never be en- 
forced, nor will it ever have any other reward than 
that of conscience and opinion. 



CONVEKSATION V. 
PUBLIC WORSHIP. 

Tke Woman. — ^We ai;e now entering on the direct 
Btudj of our pubhc worship. I must, at the outset, 
submit to you, my father, the answer which I have 
given of myself to criticisms which i have heard 
directed against the whole of our solemn adora* 
tions. Superficial but honest, such critics urge that 
e^ch Positivist is in fact glorifying himself when 
h© is paying honour to a being which is of neces- 
sity composed of its own worshippers. Our private 
worship is in no way open to this r^roach. It 
can only apply to the direct worship of Humanity, 
especially where that worship takes the shape of a 
collective homage. We can meet it by stating the 
true idea of the Supreme Being. Humanity Is, in 
the main, composed of subjective existences, of the 
dead, not of the living. They who testify their 
gratitude to her, are fti no way certain, as a general 
rule, of being finally incorporated into her. All 
that they have is the hope of this reward. They 
expect to deserve it by a worthy life, the judgment 
on which, however, always rests with their suc- 
cessors. 



140 FIRST PABT. ^ > 

The Priest, — In setting your objectors right, you 
have kept close, my daughter, to the true spirit of 
our public worship. In it, the present glorifies the 
past, m order tbe better to prepare the future. The 
present disappears naturally in presence of these 
two immensities. Far from raising our pride, our 
solemn prayers have a constant tendency to inspire 
us with a true humility; for they make us pro- 
foundly conscious to what a degree, spite of our best 
collective efforts, we are incapable of ever paying to 
Humanity any but the very smallest part of that 
which she has given us. 

Ths Woman, — ^Before you explain the general 
outline of our public worship, would you, my 
father, give me an idea of the temples in which it is 
to be performed ? As for the ministering priest- 
hood, I am aware that the essential features of its 
constitution will be clearly pointed out when we 
come to the regime, . 

ThePtieat, — We cannot at present, my daughter, 
form an adequate conception of the temples of 
Positivism. Architecture is the most technical and 
the least esthetic of all the fine arts; so that each 
fresh synthesis finds its architectural expression 
more difficult than any other. Our religion must 
be not only thoroughly work^ out, but also widely 
spread, before the public wants can show what 
shape the edifices required must take. Provision- 
ally, then, we shall have to use the old churches, in 
proportion as they fall into disuse. This prelimi- 
nary period ought^ in our case, not to be so long as 



^ JdBLlC WORSHIP. 141 

f it was for Catholicism, which for many centuries 
wa.s confined to buildings of Polytheistic origin. 

The only general points that can at present be 
settled in this respect are, the situation and direc- 
tion of the buildiiJg. These are determined by the 
nature of the Positive worship. Humanity is, in 
the main, composed of such dead as are worthy of a 
future life, so^that her temples must be in the 
centre of the tombs of the elect. On the other 
hand, the chief attribute of Positive religion is its 
necessary universality. Everywhere, then, in all 
parts of the earth, th% temples of Humanity must 
turn towards the general metropolis. This, for a 
long time, as the result of past history, must be 
Paris. In this manner Positivism turns to account 
the idea, of which we find the rudiment in the 
Kebla of Islamism. We institute, as the Mahome- 
tans did, a common attitude for all true believers, 
and so bring into fuller light the touching solidarity 
of our free worship. ^ 

So fiir only can I go as to our sacred buildings. 
As for their internal arrangement, all we need at 
present attend to is the necessity of keeping the 
chief sanctuary for women duly chosen. So may 
the Priests of Humanity be always surrounded by 
those who are her befl^ representatives. 

Tha Woman, — Your last remark leads me, my 
father, to complete my former question, by asking 
you what are to be the symbols of our Divinity ? As 
it is within the province of painting and sculpture 
to give them a definite form, that shape may be 



142 FIRST PART. .. 

eafiier to appreciate than the construction of, our 
temples, as the two first arts of form are more rapid 
in their progress than the third. 

The Priest. — The nature of our Supreme Being 
really leaves, my daughter, no openrug. even, now 
for hesitation as to the plastic representation of her. 
In painting or in sculpture, equally, the symbol of 
our Divinity will always be a woman of the age of 
thirty, with h<?>r son in her arms. The pre-eminence, • 

religiously consiGft.^red, of the affective sex, ought to 
be the principal feature in our emblematic repre- 
sentation, whilst the activd^y^ei must remain under 
her holy guardianship. Gro'^ps with more figures 
might render the symbolic f^s^esentation more 
complete, but in such groups it wouM lose too much 
of its synthetic character to come int^^d^^ily use. 

Of the two modes which are -adapk©^ ^^r the 
expression of this normal symbol, sciifc*^"^ is 
suitable for the image fixed in each templei ^^ ^^^ 
midst of the women chosen as above men1Sp^®^>^ 
and behind the sacred desk. But painting is ^re- 
ferable for the moveable banners to be carr^^ 
before us in our solemn processions. On tU^ 
white side will be the holy image ; on their gree^ 
the sacred formula of Positivism. This green sideVy 
will be turned towards the pr^ession. \ 

The Woman, — ^As the last of my introductory 
questions, would you, my father, explain the sign 
which in ordinary use may represent the charac- 
teristic formula of Positivism 1 

The Priest, — We get this sign, my daughter, from 



PUBLIC WOKSHIP. 143 ^ 

our cerebral theor^^ as I shall explain when we 
study onr doctrine. When we repeat our funda- 
mental formula, we may place our hand in succes- 
sion on the three chief organs — those of love, order, 
and progress. The two first adjoin one another; 
the last is only separated from the other two by 
the organ of, veneration, the natural cement of the 
whole they together form ; so that the gesture 
may be continuous. When the habit is formed, 
we need not repeat the words — ^the gesture is enough. 
In the end, as the order by the cerebral organs indi- 
cates their functions, we may, in case of need, re- 
duce the sign to the simple mention, one after the 
other, of the numbers which represent those organs 
in our synopsis (0). So, without any arbitrary in- 
stitution. Positivism is already in possession of a 
sign for common use, more expressive than any of 
those adopted by Catholicism and Islamism. 

The TTowiow.-— Now, my father, I ought no longer 
to delay your entering on the direct explanation of 
the system of public worship. 

The Priest — ^You will find it, my daughter, fully 
expressed in the synopsis I here offer ybu. * {Table 
Ay cU the end of volume.) Our worship, like its 
predecessors, has two objects : these two are — 
to make us better understand, and better live 
the life which it repi'esents. We first, then, 
idealize the fundamental ties which constitute our 
existence ; secondly, the preparatory stages essential 
to it ; lastly, the functions of its various organs in 
the normal state. Such are to be respectively the 



144 PIBST PART. 

objects of the three systemB of monthly festivAls 
which fill up the Positivist year. That year is con- 
sequently divided into thirteen months, of four 
weeks each, with one complementary day set apart 
as the Festival of the Dead. 

You already know the four fundamental classes — 
the affective, speculative, patrician, and plebeian 
class — ^which are essential to society in its normal 
form. As for the preparatory stages, we could not 
without confusion condense them more than we 
have done, so profound are the differences, both 
intellectual and social, which must always distin- 
guish fetichism, polytheism, and monotheism, even 
in the spontaneous initiation of every Positivist. 
With regard to the primary relations which are the 
bonds of society, we must begin by celebrating the 
most universal We then honour, in tum^ each of 
the private affections which alone can ensure the 
first a real consistency. These elementary rela- 
tions are really five in number — marriage, the rela- 
tion of parent to child, of child to parent, that 
of brothers, and the domestic relation, or that of 
master and servant — and we rank them, in obedience 
to our hierarchical principle, by their inorease in 
point of generality, their decrease in intimacy. 

The number of months in the Positivist year has 
at first sight an appearance of paradox. It is sanc- 
tioned by a correct estimate of the religious grounds 
on which it rests. Bepeated experience has, more- 
over, shown that there will be no difficulty in intro- 
ducing it simultaneously with the fiiith. Again, 



' PUBLIC WOESHIP. 145 

the TJniyersal religion alone can secure regalaritj in 
point of time by its exact division of each month 
into four periods of a week each. However great 
the practical advantages of such an an*angement, it 
. would not be adopted, were it not that our worship 
\ does not allow us to hesitate, as mere material reasons 
would do. 

The W<yincm, — On a first view, I see, my father, 
no serious difficulty in your synopsis of sociolatry, 
except as regards the domestic relation. You seem 
to me to exaggerate its importance, when you place 
it in that scheme as one of the fundamental bonds 
of society. 

The Friest — ^Your objection reminds me, my 
daughter, that you belong by birth to the north, 
although happily preserved from Protestantism. 
For the southern nations of Western Europe retain, 
* in this respect, more perfectly the true feelings of 
the race, so nobly developed in the Middle Ages. 

The domestic relation is not destined to pass 
away. Far from it, it will become more and more 
important, as it more completely clears itself of all 
trace of its original form, slavery. When once it 
has become completely voluntary, it will furnish 
many families with the best means of rendering 
worthy service to the Supreme Being. They may 
serve Humanity by assisting her true servants, 
whether philosophical or practical. Such assist- 
ance is indispensable. Thus they indirectly share 
in promoting the public good. Yet though indirect, 
their participation is more complete and less uncer- , 
L 



146 FIBST PABT. 

tain than that of most whose co-operation is direct. 
It may be made also more efficient in the ctdtiya* 
tion of our best feelings. We restrict it within .too 
narrow limits when we confine it to certain classes. 
In all ranks of society, above all in the proletariate, 
every citizen passed through this condition, whilst his 
practical education lasted. We must then idealize ' 
the domestic relation as the complement of the family 
relations, and the first step towards those of citizens. 

The Woman, — My heart wanted, my Either, 
nothing but this rational correction of an intellect 
tual error, to enable it to rise above my anarchical 
prejudices. They prevented me from fraternizing, 
as I should have done, with the nobler types of this 
class. Such types are not uncommon, especially 
among women, though they are not appreciated. 
Your explanation will have a wholesome effect on 
me. I only wish one more and that a general one, 
in respect to the other end of our scheme of socio* 
latry. I cannot but think you have inverted the 
positions of the patriciate and proletariate. Political 
considerations may rank them in the order -given, 
on the principle of their material power. But re* 
ligion classes men on the principle of moral worth, 
and ought, it seems to me, to arrange them differently. 

The FHest. — You forget, my daughter, that in 
Positive religion there must be an exact correspon- 
dence between the worship and the rigime. But 
I easily excuse your mistake, by the nobleness of its 
motive. At times I have thought as you do, from 
allowing too much weight to the extremely imperfect 



PUBLIC WOBSHIP. 147 

state of the actual patriciate, so ofben unworthy of 
its high social destination. Beal superiority of the 
brain, moral superiority even more than intellec- 
tual^ is, at the present day, f&r more widely spread, in 
proportion, among the working classes. For they have 
escaped the degrading influences of education and 
'power. Still, though we must carefully take into ac- 
^ oount this exceptional state of things as a fact beyond 
dispute, when we are arranging the transitional 
orga^ization of Western Europe, we must not the 
less be able systematically to put it aside when we 
are constructing the abstract worship of Humanity, 
destined mainly for the use of the race in its 
normal state. If we look too much to the present 
and not enough to the future, we should certainly be 
led to place even the priesthood below the prole- 
tariate. For the priesthood is actually far more 
imperfect than the patriciate, whether you choose 
to judge it as it exists among the scattered ruins of 
theological belief qr in its rudimentary state amid 
the doctrines of metaphysics and science. 

In the Positive "Worship, as in the normal ex- 
istence of which' it is the ideal expression, tfa<6 
patrician worthy of his position is higher, as a 
general rule, than the plebeian, as much in true 
nobleness as in real power. As we rank the classes 
of men by their aptitude to represent the Great 
Being, the importance and diJ£oulty of the peculiar 
service rendered by the patrician class, as well 
as the education required and the responsibility 
involved, always place it above the proletariate. 
L 2 



148 FIBST PART. 

It is^ in fact, in the name of this higher rank 
that the wisdom of the priesthood, properly aided 
by the sanction of women and the support of 
the people, must remind the * patricians, whether 
singly or collectively, of their eternal social duties, 
in cases of serious neglect. But these remonstrances 
must be exceptions, and they would fail of their 
main object, if the normal worship did not pay 
sufficient honour to the necessary ministers of our 
material providence. By placing the proletariate at 
the lower extremity of the social scale, the worship 
reminds the proletaries that their charact-eristic 
aptitude to control and correct all the powers of 
society is the result of their situation — a situation 
essentially passive, and developing no marked ten- 
dency. Our saci*ed synopsis, then, like the regime 
which it represents, must place the two great powers, 
the spiritual and the temporal, between women and 
the proletaries — the two bodies which exercise a 
constant iufluence on the sentiments and conduct 
of those powers. If the patriciate were placed 
lower, it would be a breach of the harmony of the 
Positive system, quite as much in reference to 
sociolatiy as to sociocracy. 

The Woman, — I am sufficiently familiar already 
with the system of public worship for you to ex- 
plain to me, my father, your weekly division of the 
thirteen monthly festivals. This last development 
gives each week its general festival. This must be a 
great help to secure the moral object of our worship 
of Humanity. For by this means Humanity is 



PUBLIC WORSHIP. 149 

constantly recurring under widely varied aspects, 
but aspects which, though varied, are convergent. 

The Priest, — Before I enter on this explanation, 
my daughter, I should say that Positivism retains 
unchanged the established names for the days of 
the weet I had thought of substituting others ; 
but I have given up the attempt, and there 
will be no trace left of it except a beautiful series 
of prayers by M. Joseph Lonchampt, for each day of 
the week. The old names have the advantage of 
recalling the whole of the past, in its three stages 
of fetichism, polytheism, and monotheism.* 

To make our worship completely regular, it was 
necessary, my daughter, that each day of any week 
whatever should always hold the same place in the 
year. This invariability is obtained by affixing no 
weeklj^name, first, to the complementary day which 
always closes the Positivist year, then to the 
additional day which follows it if it is leap-year, 
according to-the practice of Western Europe. Each 
of these exceptional days is really sufficiently 
marked by the festival appointed for it. Wi^h this 
precaution, our calendar holds good for all years — a 
point as important for the regime as for the worship. 

The Woman, — I can easily conceive, my father, 
the moral efficacy of such invariability, by which 
each day of our year might receive, as the last day 
does, a name purely religious. Catholicism was 
never able to secure this as a rule. 



* See PoL Pos. voh iv. pp. 135, 404. 



150 FIBST PABT. 

The Priest — This preliminary settled, I may, my 
daughter, begin to state directly in their order the 
solemn ceremonies appointed for the seventh day in 
each week. Your synopsis of sociolatry shows you 
how the idea which each month commemorates is 
divided between the four weekly festivals. All I 
have to do is to state the grounds of this division, 
and to make it clear by some summary explanations. 

Our first month, dedicated to Humanity, needs 
little in this respect. We open the Positivist year 
by the most august of all our festivals — a direct 
homage to the Supreme Being. The four weekly 
festivals are the complement of this main one. In 
them we respectively do honour to the various 
essential forms of the social union. They rank 
according to the decrease of extension, and the in- 
crease of intimacy, in the relations of the race. The 
first festival honours the bond of religion, the only 
one that admits of being universal; the second 
glorifies the connexion due to old political relations. 
These have disappeared, but not without leaving 
strongs traces in a community of language and 
poetry. In the third, we celebrate directly the 
effective union springing from the free acceptance 
of one and the same government. The fourth 
honours the least extended but the most complete 
of our civil relations. In it the habit of fstmiliar 
association brings us nearest to the family union. 

Passing to the month consecrated to marriage, 
its first solemnity glorifies the conjugal union in its 
completest form, when it is at once exclusive and 



PUBLIC WORSHIP. 151 

indissoluble, even by death. The priesthood must 
take this occasion to bring home, both to our heart 
and intellect, the general adyance of this admirable 
institution, the primary basis of the whole order of 
man. It must enumerate and explain all its es- 
sential phases, from the polygamy which originally 
prevailed down to the strictest monogamy, the 
Positivist marriaga 

In the following festival we honour the voluntary 
chastity which weighty moral or physical reasons 
may prescribe, even in marriage. The capital 
object of marriage, the mutual improvement of both 
sexes, oomes out more clearly in such an union. 
Nor does this exceptional union oblige them, who 
are bound by it, to renounce the affections that 
concern the futura These may be secured by a 
judicious adoption. The priesthood will bring out 
into suitable relief the tendency of such an union to 
control human procreation. It allows the benefits 
of marriage where otherwise inherited disease would 
forbid them. . 

The third week of marriage leads us to ^onour 
the exceptional unions in which a disparity, not 
without excuse, does not preclude the attainment 
of the main object of marriage, especially when 
in the final state opinion shall fix a limit to the 
difference of age allowed. Lastly, the fourth fes- 
tival honours the posthumous union, which will 
often be. the result of the normal constitution 
of human marriage. The truest charm of mar- 
riage is often strengthened and developed by the 



152 FIBST PABT. 

purity and constancy that distinguish subjective 
love. 

One explanation will suffice for the three follow^ 
ing mouths, for their weekly subdivisions are 
naturally the same. For the £rst of them, the first 
half is devoted to the paternal relation in its com* 
plete form, first when involuntary, next in the case 
of adoption ; the second half is reserved for the 
same relation when incomplete, a relation such as 
that which in every regular society results from 
spiritual authority or temporal patronage. Hence 
spring, in a descending order, the four normal de- 
grees of paternal affection, respectively honoured 
in the four weekly festivals of the third Positivist 
month. Now the same distinctions and gradations 
necessarily recur in the case of the relation of chil-* 
dren to their parents, or of brothers to one another. 
So I may dispense with any first explanation for 
the fourth and fifth months. 

As for the sixth, it begins by honouring the 
domestic relation when permanent. This will 
always^ mark off a very numerous, but still a special 
class. Next we honour the analogous position in 
which each man, as a rule, finds himself during his 
practical education. The first case requires for 
clearness an important subdivision, the distinction 
of which is residence. The domestic relation is 
complete in the case of the servant proper, or in- 
complete in that of the clerk who has simply to 
perform a certain office. When the manners of the 
normal state shall have made domestic service, espe* 



PUBLIC WOBSHIP. 153 

ciallj that of women, consistent with the full 
development of family affection, Positive worship 
will show the real moral superiority of the first 
position, for in it the spirit of devotion is purer 
and more keen. The same distinction is applicable, 
though in a less marked degree, to temporary ser« 
vice, and is there again determined by residence. 
Hence the two last festivals of the sixth month, 
respectively devoted to pages and to apprentices, 
according as the masters are rich or poor. 

The Womom* — ^Tn all these details of the different 
fundamental relations of society, I find, my father, 
no difficulty. But I am a&aid that my weakness 
in history will prevent my fully understanding the 
second series of social festivals; for the preparatory 
state of them, as a whole, is as yet only known to 
me by the first law of evolution. 

The Friest — ^That law is enough, my daughter, 
to enable you even now to understand, in outline, 
the succession of the three preliminary states men-* 
tioned in our synopsis of sociolatry. As for the 
weekly division of each of those states, you will, it 
is true, hardly be able to enter into it till after the 
historical conversation with which I shall end this 
Catechism. I limit myself, therefore, to the co- 
ordination of the chief divisions. I leave it to you 
to complete it for yourself, when you shall have 
gained the requisite knowledge. 

The fictitious synthesis, in all cases resting on the 
search after causes, may take two forms, according 
as the will, to which events are attributed, is inhe- 



IH riBST PABT. 

rent in matter itself, or in beings external to 
matter, but which are usually beyond the reach of 
our sensea Now the first or direct form, whii^ 
is of more spontaneous growth than any other, is 
the initial stage, or fetichism ; whereas the second 
or indirect form marks the theological state which 
follows. But this last state, less simple and less 
lasting than the firsts offers a succession of two dis- 
tinct constitutions, according as the Grods are nume- 
rous or are condensed into one. Theologism, which 
is after all but an immense transition from Fetich- 
ism to Positivism, takes its rise in Fetichism in 
its polytheistic form, and leads to Positivism in its 
monotheistic. Fill up this outline of the philoso^ 
phical advance of our race by the corresponding 
social progress, and you have the whole initiation 
of man adequately expressed, as you will soon feeL 

You will then be able to see how well adapted is 
our second series of social festivals to pay due 
-honour to all the essential phases of this long pre> 
;paration, from the first forward movement of the 
.smallest tribes down to the twofold development of 
"the modern stage of transition* This full celebra- 
tion of the past of man, in twelve weekly festivals, 
is the result of the historical condensation which 
the abstract worship by its nature allows. 

The Wo9ncm,-^We can now then, my father, enter 
on the last series of our social festivals. The month 
dedicated to women, or the moral providence of the 
race, offers me no difficulty, for I see the dearly- 
marked distinction between the types chosen from 



PUBLIC WOBSHIP. 155 

women to represent its fonr weekly festivals. But 
I am at a loss as yet as to the division of the 
sacerdotal montL 

The Priest, — Take for your guide, my daughter, 
the different forma or degrees of the Positive priest- 
hood, ranked according to their increasing complete- 
ness. This great ministry calls for a rare union of 
moral qualities, both those of action and of affection, 
with intellectual ability, both for art and science. 
If this last alone is remarkable, its possessors, 
after proper cultivation, must be, perhaps for ever, 
mere pensionaries of the spiritual power ; they must 
never aspire to be incorporated into it. In these 
eases, which are fortunately exceptional, the finest 
genius for poetry or philosophy cannot supply the 
place of tenderness and energy in a functionary who 
must, habitually feel the warmest sympathy, and 
who has offcen to engage in difficult struggles. This 
incomplete form of priesthood allows for the due 
cultivation of all true talent without endangering 
the service of society. 

As for the complete priesthood, the first requisite 
is a preparatory stage, beyond which the candidate 
will not proceed, i^ in spite of his announcement of 
his vocation, he does not successfully pass through 
the proper novitiate. After this decisive trial, at 
thirty-five he obtains directly and definitively the 
priesthood But during seven years he must remain 
in the subordinate position which marks the vicar 
or substitute. When he has duly gone through all 
the steps of our encyclopedic teaching, and, within 



156 FIBBT PABT. 

certain limits, performed the other fonctions of the 
priest, he reaches, at the age of forty-two, the chief 
degree ; he then becomes irrevocably a priest in the 
fullest sense. Such are the fomr classes of the theo- 
retical body, honoured respectively in the four 
weekly festivals of the eleventh month. 

The Woman. — ^The next month, my £i,ther, re- 
quires no particular explanation. I am not familiar 
with active life, but the definiteness which charao- 
terizes it enables me fully to understand the normal 
division of the patrician body into four essential 
classes, ranked on the principle of the decreasing 
generality of their functions and the increaaing 
number of functionaries. Perhaps even, in our 
anarchical period, women are better qualified than 
the proletaries, and still more than their teachers, 
to appreciate rightly this natural hierarchy. For 
they are more thoroughly preserved from the dis- 
turbing influences of passion, and from sophistical 
views. I am glad, then, that the four weekly 
festivals of our twelfth month yearly honour, and, 
by honouring, give a moral character to these four 
different and necessary forms of the material power 
on which rests the whole economy of society. But 
I am not so clear as to the divisions of the last 
month. 

The Priest, — ^That division depends, my daughter^ 
on the character of generality which attaches natu- 
rally to the proletariate, in which all the great 
attributes of Humanity require a distinct ideal 
expression* This immense social body, the necea* 



' PUBLIC WOBSfilP. 157 

saiy stock of all q)ecial classes — is mainly devoted 
to active life, and active life is the direct object of 
the first weekly festival of the plebeian month. 
Next to the active proletariate, we must pay a 
separate tribute to the affective proletariate, which 
is its necessary accompaniment. Without this 
special tribute to the women of the proletary class, 
the general celebration of the types of women 
remains incomplete; for in the tenth month we 
considered them from a point of view which em- 
braced all classes — ^here they are viewed in especial 
reference to their popular action. 

The third festival of our thirteenth month must 
find fit means for duly honouring the contemplative 
class of proletaries; especially those who are ar- 
tistic, or even scientific. They have not been able 
to gain admission into a priesthood whose numbers 
must of course be limited, and yet they feel them- 
selves more adapted to theory than practice. We 
shall have at times to pity these exceptional types; 
in all cases we must respect them : so only can we 
make them properly useful by wisely guiding their 
natural tendencies. From them principally must 
come the general control exercised by the prole- 
tariate over the special depositaries of power, 
whereas the impulse which the same body ought to 
give requires men of a more active nature. 

Finally, the last festival of our popular month 
honours mendicity, whether temporary or perma- 
nent. Improve society to the utmost, still you 
never reach the point where this, the extreme con- 



158 I1B8T PART. 

sequence of tbe peculiar imperfections of practical 
life, shall cease. So the ideal expression of our 
social state would be incomplete unless the priesir^ 
hood closed it by the just appreciation of this ex- 
ceptional form of existence. Where there is ade- 
quate justification and proper conduct, such an ex- 
istence deserves the sympathy, at times even the 
praise, of all honourable minds. More fi actuating 
than any other, this complementary class naturally 
connects with all ranks of society. They must in 
time draw from it and feed it. It thus becomes 
well qualified to develop the general influence of 
the proletariate on all the powers of society. It 
would then be as great an act of improvidence as of 
injustice not to give mendicants a sepai^ate notice 
in our idealization. 

The W<nrum, — As for the complementary day, I 
see, my father, why Positivism places at the end of 
our year the collective festival of the dead happily 
introduced by Catholicism. This touching com- 
memoration would, if it had occurred in the midst 
of our public worship, have disturbed its normal 
economy. Placed as it is, it is the proper comple- 
ment of the whole, and the natural preparation for 
the recurrence of the yearly order. It was fitting 
that the festival peculiar to the Supreme Being 
should be preceded by the glorification of all its 
organs without exception. 

The additional day in leap-year is equally easy. 
My sex can scarcely ever deserve an individual 
and public apotheosis. So' the abstract system of 



PUBLIC WORSHIP. 159 

worship, without degenerating into a concrete wor- 
ship, was bound to pay this honour, collectively, 
to women who deserve an individual celebration. 
The ideal expression of human existence is thus 
completed, by the honour paid to the right use of 
the various exceptional qualities that woman's na- 
ture allows, when its more important characteristics 
are kept unimpaired. 

The Priest, — ^As you have of yourself, my daughter, 
satisfactorily fioished the explanation of our public 
worship, we have reached the end of the first part 
of our Catechism. We must now return to the study 
of the doctrine, the central idea of which was given 
uk^lIeTntroduction. 
/^HElfitr worship, Positivism appears as the religion 
/ of Love. Humanity, the highest object of that 
love, it was necessary to explain before the worship. 
In its doctrine, to which we now proceed. Positivism 
will appear as the religion of order. In the subse- 
quent treatment of the regime^ we shall see that it 
alone is the religion of progress, and, in particular, 
of the moral progress of the human race. 



$tm)i ^att. 



CONVERSATION VT. 
THE DOCJTRINE. 

The Woma/n, — You have already ez])]ained to 
me, my father, in the second conversation of onr 
Introduction, the Great Being whom we worship-;— 
Humanity. In the three following conversations, 
you have given an exposition of the worship we pay 
her. I ask you now to show me how the whole 
system of Positive doctrine may be systematically 
grouped around Humanity, its central unity. 

The Priest — First of all, my daughter, you mv^ 
give up all idea of attaining to an absolute, external, 
or, in one word, an objective unity. This will be 
easier for you than for the learned. The wish for 
such an objective unity was compatible with the 
inquiry into causes. It is in direct contradiction 
with the study of laws; for by laws we mean in- 
variable relations traced in widely varying phe- 
nomena. These relations admit of no unity but a 
purely relative and human one; in one word, a 
subjective unity. In fact, laws cannot be reduced 
to unity, cannot be spoken of in the singular, by 
virtue of the impossibility that notoriously exists of 



THE DOCTRINE. 161 

reducing under the other either of the two general 
elements of all our conceptions of things, the world 
and man. It is conceivable that we might succeed 
in cob^ensing each of these two great objects of 
study around one single law of nature. Still, as 
even then the two must remain separate, scientific 
unity ia unattainable. The knowledge of the world 
presupposes man as the being who has that know- 
ledge. But the world could exist without man, as 
is perhaps the case with many stars which are not 
fit for man to live id. So again, though man is 
dependent on the world, he is in no sense its 
necessary result. All the efforts of materialists to 
do away with spontaneous vital action, by exagge- 
rating the preponderating influence of the material 
environment on organized beings, have ended in 
nothing but the discrediting the inquiry.^ It is as 
useless as it is idle; for the future it ^ould be 
abandoned to minds of an unscientific character. 

Further than this, we are far from being able to 
establish any objective unity even within the 
limits of each general element of the dualism above 
mentioned, the dualism of the world and man. 
The various branches into which the study of the 
world or of man is, for practical need, divided, 
reveal to us an increasing number of different laws. 
These laws will never be susceptible of reduction, 
the one under the other, spite of the frivolous hopes 
inspired at first by our discovery of the law of 
planetary gravitation. These laws are for the 
most part still unknown ; many must ever remain 

M 



162 SECOBTD PABT. 

SO. Still, we know enough to guarantee against all 
danger tlie fundamental dogma of Positivisif -the 
subjection, viz., of all phenomena of whatever order 
to invariable relations. The existing order, the 
result of the whole combination of the laws of 
nature, bears the general name of fate or chance ; 
fate, if the laws are known to us — chance, if they 
are unknown. This distinction will always remain, 
of great practical importance, since the ignorance 
of these laws is, for our action, equivalent to their 
non-existence. For it precludes all rational pre- 
vision, and as a consequence any regular inter- 
ference. Still we may hope to discover, for each 
of the more important cases, empirical rules which, 
insufficient from the theoretic point of view, may 
be sufficient to keep us fix)m disorderly action. 

In th§ midst of this growing divergence, the 
dogma of Humanity gives unity to our conceptions, 
the only unity that can be given, the only bond 
I that we really need. To form a right conception 
I of the nature and formation of this unity, you 
must distinguish three kinds of laws, physical, in- 
tellectual, and moral. The first, by their nature, 
belong to the sex adapted for action ; the last to 
the sex in which affection is predominant. The 
intermediate laws are the peculiar province of the 

1 priesthood. Its task is, to reduce to a system the 
joint action of the two sexes, and so it shares the 
life of both. The priesthood is both active and 
affective,, though not so active as practical men, not 
so affective as women. Hence it is that the physical 



THE DOCTKINE. 163 

4nd moral laws have always been cultivated em- 
piric" My. The physical and moral wants of men 
must be met. But the success attained was widely 
different in the two cases. Physical laws are, in 
reality, independent of moral laws. Within the 
province, then, of physical laws, men could arrive 
at isolated convictions which, though incoherent, 
were firm. On the contrary, as moral laws cannot 
be independent of physical laws, women, in this 
their peculiar province, could construct no system 
of real stabilityi Their efforts were only valuable . 
for their influence on the affections. Naturally, 
then, it was within the sphere of physical laws that 
sound theoretical cultivation originated; and it 
was attainable by keeping clear of the details of 
action. As, however, moral laws are the ultimate 
object of all sound meditation, a logical and scien- 
tific unity was unattainable, unless some adequate 
connexion of physics and morals could be found. 
The intermediate domain, naturally connected^ 
with each of the two, offers the only bond of 
connexion. So, ultimately, the construction of 
a true theoretic unity depends on a sufficient 
elaboration of the peculiar laws of man's under- 
standing. 

The Wonicm, — Your conclusion seems a difficult 
one to get at ; yet I feel no difficulty, my father, in 
at once admitting it. In meditating on moral sub- 
jects, I have often been led to feel that a knowledge 
of the laws of the intellect is indispensable. Con- 
sistent action seems hopeless without it. For the 
m2 



164 SECOND PART. f^ 

peculiar laws of the function that judges are in«- 
separable from those of the function that is judged. 
Men, however, would be less sensible of this con- 
nexion in the case of the physical laws which form 
the especial object of men's attention. As, th^i, I 
admit your conclusion, you may pass on, without 
further preamble, to the direct exposition of these 
laws of the mind on which all systematic unity 



The Priest, — ^These laws, my daughter, I must 
. at once, here as elsewhere, class under two heads.. 
They are statical and dynamiccUf according as they 
have reference to the invariable element in the 
object under consideration, or as they apply to its 
necessary variations. These two correlative terms 
are become indispensable to any really serious ex- 
position of Positivism. It will soon bring them 
into popular use. Not that they can ever have for 
your sex the moral attraction, which you will soon 
I* learn to feel towards the terms objective and atUh- 
jective, the ultimate destination of which is to ex- 
press in all their shades our sweetest and best 
emotions. But though purely intellectual, tiie two 
former terms must be valued on account of their 
scientific utility. For the rest, these two pairs of 
philosophical expressions are the only ones that I 
am necessitated to require you to accept. 

The preceding explanation renders it easy for you 
to see, that in the case of any department whatever 
of human study, the statical question necessarily 
precedes the dynamical. This last is impossible 



1^^ 



^ THE DOCTRINE. 165 

without the other. It is absolutely necessary, in 
&ct, to have determined what are the fundamental 
conditions of any existence!, before you can pass to 
the consideration of the dijSerent states in which 
that existence successively appears. The ancients, 
seeing as they did no tendency to change anywhere, 
were completely without any dynamical concep- 
tions, even in mathematics. Whereas Aristotle, the 
eternal prince of all true philosophers, was able 
even then to lay down the laws essential for the 
study of all the highest branches of knowledge, life, 
intellect, and society, so £9ir as such study was 
statical. Such is the necessary course of things — 
the statical must precede the dynamical, but it is 
incomplete without the dynamical. A merely sta- 
tical appreciation can never be anything but pro- 
visional, it cannot form a competent guide for 
action. If it stood alone, it would lead us in action 
into serious errors, especially in the more important 



The statical law of our understanding is, in 
Positivism, simply an application of that funda- 
mental principle of the system which looks on man 
as in all cases subordinate to the world. In fact, it 
consists in. the constant subordination of our sub- 
jective constructions to the objective materials of 
those constructions. The geniusof Aristotle sketched 
it in outline in his admirable general statement : — 
There is nothing in the understcmding that did not 
originally spring from sensation. The modems often 
pressed this axiom too far. They represented our 



V 



166 SECOND PART. 

intelligenoe as purely pasHlve. This compelled the 
great Leibnitz to add an essential restriction> The 
object of that restriction was, definitely to express 
the spontaneous character of our mental dispositions. 
Leibnitz* addition, except the understanding, limited 
in reality to the clearer development of Aristotle's 
maxim, was completed by Kant, Kant intro- 
duced the distinction, never to be forgotten, between 
objective and subjective reality, both equally appli- 
cable to all man's conceptions. Still the principle 
had not received its full systematic value. Posi- 
tivism gave it that value by connecting it with the 
general law which, in all vital phenomena, considers 
every organism as in a constant dependence on the 
sum of external influences. With regard to our 
highest spiritual functions, equally as with regard 
to our most corporeal ones, the external world serves 
us both for nourishment, stimulus, and control. So 
viewed, the subordination of the subjective to the 
''•bbjective no longer stands isolated, and at the same 
time Positive Philosophy supplies its necessary 
complement, without which the study, from the 
statical point of view, of our intellect, could not 
have been brought into really close connexion with 
the dynamical. The complement I mean, consists 
in recognising the fact that, in the normal state, 
our subjective conceptions are always less vivid and 
less clear than the objective impressions from which 
they rise. Were it otherwise, the world without 
could exert no controlling influence over the world 
within. V 



THE DOCTRIKE. 167 

(S.rry out these two statical principles, and you 
see tl^t all our conceptions whatever are the neces- 
sary result of an uninterrupted intercourse between 
the world and man, the world supplying the mate- 
rials, man shaping them. They aife* deeply stamped 
with the relative character, relative both to the 
subject and the object. As these vary respectively, 
so necessarily are the conceptions modified. Our 
great merit, in the scientific point of view, consists 
in bringing this natural subordination of man to 
the world to the highest point of perfection. At 
this point, the brain becomes the fiiithful mirror 
of the actual order of outward things, and the 
future consequences of that order then admit of 
prevision, if the powers of the mind are rightly 
exercised. But the representation of the outward 
order is not, and is not required to be, absolutely 
exact. The degree in which it approximates to 
perfect exactness is determined by our practical 
wants. They give us the standard of precision 
desirable for our theoretical previsions. Within 
this necessajy limit, there' is generally left for .our 
intellect^a certain degree of liberty in speculation. 
This liberty it should use to secure adequate satis- 
faction for its own inclinations, whether in the 
direction of science, or even of the fine arts. 
This it may do by giving to our conceptions greater 
regularity, greater beauty even, without in any 
degree interfering with their truth. Such is, under 
it» mental aspect. Positivism. It is always occupied 
with the pursuit of laws. It holds its way between 



168 SECOND PAto. 

two paths of equal danger, that of mysticism^ 
which insists on arriving at causes ; that of empi-^ 
ricism, which insists on a rigid adherence to these 
facts. 

The TTonion:,— There seems to me, my father, 
one serious omission in this statical theory of man's 
intellect. It seems solely to have reference to the 
state of reason properly so called. It does not 
seem capable of embracing madness; and yet it 
ought to explain this not less than the other. 
Actual life, as we daily see it, offers us so many 
nicely shaded degrees between these' two states of 
mind, that all the cases ought to obey the same 
laws essentially. The only difference ought to be 
one of degree, as in the case of our bodily fnnc« 
tions. 

The Priest, — ^A more attentive consideration of 
the doctrine set forth will enable you, my daughter, 
to see that it does really contain the true theory 
of madness and ofidiocy. These are two extreme 
states of the mind, and each violates the due pro- 
portion which the sound state, or reason, requires to 
exist between the objective impressions ^and the 
subjective conceptions. Idiocy consists in the 
excess of objectivity. In it our brain is too passive. 
Madness, properly so called, consists in the excess 
of subjectivity, and is the consequence of an undue 
activity of the brain. The mean state itself in which 
reason consists, varies according to the regular 
variations to which human existence in every foim is 
subject, whether it be the society or the individual; 



THE DOCTRINE. 1 69 

('"'Vb form, a sound judgment on madness is a most^ 

! delicate operation, the more so as we muBt take 

^> into account time and place, and generally difference 

of situation, as is so clearly shown by the admirable 

\ composition of the great CervaiAes. It is in 

', reference to madness that we gain the clearest per- 

1 caption of the extent to which the statical study of 

i the intellect remains incomplete, if it do notA^ceive 

ithe complement of the dynamical study. 

\ The Woman. — I would follow up this striking 

^reflection, my &ther, and if you think proper, I 

Would At once eni^er on this dynamical study, as 

the complement of the statical. For it appears, 

^hat without it I cannot by my own meditatiotts 

fbrm a proper cbnception of the whole of th^^eat 

s|)eotacle offered me by the intellect. The opinions 

of men may vary, but it can never in any case be 

to the degree of becoming purely arbitrary, though 

li may not be able in any way to trace their general 

line of march. 

■ The Priest, — Every theoretical conception passes 
necessarily through three successive stages. The 
first is th% theological, or fictitious. The second, 
metaphysical, or abstract. The third, positive, or 
real. The first is always provisional The second 
simply transitional. The third albne is definitive. 
The difference of this last from the two former is 
qharacterized by its substitution of ther^tive_for 
the absolute , when ^at length the study of law s 
ha s taken the place of the in <g[u iry into_ cause8. 
There is, at bottom, no other difference between 



170 . SECOND PART. 

the two others, in point of theory, than this : that 
the deities recognised by the first are reduced by 
the second to mere entities, or abstractions. The 
fictions of theology, in consequence of this trans- 
formation, lose; together with their supernatural cha- 
racter, their strength and consistency. They become 
socially useless, and even mentally; metaphysics 
are atJfist nothing but simply a solvent of theology. 
They can never organize even within their own 
domain. Metaphysics are revolutionary in their 
character, and solely adapted for modifying previous 
systems. They have no othereflfect^in^the^rigmal 
ev olution, whether of the individ ual or of socie ty, 
fflit to facilit ate the gradua l pa ^ge from theolog y 
to^^Ht^lsml They are tEe Setter suited for this 
transitional office, firom the circumstance that their 
equivocal conceptions can take one or other of two 
shapes. ThBy may become either the abjstract 
representatives of supernatural agents, or general 
expressions for phenomena, according as the ficti- 
tious, or tKe real stage in our progress, is the one 
to which we are, for the time, the neaner. 

The Woman. — This dynamical law fi|^ds already 
sufficient confirmation in my own experience. Still, 
my &.ther, I desire to obtain as clear a view as pos- 
sible of the intellectual principle on which this 
evolution rests. 

Tlie Priest. — That principle, my daughter, is a 
consequence of the statical law by which we are 
obliged to draw upon ourselves for the means of 
subjectively connecting our objective impressions. 



THE DOCmUNE. 171 

Without this subjective connexion, these last would 
always be incoherent. The real relations of things 
require, for their perception, a difficult and gradual 
analysis, as I will explain to you; and therefore our 
first hypotheses were such as . naturally suggested 
themselves, consequently they were of a fictitious 
character. This general tendency, which would 
now be an excess of subjectivity, was at fiitt quite 
in conformity with our mental state. For the 
evolution could not begin unless some step of the 
kind were taken. Long experience — an experience 
which, however long, is even now not enough for 
the more backward — could alone show us the abso- 
lute uselessness of the inquiry into causes. Ttis 
useless problem exercised for a long time ^ in- 
vincible attraction, both in speculation and in 
action. In the former, it tempte^ us by the 
promise that we should always usS* the deductive 
method without requiring any special induction. 
In action, it held out to us the prospect of modify- 
ing the world at pleasure. This shows us that the 
two motives which originally impelled the thinker, 
are essentially coincident with those which will 
always guide to in our intellectual eflTorts. For the 
whole of sound logic is reducible to this one rule : 
always form the simplest hypothesis compatible 
with the whole of the data. Now the thinkers of 
the theological period, and even of the period of 
fetichism, applied this rule better than the greater 
part of our modem doctors, t'heir object being to 
arrive at causes, they limited themselves to explain- 



172 SECOND PART. 

ing the world by man, the only possible source of 
any theoretic unity. And their explanation con* 
sisted in attributing all its phenomena to the actiou 
of superhuman will. It was indifferent whether* 
that will resided in the phenomena or .was external 
to them. The problem they set themselves admits, 
by its very nature, only this solution — ^a far superior 
one to ^e misty fictions offered as solutions by our 
atheists or pantheists, whose state of mind is far 
nearer madness than the simplicity of the true 
feti6hist. The respective results of the two are 
enough to prove the superiority of the earlier solu- 
tion. German ontology is at the present d&y 
throwing itself, by a retrograde movement, on its 
Greel^ original. It has inspired no real and durable 
thought. The primitive theology, on the contrary, 
opened up to the human mind the only path which 
it could take under the conditions of the primitive 
state. True, it never could lead to any determina- 
tion of causes, but its provisional colligation of 
^ts led, by a natural process, to the discovery of 
laws. 

The study of laws was at first looked on as of 
quite secondary importance. It so^ tended, how- 
ever, to become the most important, owing to the 
impulse derived from our practical wants. It was 
seen to be more adapted for the prevision requisite 
for action. In strictness, minds of real eminence 
never sought for the cause except when they found 
it impossible to find (he law. In this case, no blame 
can attach to the course they adopted — it was more 



THE DOCTRINE. 173 

suited, than any torpor of the intellect could have 
been, to prepare the way for the ultimate discovery 
of the law. Our intelligence has even such a strong 
preference for Positive conceptions, especially on 
the ground of their superior practical value, that it 
often exerted itself to substitute them for the fictions 
of theology, long before the preparation required 
had been duly made. The opening period of our 
mental evolution is clear. The end which it will 
ultimately reach is still more free from doubt. 

The Womom, — ^The explanation you have given 
of your law of the three states leaves me, my 
father, on many points in a mist. For there are 
cases of frequent occurrence, in which the human 
mind seems to me at one and the same time to be 
theological, metaphysical, and positive, according 
to the nature of the question on which it is en- 
gaged. Leave this co-existence of the three unex- 
plained, and you compromise directly your dyna- 
mical law, which however appears to admit of no 
dispute. Would you set me free from this state of 
perplexity 1 

The Priest-^lt will disappear, my daughter, if 
you will pajr attention to the unvarying order 
observed by our theoretical conceptions in their 
simultaneous growth, according as the phenomena, 
with which they are concerned, decrease in gene- 
rality and increase in complication. Hence results 
a complementary law, without which the dynamical 
study of the mind of man womd continue obscure, 
and even of no value in application. It is easy*for 



174 .SECOND PART. 

.you to see, that as phenomena are necessarily more 
simple the more general they are, the speculations 
which concern such general phenomena must be 
easier, the progress in them naturally more rapid. 
That there is a graduated scale of phenomena and 
speculation is easily verified even in the different 
phases of theologism. It is more especially true of 
the positive stage, on account of the laborious pre- 
paration that stage requires. So you see how cer- 
tain theories remain in the metaphysical stage, 
whilst others of a simpler nature have already 
reached the positive stage ; others again, still more 
complicated, remain in the theological stage. But 
never do you find this process inverted, a sufficient 
answer to the objection arising from theii* disparity 
at any one time.. 

The order, which I have just shown to exist 
between our different conceptions, is the natural 
one. From it I shall shortly deduce the true ency- 
clopedic scale. By its aid alone can we thoroughly 
understand the general course of our conceptions. 
It is the basis of logic, for it reveals to us the con- 
nexion in which our different th^etical studies 
must follow one another, if they arero lead to any 
permanent construction. Each class of phenomena 
has, it is true, its special laws, which presuppose 
some particular inductions. Yet these inductions 
could never be of any real value were it not for the 
deductions previously supplied by the knowledge of 
simpler laws. This subjective subordination is the 
result of the objective dependence of the less 



THE DOCTRINE. 175 

general phenomena on those which are more 
general. So the unbroken series of our stiidies, 
beginning with the world and ending in man, rests 
on two grounds. First, for our logical training it 
is better to begin with the simrplest speculations. 
Secondly, in the order of science, the higher 
theories are dependent on the lower, the conse- 
quence of the subordination of the higher pheno- 
mena to the lower. 

The Woman, — ^You have now, my father, made 
clear to me the laws of our intellect, dynamical as 
well as statical. But as yet I do not see springing 
from them the construction I had expected. I had 
looked on them as forming the basis for the con- 
struction of the whole system of Positive doctrine. 
What I want then, is to be made, to see directly 
that Humanity, as an all-pervading idea, can bring 
all our theories into real unity, by connecting moral 
and physical laws through the intermedium of the 
intellectual. 

The Priest. — Your wish is a just one, my 
daughter, and shall be satisfied. Place yourself at 
a new point of view, and from it consider the com- 
plementary law of the intellectual movement which 
I have just stated. From this point of view, the 
law is, in an especial degree, subjective, as must be 
the law of which it is the complement. But you 
are aware also, that the classification I adopt ad- 
mits, by its own force, of an objective application. 
For it determines the general interdependence of the 
several phenomena. Judged from this new point 



176 SECOKD PART. 

of view, it receive^ a statical destination in the 
main, and serves to characterize, not the oo-existenoe 
of di£ferent rates of progress in our theoretical con> 
ceptions, but the order ultimately observed by all 
events whatsoever^ Thus the law of classification 
is entirely distinct from that of filiation. The 
simultaneous discovery of the two is sufficiently 
explained by their close connexion. 

Before I enter on my exposition of this great 
theoretical hierarchy, I must draw out with suf- 
ficient accuracy the general limits of its extent. 
These limits are/ in reality, fixed by the true philo- 
sophical distinction between speculation and action^ 
Action must, of necessity, always be special ; true 
theory is always general But it never can acquire 
this, its proper chantcter of generality, except by 
the aid of a previous abstraction, which always 
more or less impairs the reality of its conceptions. 
The fiict that this is impaired may have great 
danger in practice. We must resign ourselves 
however to this evil, to secure the coherence which 
can only be secured by our laws of theory keeping 
this character of absolute universality. It is a 
maxim of common sense, that every rule has its ex- 
ception. Still, our intellect always stands in need 
of universal rules, as the only means of avoiding an 
indefinite vacillation. 

The only way of attaining this is to break up, as 
far as possible, the study of beings, which alone can 
generally be objects of direct study, into several 
separate studies. The object of these will then be 



THE BOCTBIKE. 177 

the various general events, wich compose the ex- 
istence of each being. Bj this method we obtain 
abstract laws, which we can combine. And their 
difrei*ent combinations then explain each concrete 
existence. These laws are vfery numerous, but 
they admit of no reduction, and they are the only 
accessible source of speculative wisdom. But nu- 
merous as they are, they are much less numerous 
than the special rules which depend on them. 
These last, putting aside their number, will from 
their natural complication defy all^our best efforts, 
either for induction or deduction. But on the 
other hand, to know them would be really useless, 
except in the rare cases in which they influence our 
destiny.' For these exceptional cases the genius of 
practical men, the only competent authority in such 
matters, may always And empirical rules sufficient 
for its guidance, by avail^g itself of the general 
indications furnished by the philosophical class. 
The compound events in question are really subject 
to regular laws. This is a necessary consequence 
of the position, that the general elements of which 
they are compounded are subject to such laws. It 
may not be so easy to see it in the former case as 
in the latter, but it is a &ict, as observation will 
show, if directed on the point for a sufficient length 
of time. 

For instance, we shall never know the general 
laws of the variations peculiar to the regular con- 
stitution of the atmosphere. Yet the sailor and 
the agriculturist can, from their observations of the 

N 



178 SECOND PART. 

locality or the weather, draw special rules, which, 
though empirical, supersede any necessity for the 
so-called science of meteorology. The case is the 
same with all the other concrete branches of i«iuJ*-^ 
such as geology, zoology, and even sociology. What- 
ever is inaccessible to the practical genius of man 
will always remain a matter of mere idle curiosity. 
Science then, in its proper sense, is necessarily ab- 
stract. The general laws it establishes for the few 
categories under which all observable phenomena 
may be brought, are sufficient to demonstrate the 
existence of concrete laws, though most of such laws 
neither can nor need be known, except for practical 
purposes. 

The Womcm, — I catch a glimpse, my father, of 
the very great simplification allowed in your philo- 
sophical construction by this fundamental ^analysis, 
which recalls us from tl^ study of beings to that of 
events. But I feel frightened at the constant 
abstraction required by such a scientific regime, 
though fortunately I am exempt from it. It seems 
to me beyond the power of man's intellect, if all 
phenomena, of all orders, are to be directly studied 
in the Great Being in whom alone we find them all 
combiiied. 

The Priest — ^For your comfort, my daughter, we 
will consider, under a new aspect, the general prin- 
ciple of the hierarchy of abstract science. Directly, 
it establishes only the subordination of events ; in« 
directly, it sliould lead to that of beings. For 
phenomena are only more general by virtue of their 



THE DOCTRINE. 179 

belonging to more numerous orders of existence. 
The simplest of all are found everywhere, but we 
Toi-K^ study them in beings, where they are the only 
di^e"»iire can study, and where therefore their study 
is more easy. In strict truth, the first step in 
theory can never be taken distinct from the second. 
This, more than the actual nature of the phenomena, 
is especially the cause of the increase in complica- 
tion. But whatever be the amount of the succes- 
sive accumulations, each fresh category of events 
may be studied in beings independent of all the 
succeeding categories, though they are dependent 
on. the preceding. The previous knowledge of these 
will enable us to concentrate our attention on the 
new class brought under our notice. Even sup- 
posing the beings indivisible, yet, if they exist in 
different states, the Positive method will keep, in 
greatest part, its efficiency, and this condition can- 
not fail, by the very nature of the classification 
adopted. Thus the theoretical hierarchy that I am 
going to set forth, though its original purpose was 
to ftimish a scale of phenomena^ necessarily consti- 
tutes the true scale of beings, or, at any rate, of 
existences. It becomes by turns abstract or con- 
crete, according as its purpose is subjective or ob- 
jective. This is the reason why the encyclopedic 
subordination of the arts essentially coincides with 
that of the sciences. 

The Worrum. — Before you proceed, my father, 
to the exposition of this hierarchy, the general 
principle of which I begin to see, would you explain 
' n2 . 



180 SECOND PART. 

to me the general outline of our course 1 To cement 
the union which fundamentally exists between the 
world and man, it would seem that it might take 
either as its starting point, whilst the other should 
be its end. The habitual use of such a method 
seems even to require that it should be able, like 
every other scale, to become indifferently an ascend- 
ing or descending one. But perhaps this general 
principle does not hold good in our construction. 

The Priest. — The regular concurrence of these 
two methods, the one objective, the other sub- 
jective, is no less necessary, my daughter, in form- 
ing, lian in applying, the hierarchy of science. 
The process of its spontaneous elaboration depended 
on the first; its systematic institution requires the 
second. The initiation of each individual must, in 
this as in every other important point, be essentially 
the reproduction of the evolution of the race, with 
this exception, that for the future we shall do con- 
sciously what was formerly done blindly. It is only 
by combining these two methods, that we can se- 
cure the advantages of both and neutralize their 
dangers. To ascend from the world up to man, 
without having previously descended from man to 
the world — such a course renders you liable to the 
excessive cultivation of the lower branches of study, 
by putting out of sight their real scientific destina- 
tion. Our scientific efforts are in this case wasted 
on university follies, as adverse to the intellect as 
to the heart. The right connexion of the whole, 
and the proper estimation of the several parts, are 



THE DOCTKINE. 181 

sacrificed to reality and clearness. Still, this was 
the course necessarily adopted by abstract Positivism, 
during the long scientific introduction which begins 
with Thales and Pythagoras and ends with Bichat 
and Gall. It was necessary, in order to elaborate 
in succession the different sciences : the materials, 
that is, for our ultimate systematization. During 
that period, the higher wants of our intellect re- 
ceived but an imperfect satisfaction, under its 
heterogeneous guardians, theology and metaphysics. 
But at the present day, when the principle of an 
universal synthesis is definitively established, as the 
result of this immense preparatory movement, the 
subjective method, become at last as positive as the 
objective, must itself take a direct initiative in our 
encyclopedic construction. We must look to it to 
originate the construction, the other must work it 
out. And this rule is as applicable to each great 
branch of scientific research, as it is to the whole 
system of the sciences. 

The Womcm. — You see me then ready, my father, 
to follow you as you show how the doctrine of 
Humanity gives a religious sanction to each of the 
several essential branches of abstract science, as 
they successively come forward ; and how, by bring- 
ing them all into connexion, it gives strength to the 
highest and ennobles the lowest. 

The Priest. — ^To get a more adequate conception 
of ihia synthesis, you must, my daughter, remember 
at the outset the constant end of human life. That 
end is to preserve and to perfect the Great Being, 



182 SECOND PABT. 

whom we must at once know, love, and server \ 
Each, of his own spontaneous action, accomplished 
these three offices. Religion systematizes them"B^^ 
its doctrine, its worship, its life. The philosophical ! 
construction is necessarily prior to the two others; 
it is, however, ultimately destined to consolidate ; 
th%m and to develope them. In itself, the study of 
Humanity is as liable to degenerate as the lower . 
sciences are, if we forget that the only object of our j 
knowing her is that we may love her more and i 
serve her better. If we suffer ourselves to be ( 
diverted by the means £rom a due appreciation of, ; 
or care for, the end, our systematic growth becomes j 
really of less value than the natural growth of; 
mankind in general 

Thus you see why, at the highest point of the ) 
encyclopedic scale, I place Moral Science, or the 
Science of the individual Man. The functions of ^ 
the Great Being require for their exercise, ulfci- ' 
mately, individual organs. These organs must be > 
studied, therefore, at the outset, in order that the ' 
service they owe may be properly rendered during 
the period of their objective existence. On the due • 
rendering of this service will depend their subjec- 
tive influence. Under this form. Positivism adopts • 
and strengthens the primary precept of the primi- • 
tive theoci-acy : know thyadf, to better thyself. In 
Positivism, the intellectual principle and the social 
motive act in concert. As a fact, Morals, the most 
useful of all the sciences, is also the most complete, 
or rather it is the only one w^qh is complete. 



THE DOCTRINE. 183 

since its phenomena subj actively embrace' all the 
other, though, by that very fact, they are objectively 
subordinate to those others. The fundamental 
principle of the scientific hierarchy gives a direct 
predominance to the moi'al point of view as the 
most complicated and special. 

But at this point, the philosophical conformity of 
Positivism with theology necessarily ceases. Theo- 
logy, always occupied with the study of causes, 
placed the study of morals under the immediate 
control of the supernatural principles by which it 
explained everything. 

Moral observation became thus solely the obser^ 
ration of oneself. And a sanction was given to 
our personality or selfishness. For we were brought 
each of us into direct connexion with an infinite 
power, and thus isolated entirely from our race. 
Positivism, on the other hand, never seeks for a 
law but as a guide for action, is always in its very 
essence social, and bases moral science far more on 
the observation of others than of oneself, with the 
view of forming conceptions on moral subjects which 
shall be at once real and usefuL If so, we may feel 
how impossible it is properly to enter on the study 
of morals without a previous study of society. In 
all respects, each of us depends entirely on Hu- 
manity, especially with regard to our noblest func- 
tions. These are always dependent on the time 
and place in which we live, as you are reminded by 
the fine verses in Zaire — 



184 SECOND PABT. 

J*eu8se 4i6f pr^s du Gange, e^ kve des firax dieux, 
Chr^tienne dans ParU, Musulmane en ces lienx. 

I had been, by the Ganges, the slave of false gods, 
Christian in Paris, Mussulman where I am. 

Thus you see how it is that Morals^ to which we 
assign the highest rank^ proceed at once to insti- 
tute SociOLOOY. The phenomena of the latter 
science are both simpler and more general, as we 
should expect, looking to the general spirit of the 
Positive Hierarchy. 

The Woman. — Allow me, my &ther, to stop you 
a moment at this step. It seems to me to myolve a 
contradiction between the two conditions of your 
classification, a contradiction I should wish solved. 
The case before us seems to me an exception to our 
rule ; the phenomena seem to become at once more 
complicated and more general. I have always 
thought the moral point of view simpler than the 
social one. 

ITie Priest, — That is solely, my daughter, because 
you have hitherto proceeded on feeling rather than 
on reason. For Morals must, for your sex, be 
rather an art than a science. If we were to 
compare the two sciences merely with reference to 
the number of cases they respectively embrace, you 
would see that the number of individuals is greater 
than that of nations. It is this last, however, 
which absorbs your attention. But, limiting our- 
selves to the complication inherent in each science, 
considered in itself, you forget that moral science 
must take Into account the same influences as social 



THE DOCTBINE. 185 

sdence does, and tbat i|fer and above these it must 
appreciate impulses which social science may set 
aside as inappreciable. I mean the influences of 
the mutual action of the physical and moral nature 
of man — an action which is constant, though its 
la'ws are as yet too little known. They have great 
influence on the individual, but sociology pays no 
particular attention to them, and for this reason : 
the opposite results produced in d^erent indivi- 
duals cancel' one another when you come to con- 
sider nations. But if, on the contrary, in our 
moral judgment we should neglect such mutual 
action, we should be liable to the most serious 
mistakes ; we might attribute to the soul what 
proceeds from the body, or vice verad, a matter of 
daily occurrence. 

" The Woman. — I now see, my father, what I did not 
see, and therefore stopped you at the outset of your 
hierarchical series. Would you now return to it ? 
You need not fear any further interruption till the 
end, for any interruption would prevent my master- 
ing the general filiation. 

The Priest — Your objection, my daughter, was 
in itself a very natural one, and it answers the pur- 
pose, in the present case, of bringing into greater 
prominence our first step in the encyclopedic con- 
struction. This first step is the type necessaiily 
of all the others. We shall be able to get over those 
others joiore easily, as is the case with any scale 
whatever. I hope that you will fin'd no difficulty 
in descending from one science to the next. We 



186 SECOND PABT. 

take as our guide the principle which has jost led 
us from moral to social science j we look, that is, to 
the natural subordination of the respective pheno- 
mena of the two sciences under consideration. 

This fundamental principle makes you feel at 
once, that, for the systematic study of society, you 
require a previous knowledge of the general laws of 
life. As nations are beings gifted in an eminent 
degree with life, the natural result is, that the order 
of life governs that of society. The statical con- 
dition of society, and its dynamical progress, would 
be deeply impaired, were the constitution of our 
brain or even of our body to change in any notice- 
able degree. In this case, the simultaneous increase 
in point of generality and simplicity admits of no 
doubt. Thus sociology, which was constituted by 
moral science, constitutes in its turn BiOLoaT, 
which has, moreover, direct relations with the 
master science. Biology studies life only in so &r 
as it is common to all the beings which enjoy it. 
Animals, therefore, and plants, form its proper 
province, though it is ultimately destined for the 
service of man. The true study of man, however, 
it can only sketch in a rude outline. From this 
point of view. Biology, if wisely pursued, is occu- 
pied with the study of our bodily functions by the 
light derived from the study of animals and plants. 
In these, the bodily functions are seen cleared of ail 
higher complications. This direction given to 
Biology for logical purposes, may at times tend to ex- 
pose it to an academic degeneracy. It may be led 



THE DOCTRIKE, 187 

to lay too much stress on insignificant beings or 
acts. If so, philosophy must step in with its dis- 
cipline to recall it to its true vocation. But it 
must not fetter the inquiries indispensable to its 
success. 

These first three sciences are so closely connected 
that I make the name of the middle one stand for 
the whole, in the encyclopedic system, which I have 
arranged in a tabular form {see Flate B, cut the 
end of Coitechism), to render it easy for you to 
judge the general scheme of the Positive hier- 
archy. For sociology may be easily looked on as 
absorbing into itself biology, as its introduction; 
morals, as its conclusion. When the word Anthro- 
pology shall be in more common and sounder use, it 
will be a better name for the three sciences which 
collectively have man as their object, as its literal 
meaning is the %tvdy of mom. But for a long time 
it will be necessary to use the word Sociology, in 
order to mark the principal characteristic supe- 
riority of the new intellectual regime, which con- 
sists most particularly in the introduction into our 
encyclopedic construction of the social point of 
view, regarded as absolutely alien by the earlier 
^m thesis. 

Living beings are of necessity. bodies, and as such, 
spite of their greater complication, they always obey 
the more general laws of matter. These laws exercise 
an invariable predominance over all the peculiar 
phenomena of living beings, leaving them, however, 
their spontaneous action. A third step towards 



188 SECOND PART. 

our encyclopedia, in perfect analogy with the pre- 
ceding ones, places biology, and consequently social 
and moral science, in dependence on the gre^t 
science of inorganic matter to. which I have given 
the name of Cosmology. The real domain of this 
science is the general study of the planet on which 
man lives, the necessaxy sphere of all the higher 
ftmctions, vital, social, and moral. A better name 
would then be Geology y for this conveys the required 
meaning directly. But our academical anarchy has 
80 destroyed the njatural sense of the word that Posi- 
tivism must renounce its use, until, as will shortly 
be the case, the pretended science to which it is 
applied be got rid of off the list. Wten that is < 
the case, we shall be able to follow more closely the 
laws of language, and apply to the whole study of 
inorganic beings a more exact denomination, — one 
which by its concrete nature is calculated better 
to remind us that we ought to study each existence 
in its least complicated form. 

This should be the limit of my encyclopedic 
operation, and there should be no decomposition of 
cosmology, had I in view only the final state of 
man's reason. In that final state the inferior 
sciences must be kept in narrower bounds, the 
higher have their bounds enlarged. But at present 
I must provide for the special wants of the initia- 
tion of the West We shall find essentially similar 
wants recur in the development of each individual. 
For these two reasons, I feel bound to divide cosmo- 
logy into two fundamental sciences. The first of 



THE DOCTRINE. 189 

^ tt^e, under the general name of Physics, has for 
its object the direct study of the whole order of 
matter. The other, simpler and more general, has 
justly received the name of Mathematics. It is 
the necessary basis 'of Physics, and, as such, of the 
whole scientific edifice. It is so as it treats of the 
most universal form of existence, viewed in relation 
solely to the phenomena which are found every- 
where. Without this division of cosmology, it 
would be diJficult to form* a right conception of the 
spontaneous development of Positive Philosophy. 
This could only begin by such a study as that of 
Mathematics, and the greater rapidity with which 
* it grew to perfection, caused it at first to be con- 
sidered as 'the only science. Its name reminds us 
too strongly of this privilege which it originally 
enjoyed, but which it has long lost. Still the name 
should be kept. It should not be changed till the 
type of scientific and logical study which mathe- 
matics give has exercised a due control over the 
general diffusion of our encyclopedic laws. When 
they are generally admitted, then some less vague 
and better constructed term may be introduced. 
It should be so chosen as to point out the true 
domain of the science, and to act as a systematic 
check on the blind scientific ambition of those who 
cultivate it in too exclusive a spirit. Be this as it 
may, you must feel the necessity of descending as 
£a,r as mathematics to find a natural basis for the 
encyclopedic scale — a basis which can make the 
whole system appear but the gradual development 



190 SECOND PART. 

of the good sense of mankind. Physics are fkr 
simpler than the other sciences, but yet not simple 
enough. The special inductions of physics cannot 
be reduced to a fjystem without the aid of more 
general deductions. This is everywhere else the 
case, only in physics this logical and scientific want 
forces itself less on the attention. It is only in 
mathematics that you can proceed to induction 
without previous deduction. This is a consequence 
of the extreme simplicity of the phenomena which 
form the domain of mathematics. In it the pro- 
cess of induction often escapes notice ; so much so, 
that our academic geometricians look on them as 
deductions. So viewed, they are unintelligible, as 
there is no source to which you can Tefer them. 
There is no possibility of forming convictions really 
proof against attacks, except they are based ulti- 
mately on mathematics, the eternal foundation of 
Positive Philosophy. Mathematics will always ne- 
cessarily be the last link in the chain of the sciences ; 
the last step of that subjective connexion, guided 
by which every man of sound intellect and honest 
heart will at any time be able, as I have just done, 
to evolve the fundamental series, the- five principal 
steps of our encycledopic construction. 
- The Woman, — It is to the influence of feeling 
upon the intellect to which you have just alluded 
that I attribute, my father, the ease I find in 
following you in your construction, so dreaded by 
me at the outset. The attention of my sex is con- 
stantly riveted on morality, as the only solid \m\^ 



THE DOCTRINE. 191 

for the influence it claims as its due. We shall 
ali^ays therefore set a high value on securing a 
systematic foundation for morality, a foundation 
capable of resisting the sophisms of bad passions. 
^bove all, at the present day, #e 'are struck with 
terror at the moral ravages attributable to the., 
intellectual anarchy. It threatens, at no distant 
period, to dissolve all the bonds that bind men 
together, unless some irresistible convictions step in 
to prevent the further growth that seems naturally 
to await it. The true philosopher may therefore 
feel sure of the secret co-operation and heartfelt 
gratitude of all women worthy of the name, when 
he reconstructs morality on Positive foundations, as 
a final substitute for its supernatural basis, too evi- 
dently worn out. Women who shall feel, as I do 
now, the necessity of descending with this object 
to the most abstract sciences, will appreciate at its 
proper value the unexpected help that reason at 
length steps forward to give to love. I now under- 
stand why your encyclopedic descriptive system, 
which I mean to study, proceeds in the reverse 
direction to that adopted in the exposition of which 
it is the summary. For we must become most 
familiar with this ascending order, as it is the 
order which the several Positive conceptions will 
always observe in their development. The mode 
you have just adopted of instituting this order 
obviates, in the main, the repugnance women 
naturally feel for too abstract a course. For 
hitherto they have seen it lead but too often to 



192 8EC0KD PABT. 

dryness and pride. Now that I can always ke^ 
in sight and recall the moral object of the whole 
'scientific elaboration, and the moral conditions 
peculiar to each of its distinct essential phases^ -I 
shall have as much satisfaction in ascending as in 
descending your encyclopedic scale. 

The Priest. — It will Ue easy for you, my daughter, 
to adopt the two methods alternately. For you may 
remark that, in both directions, the theoretical order 
will rest on the same principle ; it will, that is, in 
all cases follow the decrease of generality. All 
that is required is to refer the fundamental series 
at one time to the phenomena, at another to our 
own conceptions, according as it is to be used ob- 
jectively or subjectively. For in real truth, moral 
notions comprehend all the others. We arrive at 
these others by a course of successive abstractions 
This it is which constitutes their greater complidsr 
tion. The science of morals, therefore, is more * 
general from a subjective point of view than any of 
the lower sciences. At the other end of the scale, 
mathematics are the most general science, solely as 
being the most simple. As a branch of study, then, 
they are more general from the objective point of 
view, less general than any other from the sub- 
jective. They are the only science applicable to 
every form of existence within our knowledge, but 
they also are the science which gives us least know- 
ledge of the beings with which it deals, for it can 
only reveal the commonest laws. All the interme- 
diate sciences offer, though in a less degree, in both 



THE DOCTRINE. 193 

respects, the same contrast which exists between 
mathematics and morals. But whether you ascend 
or descend, in both cases alike, morals, in the ency- 
clopedic course, are the supreme science, as being at 
once the most useful and the most complete. It 
is in morals that science, having thrown off by 
degrees the abstraction that originally characterized 
it, forms a systematic union wkh practice. The 
steps indispensable as preparations have all been 
taken. 

The wisdom of mankind, then, systematized by 
Positivism, will retain the admirable, though equi- 
Tocal term, Morals. In morals alone, the art and 
the science have one common name— an equivoca- 
tion which pedants may regret, but which Posi- 
tivism respects. In this apparent .confusion moral 
Science happily finds an equivalent for that which 
it cannot have. I allude to the discipline which, 
in all the others, anticipates or corrects the ten- 
dency to scientific aberrations, a tendency inherent 
in our intellectual cultivation as we ascend the en- . 
cyclopedic scale. As a rule, we restrict each phase 
of progress to the degree in which it is necessary 
for the preparation of the next above it. We re- 
serve for the skill of the practical man all the 
details which may be required in any particular 
case. Spite of the declamations of academicians, it 
is allowed that a discipline of this nature sanctions 
every theory of real interest, excluding only such 
scientific questions as are childish. At the present 
day, the intellect and the heart alike demand the 
o 



194 SECOND PART. 

suppression of all such. But the rule just stated 
is not applicable to moral science. For all the 
others it is most valuable ; but evidently it ceases 
to apply in the case of the science which stands at 
the head of the system. 

Were moral theories as much cultivated as the 
rest, their greater complication, in the absence of 
any special discipline, would expose them to more 
frequent and more dangerous aberrations. But the 
heart, in this case, comes forward to guide the 
intellect. It recalls more forcibly here than else- 
where the universal subordination of theory to 
practice. It does this by means of the happy am- 
biguity of the very name, morals. Philosophers 
ought, in reality, to bring the same dispositions as 
women to the ^tudy of morals; they ought to 
study them, that is, in order to gain rules for con- 
duct. Only the deductive science of the philoso- 
pher should give generality and consistency to the 
inductions of women. These qualities might other- 
wise be wanting, and yet they are almost always 
indispensable to secure the social, or even private, 
efficacy of moral precepjis. 

The WomarL — ^W^ have, then, now constituted 
the real scientific system. I should be glad, my 
father, at the close of this long and difficult con- 
versation, if you would state generally what are 
the properties of your encyclopedic series, viewed 
for the future jis an ascending series. Under this 
point of view I shall soon be familiar with it I 
can see, without your aid, the moral and intellectual • 



THE DOCTRINE. 195 

dangers inherent in this objective cultivation, so 
long as it remained uncontrolled by the subjective 
discipline just explained! :^o long as this was the 
case, the fact that the differejiit phases of the sden- 
-tific encyclopedia must be successive, compelled 
Bien, in the cultivation of scienQe"^ provisionally to 
lulopt a system of detail, and* to disperse their 
efforts, in a way which ran directly counter to the 
essentially general character which theoretical views 
ought to present. The result was, more especially 
in the learned, but without the mass being exempt, 
an increasing tendency, on the one hand, to mate- 
rialism and atheism ; on the other, to a contempt 
fcac the softer affections, and a neglect of the fine 
arts. I have long been aware that under all these 
aspects, Positivism, rightly viewed, is perfectly 
distinct from its scientific preamble, nay, is the best 
corrective of its tendencies. But I cannot, by 
myself alone, gain a satisfactory view of those 
essential attributes of Positivism which I am now 
to appreciate in the system of your theoretical 
hierarchy. 

The Priest. — You may be satisfied, my daughter, 
with two very important attributes. They corre- 
spond to the two general objects of the hierarchy 
of science, the subjective object no less than the 
objective. Perhaps in this place I had better say, 
logical and scientific — ^logical, if the attention is 
directed mainly on the method, or scientific, if on 
the doctrine. 

Under its logical aspect, the encyclopedic series 
o2 



196 8EC0KD PJ 

points out the necessary coirse to be adopted by 
our scientific education, and secondly, the gradual 
formation of the true pr(gi^otl( of reasoning. Mainly 
deductive in its cradl^^hat is, in mathematics, for 
in mathematics tKe'^requisite inductions are almost 
always made spontaneously, the Positive method 
becomes more and more inductive in proportion as 
the speculations on which it enters are of a higher 
order. In this long elaboration, four principal 
steps must be noticed, the steps at which the grow- 
ing complication of the phenomena makes us sao- 
cessively develope observation, experiment, compa- 
rison, and historical filiation. Take in the point 
from which we start, mathematics, and then each of 
these five logical phases naturally absorbs its pre- 
decessors. This is but the consequence of the 
natural subordination of the phenome|^ Thus the 
true logic becomes complete, and as complete, sys- 
tematic, at the point where the rise* of sociology 
necessitates the introduction of the historical method, 
just as biology had previously introduced the art of 
comparison, after that physics had sufficiently de- 
veloped observation and experiment. 

Fortunately for your sex, its ignorance renders it 
imnecessary, at the present day, to Aow by philo- 
sophical demonstrations, that of which Positivism 
labours to convince men, — that to leam reasoning, 
the only way is to reason with certainty and precision 
on clear and definite matter. Many who are quite 
aware that to learn an art, you must practise that art, 
still listen to the sophists who teach them to reason, 



THE DOC5TBINE. 197 

or even to speak, by reasoning on reasoning, or by 
speaking about speech. You were taught grammar 
and perhaps rhetoric, but at least you were spared 
logic, the most pretentious of the three scholastic 
studies ; and being spared it, your own reason, 
judiciously trained in the school of your cherished 
Moli^re, was soon able to do justice to the two 
other classical absurdities. Strengthened as you 
now are by systematic convictions, you will have 
no hesitation in treating with proper ridicule the 
Trissotins who would teach you the art of deduction, 
without having themselves ever applied deduction 
in its proper province, -mathematics. Each essential 
branch of the Positive method must always be 
studied in the particular department of science 
which gave occasion to its introduction. 

The Womtff, — This first property fortunately 
has no difficulty for me. I see in it the statement 
of simple good sense. So I beg you, my fistther, to 
pass on at once to the second general property of 
your encyclopedic series. 

The Priest. — Its second property is, my daughter, 
that it gives us a systematic conception of the whole 
order of the world, as is indicated by the second 
heading of my conspectus. From inorganic matter 
up to morality, each term in the series rises on the 
basis of its predecessor, in obedience to this funda- 
mental law, the necessary consequence of the real 
principle of our hierarchy : The noblest phenomma 
are, m aU caeesy svhordinate to the lowest. This is 
the only role of really universal application dis- 



198 SECOND PAB1V 

covered by the objective study of the world and 
man. But as this law cannot supersede the necech 
sity of less general laws, it cannot by itself con- 
stitute the barren external unity vainly sought by 
all philosophers from Thales to Descartes. 

We renounce then the stimulus of this MvolooB 
inquiry, ^ud we find a more valuable substitute in 
the moral purpose i^f all our scientific ef^rts. 
Still we are glad to trace, for all our abstract doc- 
trines, an objective bond of union inseparable from 
their subjective co-ordination. Our practical social 
experience above all must turn to account such a 
victor of the system of our destinies. Our depen- 
dence and our dignity become thus connected one 
with the other, and we shall be better disposed to 
feel the value of voluntary submission, for oa sub- 
mission depends mainly our moral, and even our 
intellectual improvement. 

I would call your attention to the fact, and this 
must be considered as a complement of the great 
law above mentioned, that from the practical point 
of view, it represents the order of the world as 
increasingly susceptible of modification in propor- 
tion to the increasing complication of its pheno- 
mena. Improvement always implies imperfection, 
and imperfection increases as complication in- 
creases. But you see at the same time that man's 
providence becomes more efficient, and has more 
varied agents at its command. The compensation 
thus gained is still, doubtless, inadequate, so that 
the simplest order generally remains the most per- 
fect, though under a blind guidance. Still, this 



THE DOGTBINE. 199 

general law of the lidbilitj to modification places 
morals as the supreme art in two ways, first by- 
virtue of its superior importance, next because it 
offers a larger field for wise action on our part. 
Practice and theory, then, combine to justify the 
predominance which Eositivism systematically 
allows to morals. - 

The Womom. — Since you.J>ave now explained to 
me suj£ciently the whole system of Positive doctrine, 
I would wish, my father, before leaving you to-day, 
to know beforehand the object of the two other con- 
versations you promised me in this second part of 
your Catechism. I do not see what is left for me 
to know, as regards the systematic basis of the 
Universal religion, nor why I may not pass at once 
to the direct and special study of the system of 
lifa 

The Priest, — Our conceptions hitherto, my 
daughter, have been too abstract and too general 
to make a sufficient impression on you. I must 
complete them by some less general explanations!, of 
a more concrete and definite character, explana- 
tions too of which I shall make further use. With- 
out detaining you at each particular phase of the 
encyclopedic construction, as will be the case in the 
new education of the Western world, I shall 
simply ask you to appreciate separately the two 
unequal parts which, historically, make up the 
whole of Positive Philosophy. 

That philosophy embraces the whole order of the 
world. It is a natural division to tpke separately 
the order of the world external to man, and the 



200 SECOND PABT. 

social and moral order of inan*s world. The £rst 
includes cosmology and biology. Under the name 
of natural philosophy, the term ordinarily used in 
England, it constituted the scientific domain of the 
ancients, and even of this domain they could only 
give a static sketch. B^des that the true scienti- 
fic spirit did not admit, at that time, of a more com- 
plete freedom, the state of society was adverse to 
a premature extension. The result of such exten- 
sion could only be to compromise the existing order , 
without really aiding ulterior progress. lu, morals, 
however, the exceptional genius of Aristotle, after . 
reducing to a system, as far as was possible, natural 
philosophy, prepared the way for a sound philosophy, 
by an adequate sketch of the two essential parts of 
human statics, first the society, then the indi- 
vidual. So much was he in advance of others, thAt 
he was not really appreciated till thd Middle Ages, 
when the provisional separation of the two powers 
gave a direct impulse to the progress of our mo^ 
important speculations. But no social impulse 
however valuable, could dispense with the necessity 
of a long scientific preamble. The separate sciences 
must be worked out before true philosophy could 
enter into possession of its highest domain. Hence 
this provisional division of physics from morals 
lasted on to our own day. By virtue of its still 
existing, it is under its auspices that we eAter the 
last transitional stage of the reason of the Western 
world, directed by Positivism. 



^* 



THE DOCTRINE. 201 



CONVERSATION VII. 



THE ORDER OF THE EXTERNAL WORLD — INORGANIC 
MATTER, LIFE. 

The Woman. — On studying the conspectus which 
is the summary of our fundamental conversation, I 
see, my father, we must have two others, as you 
promised me at its close, on the subject of the 
. Positive doctrine. My heart must first make me 
. feel the«need of each separate science as a means 
towards the attainment of the end of this im- 
mense scientific construction; that end being the 
systematization of morals. My intellect must now 
be/* brought to see how the separate stages of this 
abstract edifice rise one above the other, from the 
basis to the summit. I may be content with this. 
I need not penetrate within. This systematic ascent 
is the indispensable complement of' the descent 
which I made under your guidance— -a descent 
necessary as a foundation for the ascent. If the 
mind of man can really mount by upward steps^ 
almost insensibly, from the lowest mathematical 
notions to the sublimest moral conceptions, no sight 
can be more worthy of my admiration. My sex 
never can follow 3uch a filiation in detail, but it 
must see in outline that it is possible, in order to 
be sure that systematic morals can be rested on 
really safe foundations. Then, the opinion of wonien 
will brand, as you wish it to do, the anarchical 
sophists who, though Mth in all theology is abso- 



202 6E0OKD PAST. 

lately decayed, oppose the substitution of Positive 
faith. Their object is to secure an inde&iite ext^en- 
sion of the religious interregnum which they find 
favourable to their moral unworthiness and their 
intellectual incapacity. You may then without 
fear detain me upon the mathematical step^ as 
mathematics, according to you, are the only solid 
basis for our theory of the world. The marked 
aversion felt for this study by all our metaphysical 
make-mischiefs, predisposes me to see that mathe- 
matics have the efficiency for organization you attri«- 
bute to them. 

The Priest, — To get a clear conception of mathe- 
matics, as the logical and scientific basis of the whole 
edifice of abstract science, it is enough, my daughter, 
to take an accurate survey of the domain assigned 
to them in our encyclopedic table. Mathematics 
study directly universal existence, when reduced to 
its simplest and consequently lowest phenomena^ 
the phenomena on which necessarily rest all other 
real attributes of that existence. These fundamental 
properties of any being whatever are number, 
extension, movement. Whatever cannot be con- 
sidered under these three points of view can have 
no existence except in our understanding. But 
nature shows us many beings of whom we can 
know nothing beyond the elementary attributes. 
Such are the stars. They are from their distance 
only accessible to us by the sight. They admit, 
therefore, only of mathematical study, quite suM- 
cient, it must be allowed, to form a proper guide as 



THE D0CTRI2TE. 203 

to our true relations towards them. Therefore it 
is that astronomy will always furnish the most 
direct and complete application of mathematical 
science. Still if the general laws of number, 
extension, motion, could have been studied nowhere 
but in the heavenly bodies, they never would have 
heea discovered, extremely simple though they be. 
But as you find them everywhere, they were open 
to discovery in more accessible cases. We had but 
to put aside by a series of unconscious abstractions 
the other attributes of matter which complicated 
the question. 

And here let me point out how, under the 
auspices of our hierarchical principle, we may get 
the true internal distribution of each great science 
as naturally as the general co-ordination of the 
sciences. Mathematics cannot be reduced to less 
than three constituent parts — ^the calculus, geometry, 
mechanics. These three are a progressive series, 
from the historical no less than the dogmatical point 
of view, a series essentially analogous to that which 
k seen on a larger scale in the whole of the abstract 
system. The ideas of number are certainly more 
universal and simpler than those even of extension, 
and these on the same ground, in their turn, pre- 
cede those of motion. 

In the case of most of the stars, our real know- 
ledge cannot extend beyond an accurate enumera- 
tion. We cannot go so far even as to say what 
ih&vt shape or size is, nor are we concerned with it. 
Phenomena as well as beiijigs admit the numerical 



204 SECOND PART. 

point of view. It leaves all things indistinct, but 
it is really the only one universally applicable, since 
none of our thoughts but come under it. It is of 
course but a rough view, but it may be put to a good 
use. We may use number to perfect our ideas of 
harmony and stability. In fact, the best tjrpes of 
these are found in number. And so you see children 
of themselves begin their initiation in abstract 
science, by simple speculations in number, long 
before they begin to think on the attributes of 
space. 

As for motion, you easily see the increase of 
complication and the decrease of generality which 
make this study the highest part of the domain of 
mathematics. This is why the Greeks, forward as 
they were in geometry, never could master even the 
outline of mechanics, except for some cases ' of 
equilibrium. They never had a glimpse of the 
elementary laws of motion. 

If we compare these tliree essential parts of 
mathematics, we see that the calculus of which 
algebra, rather than arithmetic, is the principal 
development, has a logical destination in particular, 
over and above its peculiar and direct use. Its 
real essential adaptation is to enlarge to the utmost 
our power of deduction. The study of extension 
and of motion acquires, by the introduction of the 
calculus, a character of generality and coherence, 
which they could not have unless all their problems 
were transformed into mere questions of number. 
From the scientific point of view, on the other hand. 



THE DOGTBUTE. 205 

it is geometry and meclianics which mainly consti- 
tute mathematics; for they, and they alone, enable 
us directly to form our theory of universal existence, 
viewed as passive in geometry, in action in me- 
chanics. 

Mechanics, then, take an important encyclopedic 
position, as the necessary transition between ma- 
thematics and physics. The peculiar characteristics 
of both are found in close combination in mechanics. 
In them logic is seen to be no longer purely deduc- 
tive, as it was supposed to be in geometry, owing 
to the extreme facility of making the required in- 
ductions. In mechanics we begin to feel distinctly 
the need of an inductive basis; nor is it easy to 
trace such a basis amongst our concrete observa- 
tions. We require it, to allow free scope for the 
abstract conceptions which are to connect with it 
the general problem of the composition and com- 
munication of motion. It was the want of this 
external foundation which prevented mechanics, as 
a science, from being developed till the seventeenth 
century. 

Up to that time, mathematics had only established 
subjective laws, the only laws which geometry and 
the calculus reveal, where men do not as yet see 
that subjective necessarily imply objective laws. 
These last, however, became the objects of distinct 
attention, from the great difficulty they presented 
to the founders of mechanical science. The three 
fundamental laws of motion are so important and 
00 universal that I must state them here, as the 



206 SECOND PART. 

best types of true laws of nature, which are nothing 
but general &cts, allowing of no explanation, bnt 
serving as the basis of all rational explanationB. 
The prevalence of metaphysics was a great hindranoe 
to their discovery, but the greatest was the inherent 
difficulty of that discovery. For it* was the first 
capital effort of the genius of induction, enabled at 
length to discern, in the midst of the commonest 
events, general relations which h^ hitherto escaped 
all the efforts of man's intellectual activity. 

The first law, discovered by Kepler, is this : all 
motion is naturally rectilinear and uniform. Hence 
curvilinear, or any movement which is not uniform, 
can only be the result of .a continuous combination 
of successive impulses, which impulses maybe either 
active or passive. The second law, due to Galileo, 
sets forth the independence of the movements of 
the bodies that form parts of a system — the inde- 
pendence, that is, in regard to. their movement in 
common as a system. But this community of move- 
ment must be complete in velocity as well as in 
direction. Only on this condition can the particu- 
lar bodies that combine to form the whole remain 
in the same state of relative rest or motion, as if 
their whole were motionless. So this second law 
is not applicable to rotatory movements. And it 
was, therefore, from the consideration of such move- 
. mfints that came the faulty objections which it met 
with on its discovery. Lastly, the third law of 
^ motion, that of Newton, establishes that, in every 
case of mechanical collision, action is always acoom- 



THE DOCTRINE. /207 

piuoded by equal and coutraiy reaction, projirided 
that, in measuring every change, proper regai:d be 
paid to the mass of the bodies brought into cc|ntact, 
as well as to their speed. This third law/is the 
basis of all notions relating to the communication 
of motion, just as that of Galileo is of tho4e that 
concern its composition, whilst Kepler's law deter- 
mines what each motion is separately by fts own 
nature. These three laws together an^ ^omcient to 
enable us to enter on a deductive solutioib. of the 
general problem of mechanics, by bringing /the more 
coftipHcated cases under the xaore simple. In this 
gradual process we avail ourselves of mathematical 
artifices often diflScult to iiiyent 

These general laws will be of use to yoii as giving 
a direct explanation of numbers of pheiiooaena of 
daily experience, in the midst of whicSi you live 
without understanding or even perceiving them. 
They are eminently fitted to make yoB feel what it 
is which constitutes the true genius «f science. 
Finally, you should remark how each one of them 
naturally ranges itself imder a law common to all 
phenomena whatever, to social and moral quite as 
much as simply material phenomena. The first law 
connects with the law of persistence which we trace 
everywhere. The second connects with the law 
which recognises the independence of the action of 
the part as regards .the conditions common 'to^e 
whole. By this law, in social questions we find it 
possible to reconcile order with progress. As ftfr , 
the third, it is at once universally applicable, the 



20^^K!S SECOND. PABT. 




apnHBH^arying only so £u: afi the influences 
con^flp!mi.r7. This philosophical connexion of 
theHpk mB^B of motion completes our estimate of 
the 'iirqpnrtAice, in an encyclopedic point of yiew, 
of iKoc^umUi, the last portion of the domain of 
matWuKtk* 

Tm \rWMlf'n, — These considerations are so ab- 
stract Elicl*^®!* that they naturally, my father, are 
beyoAd ^tttf grasp for to-day. But I feel that, if 
aIlo^v^6ixa»:|br sufficient reflection, I shall be able 
to mlpltiP tliam. I beg you then to pass on at 
once )tt tilt direct sJtody of the external world. 

^AcPriw^-— To place this study on its proper 
philosophical fcoting, I am compelled, my daughter, 
to re(|i»rei. of tyou one last effort relative to our 
encyclipHUs^'tonstruction. I gave the name of 
PhysioBPfc.' .' iiW whole of the second cosmological 
scienca you- must break up this whole into 
three grf^^t; snciices, really distinqj one from the 
other. JJatf-nT^y takeix in their ascending order^ 
now becoming familiar tcK you — ^first. Astronomy ; 
next. Physics properly so called, and which keeps 
the common name ; lastly, Cheinistry, as you may 
find by consulting our synopsis. ""^ the hierarchy 
of science finally offers to your viewN[even degrees, 
in the place of the five hitherto recc gnised. We 
pass from one form of it to the othe^r, by simply 
dmwing out into fuller detail the second of the five 
original degrees, just as you lengthen a pocket tele- 
scope by drawing out its tubes. It is only when 
you come to apply them, that you will see in each 



THE I^CTRINE. ^ 209 

case which of the two arrangements youJishould 
adopt. ^. ^ 

For in fact, our fundamentfeJ series allows of 
several different arrangements, according as jou 
contract it or enlarge it, the better to satisfy our 
different intellectual wants. Only we must never 
invert the order of succession. The most condensed 
form allowed is as clearly indicated in the synopsis 
as the most expanded. At a further stage of your 
advance you will often reduce the whole encyclopedic 
bundle to the simply dual form of cosmology and 
sociology. To do this at first Vould expose you to 
vagueness. Bi^t beyond this you will never go, so 
evidently impossible is it to reduce objectively one 
under the other the two primary groups. The 
only union possible for them is subjective, attain- 
able by placing oneself directly at the religious 
point of view. 

By the help«<of very familiar language I have 
pointed out to you this expansion of the ency- 
clopedia. I must now give reasons for it. This I 
do by explaining its nature. 

The Woman, — I have but a slight knowledge, 
picked up in conversation, of the three sciences you 
have just introduced. But I can guess, my father, 
your reason for intercalating them here. Your 
doing so anticipates a wish I was on the point of 
laying before you, as to the continuity of the ency- 
clopedic series. When comparing in this respect 
the higher and lower sciences, the primitive con- 
struction on the scale of five degrees offered me a 
p 



210 k secoItd part. 

eerioufiViisparity. I find it easy, by the simple con^ 
nexiou of the phenomena, to see how we rise in* 
sensibly from biology to sociology, and from soci- 
ology to moral science, though I still need on this 
point your special explanations to give greater pre^ 
cision to my ideas. But on the other hand, I found 
it difficult at first to see how we pass from mathe« 
matics to the dii*ect study of the order of inorganic 
matter, still more difficult to see how we passed 
from cosmology to biology. It is true that this 
may arise from^my more complete ignorance of the 
lower conceptions. *But I felt also that this want 
of proportion must be connected with the very con- 
stitution of -our scale, as at first constructed, though 
I could in no way see the remedy, nor even whether 
there were a remedy or not, I shall find it easy 
then to accustom myself to the seven encyclopedic 
steps, if by this slight complication I feel my sense 
of order gratified. Still I allow, that had you begun 
with seven at first, I should have felt too great a 
difficulty in conceiving your abstract hierarchy as a 
whole. 

The Priest — You have rightly guessed the real 
motive of my final modification. It remains 
therefore only for me, my daughter, to complete the 
work of your instinct, by pointing out in a sys- 
tematic way the nature and object of the three 
sciences I have introduced. 

Positive religion defines astronomy as the study 
of the Earth, as one of the heavenly bodies — ^that is 
to say, astronomy is the knowledge of the geome- 



THE DOCl'RINB. 211 

tiical and mechanical relations of the earth to the 
other stars, so far as such relations can affect our 
destinies by influencing the state of the earth. We 
subjectively, th^i, condense all astronomical theo- 
ries round our globe as a centre ; and we absolutely 
reject all theories which, as disconnected with our 
globe, are by that &,ct at once mere idle questions, 
even granting them to be within our reach. This 
leads us finally to eliminate, not merely the 
BO-called sidereal astronomy, but also all planetary 
studies which coucem stars invisible to the naked 
eye, and which have consequently no real influence 
on the earth. The true domain of astronomy will 
now, as at the beginning of things, be limited to 
the ^VQ planets which have always been known, 
together with the sun, equally the centre of their 
movements as of the earth's, and the moon, our 
onl^Ljgatellite in the heavens. 

The difference between our doctrine and that of 
the ancients, here, as elsewhere, consists essentially 
in the substitution of the relative for the absolute, 
so that a centre which was long objective becomes 
purely subjective. Hence the discovery, or rather 
the proof, of the double movement of the earth is 
the most important of all the revolutions in science 
that took place whilst human reason was yet in its 
preliminary state. One of the most eminent pre- 
cursors ©f Positivism, the sagacious Fontenelle, 
enabled your sex to see the philosophical bearing 
of this revolution, so far as the time admitted, in a 
charming little work, whi(^, though apparently 
p 2 



212 SECOXD PART. 

frivolous, is justly entitled to the immortality it 
has gained. 

In fiict, the earth's motion rendered the dogmas 
of Positive science directly incompatible with those 
of any theological system. For whereas our widest 
speculations previously might wear a character of 
absoluteness,^ they became henceforth essentially 
relative. The discovery of our planetary gravita- 
tion soon followed. It was the scientific conse- 
quence of tjie former, and its pbilosophical complex 
ment. The influence of the two theories on the 
whole encyclopedic system of science has been greatly 
checked by the empirical views of our academicians. 
Positivism finally establishes them as the primary 
general basis for the direct study of the order of 
the material world, which is thus brought into im- 
mediate connexion with the mathematical founda- 
tions of the whole doctrine. 

In astronomy, the point of view from which we 
regard the external world is simply that of geometry 
and mechanics. We put aside all inquiries, as 
absurd as they are idle, as to the temperature of 
the stars or their internal constitution. But, when 
we pass from astronomy to physics properly so 
called, by an almost imperceptible transition through 
the intermediate stage of planetary mechanics, we 
penetrate more deeply into the study of inert na- 
ture. In order, however, to give a truer idea of 
this new branch of science, we must first gain a con- 
ception of the highest cosmological science. It has 
a more decided character, and so enables us more 



THE DOCTRINE. 213 

easily to grasp pure physics, which are somewhat 
indefinite if you approach them directly. By adopt- 
ing this course, our attention is called to one of the 
most important logical precepts of Positivism, that, 
viz., which bids us, in all cases, look first to the 
two extremes if we wish to form a right conception 
of the intermediate step by which they are con- 
nected. Chemistry was actually introduced as a 
distinct science, in the East and in the West, several 
centuries before physics. Cralileo was led by his 
instinct to create the science of physics/with a view 
to establish a sound mode of transition from astro- 
nomy to chemistry, in place of the previous chime- 
rical connexion. 

At once to shorten and to simplify my explana- 
tion of the two, consider Chemistry and Physics as 
in the main subject to the same general influences. 
The difierence really consists in the greater or less 
intensity of the modifications which the constitu- 
tion of matter receives from them. But though 
this is the only difference, there is never any room 
for doubt as to the true nature of each case, spite 
of the confusion introduced by the schools. At their 
highest intensity, states of heat, of electricity, even 
of light, modify the constitution of matter so far as 
to change the internal composition of substances. 
In this case, the event is within the department of 
chemistry, that is, it comes under the general laws 
. of composition and decomposition. In both these 
processes equally, we can, and ought to, look on the 
combination as simply binary. The combination 



214 SECOND PABT. 

may be repeated three times in sucoession. But we 
can seldom exceed this limit, as the union becomes 
more difficult and less stable in proportion as it 
becomes more complicated. At a lower degree of 
intensity the influences above-mentioned can only 
modify the condition of bodies, they cannot alter 
their substance. In this case, matter is studied 
under the strictly physical aspect. The two sciences, 
physics and chemistry, are equally universal, bat 
the decrease of generality is as sensible as the in- 
crease of complication, when we pass from the one 
to the other. For physics, as they study the whole 
of the properties which make up every material ex- 
istence, look on all bodies as in kind the same. 
The only difference is one of degree. The several 
branches of physics must then correspond to the 
different senses by which we gain a knowledge of 
the external world. Chemistry, on the other hand, 
looks on all substances as in their nature distinct, 
and it chiefly addresses itself to the problem of de- 
termining their radical differences. The phenomena 
which it studies are always possible in any given 
body. But they are practically never found in it, 
except under special conditions. The concurrence 
of these conditions is rare and difficult, so as often 
to demand the intervention of man. 

Of these two neighbour sciences, physics are logi- 
cally the most importa;nt, chemistry scientiflcally. 
Such is our judgment on their relative encyclopedic 
value, when we have once allowed the indispensable 
necessity of both, their theoretical and practical 



THE DOCTBINB. 215 

necessity. It is m physics that the genius of in- 
. duction finds its free career, by the development of 
observation, which was too spontaneous in astro- 
nomy, and of experiment, which nowhere else leads 
to such unequivocal results. But chemistry carries 
the day as to the encyclopedic importance of the 
notions we derive from it. Its extreme imperfec- 
tion as a science, which can only cease under the 
discipline of Positivism, has not prevented its 
throwing a strong light and exercising a powerful 
influence on the whole reason of Western Europe* 
Its valuable efficiency in this respect is the result 
of its general analysis of the inorganic matter in the 
midst of which we live, gaseous, liquid and solid* 
And as the complement of this it has performed 
the equally indispensable analysis of vegetable and 
animal substances. By this analysis we are enabled 
to form a conception of the fundamental economy 
of nature. This was previously unintelligible to 
us, because we had not proved that the material 
elements of which all real beings, lifeless as well as 
living, are composed, are essentially identical. 

So you may see how chemistry properly so called, 
is alone competent to form the normal transition 
between cosmology and biology, the need of which 
transition you expressed by your wish for unbroken 
oontinuity* You would set a still higher value on 
this great encyclopedic condition, as favourable 
ultimately to the heart as to the intellect, were I 
to point out the true internal arrangement of astro** 
nomy, physics, and chemistry, as I did in the case 



216 SECOND PART. 

of mafchematics. Bnt we must keep such develop- 
ments for more special conversations. They are 
not immediately indispensable from the religions 
point of view. Mathematics may serve as a type 
of the rest. And you may learn from it the general 
possibility of there being a really gradual ascent 
from mathematics to morals, by the simple applica- 
tion, with an ever increasing exactness and detail, 
of the unchangeable principle of our hierarchy. 

When you come, after this subjective or logical 
appreciation, to add to it as a complement an equi- 
valent objective or scientific appreciation, you can 
trace in the general succession of the branches of 
abstract study a real concrete scale, if not of beings, 
yet of existences. In astronomy you have only the 
simple mathematical existence. Almost a mere idea 
previously, in astronomy it becomes a reality in the 
case of bodies which we can only examine from 
that point of view, and which are therefore natu- 
rally the best type of such existence. In physics 
we rise to phenomena which admit of a more accu- 
rate and closer examination. We take a decided 
step onwards towards man. Lastly, in chemistry 
we deal with the noblest and most widely spread 
form of merely natural existence. We never how- 
ever lose sight of its subordination to the previous 
sciences, as required by our Universal law. Though 
the great objective conception, which is the result of 
this progression, can only find an adequate develop- 
ment in biology, it is important to notice its germ 
in cosmology, in order thoroughly to master the 



THE DOCTRINE. 217 

true principle of classification for beings of what- 
ever order. 

Ths Womcm, — Looking at this admirable con- 
tinnitj, I see in their true light, my father, the 
noisy disputes which from time to time break out 
between the diflferent departments of science. My 
natural predilection, as a woman, for moral explana- 
tions led me to look on these scientific discussions 
as, in the main, attributable to the passions of 
men. I now see a more legitimate origin for them. 
I ascribe them to the profound uncertainty felt by 
the different classes of scientific inquirers, as to 
what are their respective provincea They have no 
encyclopedic principles to guide them. And the 
sciences succeed one another, in such a way, that the 
transition from one to the other is scarcely per- 
ceptible. 

'Ths Priest, — The continuity you admire, my 
daughter, is the most important philosophical result 
we have attained by the combined efforts of modem 
reason. The true object of philosophy is to connect 
as closely as possible all phenomena and all beings. 
Practical skill adds completeness to this general 
result. For our artificial, improvements always 
end in the strengthening and developing the natural 
connexions established by science. Thus you may 
begin to see that the spirit of modem philosophy 
is not exclusively critical, as it is accused of being, 
and that it substitutes durable constructions for 
the decrepit remnants of the old doctrine. At the 
same time, you may already see at this point the 



218 8EC0KD PART. 

necessary incompatibility of Theology and Po6f> 
tivism. It is a consequence of the irreconcileabla 
opposition between laws and supernatural wilL 
What becomes of the wonderful order we have 
traced, which, by a graduated series, connects otir 
noblest moral attributes with the lowest natural 
phenomena, if we introduce an infinite power? 
The capricious action of such a power would allow 
of no prevision. It would threaten our order at any 
moment with an entire subversion. 

The Womcm, — Before I attempt to master directly 
this general continuity, there remains, my fitther, 
one great gap to fill up. We have not treated of 
life. You must now place that before me in a 
systematic point of view. Whilst descending our 
encyclopedic series, I saw the natural connexion of 
the science of life with sociology. But I cannot 
get to see, as yet, any natural connexion between it 
and inorganic matter. An impassable abyss seems 
to me to separate the domain of life firom that of 
death. 

The Priest. — That you feel this difficulty, my 
daughter, is in full conformity with the historical 
progress of the scientific initiation of the race. 
Scarcely two generations ago, thinkers of real ability 
were unable to form a clear conception of the con- 
nexion between life and matter. And yet it is a 
point of fundamental importance, the capital diffi- 
culty of all natural philosophy. 

In the first place, it was natural, on the rise of 
chemistry, that cosmologists should push on their 



THE DOCTBIKE. 219 

study of matter as far as its noblest and most com- 
plicated phenomena. The next step required was, 
that biologists should descend to the lowest and 
simplest functions of life, the only ones that could 
admit of a direct connexion with the inorganic basis 
laid by the cosmologist. Such was the most im- 
portant result of the admirable conception due to 
the true founder of the philosophy of biology, the 
incomparable Bichat By a profound analysis, the 
most noble vital functions, even in man, were con- 
sidered by philosophical biology as always resting 
on the lowest, in obedience to the general law of 
the order of natura Animal life is in all cases 
subordinate to vegetable life ; in other words, the 
life of relation is subordinate to that of nutrition. 

This luminous principle leads us to see that the 
only phenomena, really common to all living beings, 
are those of the decomposition and recomposition of 
their substance, which they are constantly under- 
going from the action upon them of external influ- 
ences; in other words, o{ ^mt hUieu. So our 
whole system of vital functions rests on acts which 
have a strong analogy with chemical results. The 
only real difference lies in the greater instability of 
oombination. In the vital phenomena, the compli- 
cations are also, it should be remembered, more com- 
plicated. The simple and fundamental life — ^that 
in which decomposition and recomposition are the 
exclusive phenomena — is found only in the vegetable. 
There it reaches its highest development. /TFot^ 
plants can directly assimilate inorganic materials, 



220 SECOND PART. 

and change tbem into organic substances. This is 
never the case with higher beings. In fiicfc the 
general definition of animal life is, that it derives 
its nourishment from living substances. On this 
definition, follow, as necessary conditions, the capa- 
city of discerning these substances and the power 
of procuring them— consequently sensibility and 
contractility. 

To consolidate this, his fundamental analysis of 
life, the groat Bichat was soon compelled to con- 
struct an anatomical conception which might be at 
once its complement and its strictest expression. 
The cellular tissue alone is universal and forms the 
proper seat of vegetable life. Animal life 'resides 
in the nervous and muscular tissues. This con- 
ception completes the general idea of biology. It 
establishes a sufiicient agreement between 4ts stati- 
cal and dynamical point of view to enable us to 
pass, with propriety, from the function to the organ, 
or from the organ to the function. 

In obedience to the ])recept of logic which bids 
us study all phenomena in the beings where they 
are most strongly marked and most free from any 
complication with higher phenomena, the theory of 
vegetable life becomes the normal basis of biology. 
It establishes directly the general laws of nutrition 
by a consideration of the case to which they apply 
in their simplest and intensest forms. This is the 
only part of biology which could be absolutely kept 
separate from sociology, were we for a moment to 
suppose that a subjective arrangement did not direct 



THE DOCTRINE, 221 

all objective intellectual cultivation. The theory of 
vegetable life is the natural transition from matter 
to life. 

The Woman, — I see by this, my father, that you 
are able to establish a continuous series so as to 
include the lower part of the scientific hierarchy. 
But when the point of departure is a form of life so 
low as the simple life of the vegetable, I do not see 
how we can rise to the true type of life, man, 
although I quite recognise that man is subject to 
the laws of nutrition as he is to those of weight. 

The Friest — The difficulty which you feel, my 
daughter, is precisely the one attempted to be met by 
the most important artifice in biology. All biologists 
from Aristotle to Blainville have, each in turn, 
contributed to its formation. <rheir object has been 
to form an immense scale, at once objective and 
subjective, destined to connect man with the plant. 
If the two extremes alone existed, a supposition 
which in no way involves a contradiction, then our 
scientific unity would become impossible, or at any 
i*ate very imperfect, in consequence of the sudden 
break in our construction. But the immense 
variety of animal organisms enables us to establish 
between the lowest form of life and the highest, as 
gradual a transition as our intelligence can require. 

Still this concrete series is necessarily not con- 
tinuous, by virtue of the fundamental law which, 
while it allows of secondary variations, yet keeps 
each species permanently distinct The old intel- 
lectual system was a great obstacle to the free 



222 SECOND PART. 

growth of our great construction ; for it vainly en- 
deavoured to find in this permanence of species the 
absolute result of objective relations. But the pre- 
dominance in our encyclopedia of the subjective 
method puts a final end to all such sterile and end- 
less debates. In forming the animal series, it takes 
as its continual guide the true object of that forma- 
tion — ^a logical rather than a scientific object. As 
we only study the animals to gain a sounder know- 
ledge of man by tracing through them hia con- 
nexion with plants, we are fully authorized to ex- 
clude from our hierarchy all the species which dis- 
turb it. An analogous motive enables us, or rather 
commands us, to introduce into the series, under 
proper restrictions, some races purely of our own 
creation, created for the special purpose of facili- 
tating the more difficult transitions, without any 
shock to the statical and dynamical laws of animal 
life. A fuller study of certain animals is really a 
question of practical utility, in the case of the few 
species with which the human race finds itself, on 
various grounds, more or less connected. All other 
zoological details are but the result of an intellec- 
tual degeneracy. Biology is, by its complication 
and vast extent, more than most sciences exposed 
to scholastic absurdities, so numerous even in 
mathematics. 

The animals, which are really links in our chain, 
will, as a whole, always have for us profound 
scientific interest. They tend to throw light on 
the general study of all our lower functions, as we 



THE DOCTRINE. TJiO 

can, in ihem, trace each function as it gradually 
becomes more simple or more complicated. Man's 
existence is reallj but the highest step in animal 
life. So the highest notions of sociology and even 
of moral science have their first germs in biology, 
for the minds of really philosophical power wh^h 
are able to detect them. For instance, it becomes 
easier for us to grasp our sublimest theoretic con^ 
ception, if we learn to look on each species of 
animals as potentially a Great Being. Actually it 
id more or less abortive, from the inferiority of its 
organization, and the growing predominance of 
man. For a collective or social existence is the 
form to which the life of relation, which is the 
characteristic feature of animality, necessarily 
leads. But this result, which all aim at, cannot, on 
one and the same planet, be attainable by more than 
one of the sociable species. 

The Womcm. — From your explanations I see, my 
father, how biology, when cultivated in a philoso- 
phical spirit, fills up all the serious gaps in your 
construction, by forming a gradual transition be- 
tween the external world and man. This immense 
progression, at once of beings and phenomena, in 
constant conformity with the principle of the 
Positive hierarchy, connects at its lower end with 
the regular succession of the three essential forms 
of the existence of matter. I see in it the full 
realization of that admirable continuity which at 
first seemed impossible. But before quitting the 
domain of life properly so called, I should lie glad 



224 SECOND PART. 

to know more clearly and precisely its two essential 
1 parts, vegetable and animal life. 
>^'''?^ Priest. — You can gratify this reasonable 
/wish, my daughter, by mastering the three great 
laws which govern each of them. You must look 
; oa these laws as so many general facts, subordinate 
/ to one another but completely distinct. Taken 
together, they explain both the continuous func- 
tions of the life of nutrition and the intermittent 
functions of the life of relation. 
* ' jlhe first law of vegetable life, the necessary basis 
of all our study of life, without any exception for 
the case of man, consists in the renewal of its sub- 
stance which every living being constantly requires. 
This fundamental law is followed by that of growth 
and decay, ending in death. Death is not in itself 
the necessary consequent of life, but it is every- 
where the constant result of it. Lastly, this first 
biological system is completed by the law of repro- 
duction, by which the preservation of the species 
compensates the loss of the individual. 

The most important property, common to all 
living beings, is the aptitude each has to produce 
offspring similar to itself, as it in turn was pro- 
duced by similar parents. Not merely is it true, 
that no organic existence ever sprung from inor- 
ganic nature ; but further, no species of any kind 
can spring firom one of a different kind, either in- 
ferior or superior. The limits of the exceptions to 
this rule are very narrow, and are as yet but little 
known. There is then a really impassable gulf 



THE DOCTRINE. ! 225 

between the worlds of life and of matter, and even, 
though less broad, between the different forms of 
vitality. This view strengthens our position, that 
any simply objective synthesis is impossible. But 
it in no way impairs the true subjective synthesis, in 
every case, the result of a very gradual ascent towd^s 
ihe type of man. 

As for the three laws of animal life, the first con- 
sists in the need of alternate exercise and rest which 
is felt throughout the whole life of relation, with 
no exception for our noblest attributes. This in- 
termittence, which is the characteristic of the animal 
functions, is naturally connected with the beautiful 
observation of Bichat on the constant symmetry of 
the organs answering to those functions. Half of 
each organ can be in action whilst the other half 
remains passive. The second law, which here, as 
elsewhere, presupposes the preceding one, without 
• being a consequence from it, proclaims the tendency 
of each of these intermittent functions to habitual 
exercise — ^that is to say, the function has an inhe- 
rent tendency to reproduce itself spontaneously 
when the original impulse has ceased. This law, 
the law of habit, finds its natural complement in 
that of imitation, nor are the two really distinct. 
According to the profound remark of Gabanis, the 
aptitude to imitate others is but the result of the 
aptitude to imitate oneself, at least in every species 
capable of sympathy. Lastly, the third* law of 
animal life, in subordination to that of habit, con- 
sists in the capability of improvement both In the 
Q 



226 flEOOlTD PABT; 

statical and dynamieal point of view^ inherent in all 
the phenomena of relation. In all alike, exercise 
strengthens the fnnctious and organs, prolonged 
disase tends to weaken them. This last law rests 
on the two others, but is distinct from them. It 
Bu#as up the whole theory of animal life, as 70a 
at once saw was the case with the last law of vege- 
table life. 

By a combination of these two great laws, each 
the last of its respectiye series, you form a seventh 
law of life, that of hereditary transmission. This 
deserves a distinct scientific appreciation, although 
logically, it is only a necessary consequence of the 
preceding laws. As every function or structure in 
the animal world is perfectible up to a certain point, 
it is clear that every living being's capability of 
reproducing its like may fix in the species the mo- 
difications which have taken place in the individual, 
supposing those modifications to have taken suffi- 
cient root. It follows that there is a power of im- 
provement, limited but continuous, dynamical in 
the main, but also statical, in every race whatever, 
each generation in succession contributing its quota. 
This important faculty, in which the two systems 
of biological laws find a natural expression, is sus- 
ceptible of greater development in proportion as 
the race is higher. For by being higher it more 
readily admits of modifications, as it is also more 
active by virtue of its greater complication. 

Although the general laws which regulate here- 
ditary transtiaission are as yet too little known, the 



THE DOCTRINE. 227 

above considerations indicate its high eflScacy as re- 
gards the direct amelioration of man's nature, his phy- 
sical, intellectual, and above all his moral nature. It is 
an indisputable fact that hereditary transmission is as 
applicable, or even more applicable, to our noblest 
attributes as to our lowest. For phenomena become 
more susceptible of modification, and consequently 
of improvement, in proportion as they are by nature 
higher and more special. The valuable results 
obtained in the principal races of domestic animals 
convey but a faint idea of the improvements | 
which are reserved for the most eminent species, ; 
under the systematic guidance of its own provi- / 
dence. , »-^ -"^ 

The Woman, — This general conclusion of the \ 
study of life makes me fully see its theoretical and 
practical importance. I feel now ready to study 
directly the order of man's world, reserved for our 
last conversation on the doctrine of Positivism. 

Tlit Friest. — ^You may, my daughter, find it ; 
useful to sum up, under its most important philo- t 
sophical aspect, ouripresent conversation. You may 
do it by merely contrasting, as you see is done, in 
our synopsis^ the two divisions of Positive Philo-.' 
sophy, the historical and doctrinal divisioi^s. In 
the historical division, the one adapted fg^.th*:- 
initiation alike of the individual or the B(/fi^^t '«e 
place biology in close connexion with ; eaer^i^^^yy/. 
In the doctrinal, which represents/ omr^^tli^fi^ 
state, on the contrary, we com^liw H<>^B^ith / 
The contrast bri^ip i>^^^'. f^ff^y the"^ 
Q 2 ^ 



22S ' ^, SEPOND PART. 

most important characteristic of the order, of life, as 
the natural connecting link in the serie^ between 
. the world of matter and the world of man. . 



% CONVERSATION VIII. 

• MAN — FI^ST, AS A SOCIAL, SECONDLY, AS A 
MORAL BEING. 

The Womcm, — Before we enter on the highest 
province of science, I must draw your attention, my 
father, to a general difficulty. It is the outcome 
of the metaphysical objections I have often heard 
urged against the extension of the Positive doctrine 
to this province, an extension on which its success 
depends. To subject social and moral phenomena 
to invariable laws of the same nature as the laws 
to which the phenomena of life and matter are 
subjected — this is represented by certain reasoners 
as incompatible with the liberty of man. These 
objections always seemed to me simply sophistical, 
yet I never knew how to meet them. They influ- 
ence far too many, and act as a check on their 
natural inclination to adopt Positivism. 

The Priest. — It is easy, my daughter, to over- 

«)0't^V this preliminary difficulty by a direct state- 

^^eiw ^^e nature of true liberty. 

<^ -: iab.*»rt|^^v in its true sense, is in no way incom- 

';pjfl«»iky N. fUliW order of things. On the contrary, 

in "^ffiW^ ^•-^ft -Mfcierty consists in obeying, without 

ny if^|4*«a^^ <|^laws which in each case are 

\ 



THE DOCTRINE. » 229 

applicable^. When a body falls, it shows itQ liberty, 
by moviug- according to its nature towards the 
centre of the earth, with a velocity propoi-tionate 
to the time, unless the interference of a fluid modi- 
fies its natural action.* So in the department of 
life, every function, vegetable or animal, is said to 
be free, if it exerts itself according to the laws 
a^licable to its case, without any bin'drance from 
within or from without. The intellectual and 
moral existence of man admits of the application of 
the same principle. This is seen directly in the case 
of our action, but if true of our action it becomes 
at once necessary for the motor of our action, that 
is, our affection ; necessary also for that which guides 
our action, our reason. 

K liberty for man consisted in his obeying no 
law, such liberty would be even more immoral than 
absurd, for it would make every system of life im- 
possible for the individual or for the society. Our 
intellect then most fully evidences its liberty when 
it fulfils that which is its vocation, in its normal 
state — ^when it becomes, that is, the faithful mirror 
of the world without, in spite of the physical or 
moral impulses which might have a tendency to 
disturb its action. No one can refuse a,n intellectual 
assent to demonstrations which he understands. Nay 
more, no one can reject the opinions 'w^hich are 
generally received by those among whom he lives, 
even though he do not know the foundation on 
which they rest, granting that he have no previous 
belief of the contrary. For instance, we might 



230 . ^ SECOND PART. 

challenge the proudest metaphysicians to deny the 
earth's motion, or doctrines of still more recent 
origin ; and yet they have no knowledge whatever of 
the scientific proofis of such doctrines. It is the same 
in respect to moral order. It would be one mass 
of contradictions, nay the very idea of it would be 

, contradictory, were it possible for every one, at his 
own good pleasure, to hate when he ought to love, 
or vice versd. The will admits of a liberty similar 
to that of the intellect. The will is jfree, when our 

, good instincts acquire such ascendancy that our 
affection can do its proper work, and, by its impulse, 
enable us to overcome our bad instincts, the egoistic 
motors. Thus in every case equally, true, liberty is 
inherent in, and subordinate to, the order which 
prevails, whether for man, or in the external world. 
But in proportion as the phenomena become more 
complicated, they become mo;re exposed to dis- 
turbance. Hence the need of greater efforts to 
maintain their normal state — efforts, however, for 
which there is abundant scope, owing to their being 
more open to systematic modifications. Our highest 
liberty, then, consists in making, as far as possible, 
our good inclinations predominate over otir bad. 
This, too, is the direction in which our power is 
capable of most extension, provided always that, 
in our intervention, we act in constant obedience 
to the* fundamental laws of the whole order of 
tilings. 

The doctrine of metaphysics on the so-called moral 
liberty must be considered, historically, as a tern- 



THE DOCTRINB. 231 

porary result of modem anarehy. Its direct aim 
is to sanction complete individaalism, the ultimate 
limit to which ve have been approximating since 
the close of the Middle Ages, and during the insur- 
rectionary period which in Western Europe natu- 
rally followed on that close. But ^ this sophistical 
protest against all sound discipline, whether private 
or public, will never be able to fetter Positivism, 
though successful as against Catholicism. It will 
never be possible to represent as hostile to the 
liberty and dignity of man, a doctrine which places 
on a sure basis, and gives free scope to, the action, 
the intellect, and the feelings of man. 

The Woman, — By the aid of this preliminary 
explanation, I shall be able, my £Btther, henceforth 
to meet sophisms which have yet great weight, 
where there is deficient cultivation. Would you 
now explain at once how Positivism evidences its 
universal competence by a successful application of 
its doctrine to the phenomena of society 9 

The Priest, — At the outset, my daughter, you 
must look on the great science of sociology as made 
up of two essential parts : the one statical, or the 
theory of order ; the other dynamical, or the theory 
of progress. It is the first that claims our special 
attention in religious instruction, for there the fun- 
damental nature of the Great Being is the direct 
object of our study. But the. dynamical, portion 
must complete the conception formed by the "first, 
by explaining the successive doctrines of Humanity, 
in ''order to a right direction of our social action. 



232 SECOND PART. 

These two halves of sociology are bound one to 
another in closest union, by virtue of a general 
principle laid down by Positivism^ with a view to 
connect throughout the study of movement with 
that of existence. Progress is the devdopmeni of 
order. Such a law, applicable even in mathematics, 
finds a larger application in proportion as the phe- 
nomena become more complicated. The distinption 
in this case becomes more marked between the sta- 
tical and the dynamical state. At the same time 
the simplification produced by this connexion of 
our studies acquires a greater value. It is in soci- 
ology, then, that this great principle finds its best 
application, as it is to sociology that we trace its 
systematic adoption. In this science it is as appli- 
cable if you invert it, as if you take it as it origin- 
ally stands. For the successive states in which man 
has existed must in this way throw more and more 
light on the essential constitution of the race. The 
germs of that constitution must be traceable in its 
first outline in the primeval state. But to explain 
the theoretical and practical efficacy of dynamic 
sociology is the special object of the conversation 
with which we shall conclude this Catechism. For 
the present, I must confine myself to an explana- 
tion of the principal notions of social statics. 

The Woman, — I may add that your doing so, my 
father, suits my inadequate knowledge of history. 
l%ough the conceptions of social statics must be 
more abstract than those of social dynamics, I shall 
find it easier to grasp them, if I give the attention 



THE DOCTRINE. 233 

which their importance and difficulty require. 'At 
any rate, I shall be supported under the sense of 
my ignorance by Ifae certainty of finding in myself 
the confirmation of a doctrine based on the direct 
study of human nature. 

The Priest — You are right, my daughter; an 
attentive examination of yourself will show you at 
once the necessary constitution of society. For if 
society is to represent, as it shotild do, the general 
exisFtenceof Humanity, it must allow, unmistakeably, 
a combination of all the essential attributes of man. 
In your own existence you can trace these attri- 
butes. If not very distinct, they are yet sufficiently 
so for you to be able to conceive how they may 
ultimately act in perfect harmony, when each of 
them shall have a collective organ, and by means of 
that organ shall be enabled to give full expression 
to its peculiar characteristics. 

Consider Humanity as being like yourself, only 
in a more marked degree, impelled by feeling, 
guided by intelligence, and supported by action. 
At once you have the three essential elements of 
society : the sex in which affection prevails ; the 
contemplative class, that is, the priesthood ; and 
the active class. I have arranged them according 
to their decrease in dignity, but also according to 
their increase in independence. The last then is the 
necessary basis of the whole economy of the Great^ 
Being, in obedience to the fundamental law, with 
which you are now familiar, that the noblest attri- 
butes are in all cases subordinate to the lowest. 



234 '^ SECOND PABT. 

In reality, the unintermitting wants, which are 
the result of our bodily constitution, enforce on 
Humanity an amount of action which constitutes 
the most marked feature in her existence. For de- 
veloping this activity the need of co-operation be- 
comes constantly greater. So action, whilst it is 
the most powerful stimulant of our intelligence^ 
supplies the strongest excitement to our sociability. 
In reference to this last, it makes solidarity more 
completely subordinate to continuity — ^for it is in 
continuity that resides the most characteristic, as 
well as the noblest, attribute of the Great Being. 
The material results of human co-operation depend 
more on the combined action of a succession of 
generations than on that of the families who at any 
one time co-exist. It follows, that far from being 
absolutely un&vourable to the free play of the 
intellect and morality, this continuous prepon- 
derance of active life ought to furnish the best 
security for our unity, by providing the intellect 
and the heart with a definite direction and a pro* 
gre|isive object Without this all-pervading im- 
pulse, our besiti, mental and even our best moral 
dispositions would soon degenerate and become 
mere vague and incoherent tendencies, resulting in 
no progress either for the individual or the com- 
munity. 

Still, as such activity must always originate in a 

' personal impulse; such origin will at first stamp it 

With a profoundly egoistical character. This can 

only become altruistic by a gradual transforma- 



THE DOCfTRINE. 235 

tion due to the development of the social impulae. 
This is the reason why, in order fully to understand 
the constitution of the society, we must break up 
its active class into two constituent parts, always 
distinct, and often in opposition the one to the 
other. They have as their special object, the one, to 
develope the practical impulse with the strong per- 
sonality implied in its great energy, the other, the 
reaction of society on the personal impulse, a reac- 
tion which raises it more and more. 

It is indispensable to break up the active class in 
this way. All we have to do, is to divide the active 
power of society, and consider it as concentrated or 
dispersed, according as it is the result of wealth or 
of number. j^ 

The power of wealth can only tell indirectly. 
Btill, it is generally the stronger, and it has a ten- 
dency to become so more and more, representing, 
as it does, the continuity of our race, whilst that of 
numbers represents its solidarity. For the material 
treasures which Humanity entrusts to the rich, 
are the result of a long antecedent accumulation. 
There is no objection to this statoioent in the fact 
that-^heir necessary consumption constitutes a per- 
manent demand for partial renovation. Any strong 
practical impulse, then, must come from the patii- 
date. In that body is vested the control of the 
capital of the race, the great nutritive reservoirs, 
the social efficiency of which mainly depends on 
their being concentrated in few hands. Thus pro- 
perty receives a direct sancti^i from Positive reli- 



236 8ECOFD PART. 

gion, as being the essential condition of any con- 
tinuous activity, and, as such, indirectly the basis 
of our noblest progress. 

The second practical element, without which the 
first would be worth nothing, is the proletariate, 
which of necessity forms the great body of every 
nation. Its only means of gaining social influence 
is union. Hence it has a direct tendency to bring 
into play our highest feelings. By the force of its 
position, the attention of the proletariate is mainly 
directed, at all times, on the moral regulation of an 
economy, any disturbance of which falls most espe- 
cially on it. Naturally free from the serious re- 
8ponsibility and the mental absorption which all 
authority brings with it, be it theoretical or prac- 
tical authority, the spontaneous action of the pro- 
letariate is calculated to recall both the priesthood 
and the patriciate to a sense of their social duty. 

The Womom, — I believe, my father, that this con- 
tinuous influence of the active class is also quite as 
indispensable for women. It is needed to control 
or to compensate the exaggeration of feeling. Not 
mixing in active life, my sex is often disposed not 
to see or not to allow for the rough conditions it 
imposes. However, as we are under the sway of 
feeling, we may always be brought to accept these 
conditions, if, by accepting them, we can gain the 
object of woman's natural aspirations. But the 
necessities of active life must be the impulse to a 
right judgment on such points. 

The Priest. — Your, remark shows, my daughter, 



THE DOCTRINE. 237 

that you completely understand the peculiar social 
office of the proletariate. For if even the affective sex 
can forget its true influence, and be too exclusively 
occupied with its own particular want, the speculative 
and the active classes are naturally far more exposed 
to this danger, as their attention is habitually taken 
up with points of detail The moral providence 
exercised by women, the intellectual providence 
vested in the priesthood, and the material provi- 
dence of the patriciate — all equally require for their 
completion the general providence of the proletariate. 
With this complement we perfect the constitution 
of the admirable system of human providence. 
Thus all the powers of man, each according to its 
nature, are made to conduce to the preservation and 
improvement of Humanity. 

We thus gain a general conception of the con- 
stitution of human society, which enables us to 
characterize its three essential elements. They 
take their rank on the principle of their decreasing 
aptitude to represent Humanity. Nor is the order 
different, if we look to the predominant influence 
which each exercises in its turn on every one who 
is completely educated. First comes the providence 
of woman, the power which, through our whole life, 
presides over our moral growth. Under its guidance, 
we learn to feel continuity and solidarity ; for it 
directs education during the period whilst it pro- 
ceeds unsystematically in the bosom of the family. 
As a next step, the providence of the priesthood 
teaches us to systematize our conceptions of the 



238 SECOND PABT. 

nature and the destiny of the Great Being. This 
it does by disclosing to us, step by step, the order 
of the world, its material, social, and moral order. 
Lastly, we come into direct contact with, and obe- 
dience to, the power of the material providence — 
the patriciate and proletariate. We are initiated by 
it in practical life, and our preparation is completed 
by the influence of active life on our affections and 
thoughts. 

The full completion of our individual develops 
ment, the development of the brain as well as of 
the body, coincides naturally, in point of time, with 
the completion, as a general rule, of our initiation aa 
members of society. The combination of the two 
constitutes our real maturity. We then enter on 
our second life, a life essentially of action, succeed- 
ing the system of preparations which have fitted us 
for the service of Humanity. This fresh stage of 
our objective existence, though generally shorter 
than the first, is alone decisive. On it alone, that 
is, depends whether each head of a family attains 
or not the subjective existence which shall, accord- 
ing to his merits, incorporate* him into Humanity. 

To get a better idea of this constitution of society, 
we must consider, separately, its two most special 
elements, the only classes properly so called, the 
priesthood which counsels, the patriciate which 
commands. These two classes respectively are to 
preserve and increase the spiritual and material 
treasures of Humanity. They also preside over the 
proper distribution of these treasures amongst her 



THE DOCTRINE. 239 

servants, in obedience to the laws which govern 
each of the two. 

We look to the theoretical class, in the first 
place, for systematic education. Secondly, we give 
it an influence over the whole of life, a consultative 
influence, that is. We do so, that it may bring the 
action of each individual into harmony with the 
axstion of the rest^ a point which in active life we 
are too apt to neglect. The admirable institution 
of human language is the special patrimony of the 
priesthood, for language is the natural depositary of 
religion, and the most important instrument in its 
exercise. But whilst we assign language thus 
specially to the priesthood, we must not forget that 
it has never been the work of any special class, but 
a result of the co-operation of the whole race. By 
its very nature, spiritual wealth is imperishable, 
and as such admits of being enjoyed simultaneously 
by all without being exhausted. So that to preserve 
it no distribution is needed, and its preservation is 
but a simple adjunct of the priestly office. Lan- 
guage is eminently synthetical and social ; it con- 
solidates and developes the natural subordination of 
the world of man to the external world. It also 
strengthens the union of man with man. This it 
does above aU by bringing into the closest connexion 
the systematic wisdom of the philosopher and the 
oommon sense of mankind. 

Material products are destined for individual 
use, and are, by their nature, perishable. Hence 
the laws of their preservation and use are totally 



240 SECOND PART. 

different. Material products, then, form the proTinoe 
of the patriciate, as a body, aided by the general 
Buperintendenoe of society. But more than this, it is 
necessary that they should be appropriated to indi- 
Yidaal& If not so appropriated their concentra- 
tion, and as a rule they must be concentrated, be- 
comes illusory or rather impossible. This inntitu- 
tion of property, the primary basis of the material 
providence, must rest on the land, otherwise it will 
not have the requisite degree of stability; for the 
land is naturally the seat, as it is necessarily the 
source, of all actual production. Thus by a natural 
process are formed, in the course of generations, the 
nutritive reservoirs of Humanity. Their permanent 
destination is the constant renewal of man*s exis- 
tence. Those in whose hands the control of these 
reservoirs is placed have to direct the labours re- 
quired by this process. 

This is the main ojQice of the patriciate. It con- 
sists in restoring to each man the materials which 
he is constantly consuming in the service of society, 
either as provisions for his subsistence, or as the 
instruments by which he discharges his functions. 
Wages, rightly viewed, have no other func> 
tion whatever to the class that receives them. 
The labour of man, that is to say, the successful 
efforts man makes to modify his destiny, is really 
never otherwise than gratuitous. It does not admit 
ot it does not require any payment in the strict 
sense. The term equivalent is appropriate when 
we are dealing with the materials of labour. It is 



THE DOCTRINE. 241 

inapplicable^ when we are considering the relation 
of the labourer to his work. This is a truth which 
has always been reoc^nised in the case of the 
affective sex and the contemplative class, nay even 
in the case of that portion of the. active class which 
pays the wages of the rest. The inherently gra- 
tuitous character of labour is disputed, then, only in 
the case of the proletariate, in the case of those, 
that is, who receive the least. The contradiction 
such a result involves clearly indicates the source, 
historically, of this anomaly. It is due essentially, 
not to any inferiority in the labour of the class in 
question, but to the long servitude of its members. 
Positive religion alone can on this point overcome 
modem anarchy. It does so by enforcing on all a 
sense that individual services never admit of any 
other reward than the satisfaction of rendering 
them, and the grateful feeling they excite. 

The Woman. — ^Vulgar minds may treat this view 
as a mere sentimental exaggeration, but I venture 
to promise you, my father, that it will soon meet 
with a cordial reception among women. I have 
often been shocked by the prevailing egoism. We 
are in the habit of thinking that a paltry money pay- 
ment supersedes all need of gratitude for important 
and difficult services, services which compromise 
the health, and sometimes the life, on each occasion, 
of those who perform them. This Positivist prin- 
ciple of the gratuitousness of labour gives a syste- 
matic consistency to feelings universally felt. All 
that such feelings need to secure their gradual pre- 

R 



2^2 SECOND PABT. 

valence is, expression and method. This principle 
is the last step in the process by which I have been 
brought to see that it is possible to stamp on oar 
whole existence, even on its material part, an al- 
truistic character. All that is requisite for this holy 
transformation is, that we all, without attaining to 
a state of habitual enthusiasm, should have a deep 
sense that we have each our share in the common 
work. Now such a conviction can certainly be 
produced by a system of wise education in which 
all should participate — an education in which the 
heart will dispose the intellect to grasp truth as a 
whole, not in some details. 

The Priest. — In order to complete this our fiin- 
damental view of the constitution of society, it 
remains for me, my daughter, to explain the three 
forms it may take, or the three .associations which 
rise one above the other. 

Every collective organism, in other words every 
association, necessarily contains the several elements 
which I have just explained. But these consti> 
tuent parts have more or less of a marked character, 
and consequently are more or less distinct^ accord- 
ing to the nature and extent of the society under 
consideration. Their respective predominance leads 
us to recognise three different forms of human asso- 
ciation. Their order is determined by the decreas- 
ing closeness of the union, and their increasing 
extent. The intermediate one rests on its j»e- 
decessor, and is the basis of the one that follows. 
The only one where the natural foundation is love, 



THE DOCTRINE. 243 

the Family, is the closest in point of union, the 
narrowest in extent, and is the necessary element 
of the two others. Man's action next leads to the 
formation of the OUy, The bond in this case results 
from, an habitual co-operation, the sense of which 
would be too weak if this political association were 
to include too large a number of families. Lastly 
comes the Ghwrch, Here the essential bond is 
faith. The Church alone can be really universal, 
and its universality will be a necessary consequence 
of Positive religion. These three forms of human 
society have as their respective centres, the womsai, 
the patriciate, and the priesthood. 

We all are members of a family, and that fiamily 
is always part of some city or other, and even of 
some church or other. But the church tie is weaker, 
and therefore susceptible of greater variation, though 
always within fixed limits. When it has attained 
sufficient consistency, we can by its aid and by no 
other means reduce the city to a proper size. The 
city is the centre around which each man centres 
his existence, by virtue of the natural preponderance 
of action over intellect, and even over feeling. 
For on no other condition can the social state be 
really permanent but on that of reconciling inde- 
pendence with joint action, both of which are 
equally inherent in the true idea of Humanity. 
Now this necessary agreement requires that political 
societies shall exist within limits much narrower 
than those usual, at the present day. 

In the Middle Ages there existed in outline the 
r2 



244 SECOND PART. 

separation between the religions and the civil 
society. Hence it was possible, even then, to sub- 
stitute the free incorporation of the nations of the 
West, for the compulsory incorporation originallj 
enforced by the dominion of Bome. Western 
Europe thus presented, during several centuries, 
the admirable spectacle of an entirely voluntaiy 
union, an union founded solely on a common Mth, 
and maintained by a common priesthood between 
nations whose different governments had all the 
independence that was requisite. But this great 
political result could not survive the premature 
emancipation of a power which Positive religion 
alone can organize aright and finally enfranchise. 
The necessary decline of Catholicism led to a fresh 
concentration of the temporal power. The step 
was at the time indispensable to prevent the entire 
political dissolution which seemed imminent, as the 
consequence of the increasing disruption of all 
religious bonds. Hence it was, that notwithstanding 
the feelings and opinions of the Middle Ages, the 
traces of which are yet visible, the nations of 
Western Europe acquiesced in the formation every- 
where of States on far too large a scale. 

The political reasons for this exorbitant extension 
are now no longer valid. And even in France men 
begin to feel the danger inherent in this anomalous 
position, and to feel abo that its end is i^proaching. 
Positive religion will soon reduce these monster 
associations to the normal size. There will then be 
no need of force to maintain a temporal union 



THE DOCTRINE. 2i5 

between nations, where a spiritual union alone is 
admissible. Thus shall we shortly apply our statical 
principle, which considers the single city the organ 
politically of Humanity, including in the city, by 
way of complement, the less condensed population 
in natural connexion with it. The feeling of 
patriotism is now va^e and weak in consequence 
of its excessive diffusion. It will in the new order 
be able to develope fully all the energy allowed 
by its concentration in the city. At the same time 
the habitual union of the great cities will become 
more real and more efficacious, for it will assume its 
normal character, that of a voluntary concert. Posi- 
tive faith will inspire a due sense of the solidarity 
and even of the continuity which must finally prevail 
between all portions of the earth without exception. 

The Womcm. — I feel now, my &ther, prepared, 
by your explanations of the theory of society, to 
take my seat at last at the highest point of the 
encyclopedic ediiice, the successive stages of which 
you have brought under my notice. Moral science 
must of course be the hardest of all Yet so far as 
ooncerns its empirical cultivation, my sex is too 
familiar with it for me to feel the alarm I felt in 
the case of the others. I am therefore glad to have 
reached in due time the systematic study of man as 
an individual 

The Priest. — In truth, my daughter, this, the 
necessary termination of the whole encyclopedic 
preparation, is alone able to satisfy the intellect as 
it does the heart. Moral science is more synthetical 



246 SECOND PART. 

than any other. Its direct connexion with prac- 
tice gives strength to this its natural attribute. In 
moral science alone do all the abstract points of 
view meet' spontaneously to take the general 
guidance of concrete reason. From Thales to Pascal 
every genuine thinker has cultivated simultaneously 
geometry and morals, from a secret presentiment of 
the great hierarchy in which they should be finally 
combined The term microcosm, or lesser world, 
applied by the ancients to man, was even then an 
indication of the feeling that in the study of man all 
others might be condensed. Morals are naturally 
the only science susceptible of real completeness. 
No essential point need be put out of view, as must be 
the case in each of the sciences which serve as their 
basis. For when we look on these sciences as, each 
in its proper sphere, deciding what are the laws 
which man obeys, they only attain this end by pur- 
posely neglecting all the higher properties whidi 
their respective provinces might embrace, whilst 
they incorporate only the inferior ones. By this 
course of decreasing abstraction, the intellect is 
finally prepared to enter on the only study in which 
it is no longer compelled to abstract any essential 
property from the common object of all our various 
branches of human speculations. In no other way 
can meditation, the characteristic of the masculine 
intellect, be irrevocably united with contemplation, 
the distinctive feature of woman's intelligence — an 
union which constitutes the final condition of 
human reason. 



THB DOCJTBINtt 247 

We begin with cosmology, which lays down the 
laws of mere matter. Then, on the basis thus laid, 
Hology constructs the theory of life. Lastly, soci- 
(dogy brings forward the study of the collectiye or 
social existence of man in subordination to the 
twofold foundation laid. This last of the pre- 
liminary sciences is more complete than its prede- 
cessors. Still it does not yet embrace the whole of 
human nature. For our most important attributes 
find but an inadequate appreciation in sociology. 
By its nature, sociology considers in man his intel- 
ligence and his activity, in combination with all our 
lower properties, but not in direct subordination to 
the feelings which are highest of alL The develop' 
ment of society places in the strongest light our 
theoretical and practical progress. Even in the 
statics of sociology, our feelings are only considered 
in reference to the social impulses derived from them, 
or to the modifications society introduces. Their 
peculiar laws, to be properly studied, must be studied 
in moral science. There they acquire the prepon- 
derance due to their higher rank in the system of 
human nature. This it is which leads minds of an 
unsystematic order to underrate the fulness of the 
synthetical character which distinguishes this final 
science. They limit it too closely to this its most 
important sphere, whereas that sphere is but the 
centre around which the rest must be finally 
grouped. 

The Woman, — The theoretical connexion between 
sociology and morals is not yet clear from mists. 



248 8E00TSD PART. 

Would you, my father, scatter these mists before 
you pass to the direct exposition of the Positive 
conception of human nature ? I have not forgotten 
the indisputable reasons which in our fundamental 
conversation made me recognise the objective sub- 
ordination of morals to sociology, since man is 
always subordinate to Humanity. But on the other 
hand, it seems to me that the social science stands 
in continual need of the more important notions 
that morals are able to give it as to the true nature 
of man. 

The Priest. — ^Yotu* very resBonable difficulty, my 
daughter, will disappear, if you take into account 
that we have always some previous knowledge, ac- 
quired by our own efforts, which prepares the way 
for systematic study. Science is always simply the 
continuation of the good sense of mankind It 
never really creates any of the more important 
doctrines. The object of theory is the generaliza- 
tion and co-ordination of the empirical results of 
human reason, with a view of securing for those 
results the consistency and development otherwise 
unattainable. Such a connexion is more peculiarly 
appropriate in the study of morals. They could not, 
it is true, owing to their higher degree of complica- 
tion, be systematized till the last, but at the same 
time, by the force of their preponderant importance, 
they always supplied the main food for our ordinary 
meditations, especially those of women. From this 
empirical culture we soon gained some notions, which, 
in spite of their incoherence, were very valuable. 



THE DOCTRINE. 249 

They have hitherto, it is true, heen despised hy 
minds of systematic tendencies, but only because 
such minds could £nd no place for them in their theo- 
logical or metaphysical theories. PositiTism alone is 
capable of taking in the social point of view j there- 
fore on it devolved the task of generalizing and 
co-ordinating these empirical notions, after founding 
the last of the preliminary sciences. Its ability to 
systematize them enabled it to appreciate their value 
in spite of philosophical prejudices ; and so it could 
turn them to immediate account in the construction 
of sociology. If you examine closely the way in 
which we habitually avail ourselves in sociology of 
the knowledge of human nature, you will soon see 
that all that we really use are these spontaneous 
notions, which have far more reality in them than 
all the moral speculations of earlier philosophers. 
This empirical sketch is sufiicient for our concep- 
tions, so far as they concern the collective existence 
of man, before it has been reduced to the systematic 
shape which the final science alone can determine. 

The Woman, — ^Your explanation, my father, en- 
tirely does away with the confusion which* I had 
noticed by the way as existing between the two 
essential aspects of the order of man, the social and 
the moral. My ignorance had preserved me from 
the classical theories of human nature. So I am 
the better able to appreciate the real character of 
the moral ideas which sociology employs, and to see 
their coincidence with the results obtained by the 
spontaneous action of human reason. 



250 SECOND PART. 

The Priest, — As a direct foundation for the final 
science, it is sufficient, my daughter, to put in proper 
systematic form the division which the common 
sense of man early recognised in the whole of man's 
existence — ^the division into feeling, intellect, and 
action. In the oldest poets we may trace this 
analysis under different forms. They proceed from, 
it as their basis, and complete it, on empirical 
grounds, by the general division of our inclinations 
into personal and social. The theories of theology, 
and still more of metaphysics, were, in a special 
degree, unable to give its due prominence to this 
last idea. But it is a conception which is so self- 
evident as to overcome all philosophical sophisms, 
where there has been no mental cultivation. Such 
is the natural province of morals. To systematize 
and develope it is the essential object of moral 
science. Morals, as all the other branches of real 
science, are occupied in the main with determining 
the general laws of the commonest phenomena ; as, 
for instance, chemistry mainly studies the laws of 
combustion and fermentation. Although moral 
science was a subject which theology could not 
adequately handle, we must not pass over without 
its due notice the attempt made at the beginning of 
Catholicism by its real founder. The object was to 
meet the want of a system created by the new 
religious teaching. The great St. Paul, in his general 
doctrine of the permanent struggle between nature 
and grace, stated, though in an imperfect form, and 
solved in his own way, the whole moral problem, 



THE DOCTRINE. 251 

not merely as far as regards its practical difficalty, 
but also as a theoretic question. The value of the 
solution he invented lay in its offering provisionally 
a compensation for a radical defect in monotheism. 
Monotheism is irreconcileable with the existence in 
our nature of the instincts of benevolence, the 
inclinations which lead all creatures to a mutual 
union, instead of devoting themselves separately to 
their Creator. In spite of all the flaws inherent in 
such a theory, its development in the Middle Ages 
is really the only great advance made by moral 
science between the period of its rudimentary state 
in the early theocratic times and its recent formation 
into a Positive science. Its form in the Middle 
Ages was at any rate a better embodiment of the 
main results of the good sense of mankind than the 
lamentable ontology which guided men in the gradual 
dissolution of Catholicism. Hence the Mystics of 
the fifteenth century, and above all, the admirable 
author of the hmtaUon, are the only thinkers in whom, 
before Positivism, you can trace a really general 
view of human nature. The metaphysical concep- 
tion of that nature is in all cases extremely de- 
fective. When I remind you of St. Paul's moral 
doctrine, so justly dear to you in your youth, it is 
not merely that I wish to honour an attempt which 
is now too generally undervalued. It was a pro- 
visional substitute for the Positive theory of human 
nature, which could not be formed till after a long 
period of objective preparation. But more than 
this, it spontaneously prepared the way for the 



252 SECOND PABT. 

Positive theory, by marking out its systematic domain. 
It was under its influence that, even prior to the 
foundation of sociology, from the true scientific 
point of view, a decisive attempt was made to con- 
stitute moral .science. The attempt was not suc- 
cessful, but it was made immediately after the rise 
of the philosophy of biology. 

The first step was to establish, in this highest 
province of theory, a general harmony between the 
statical and dynamical points of view. It was 
necessary for this to determine the seat of our chief 
functions. The metaphysical view was a mere con-., 
fusion. It made the intellect supreme, and assigned 
it the brain. But the reason of mankind had 
broken through the mists of philosophical specula- 
tion. It held a different doctrine at any rate as 
to our inclinations, especially as to our personal 
inclinations. It was guided on this point by their 
spontaneous eneigy. The philosophers of antiquity 
sanctioned the distinction between them by placing 
them, though vaguely, in the different viscera of onr 
nutritive system. Still, no organ was set apart for 
our instincts of sympathy, and science, agreeing with 
theology, always spoke of the passions as if we had 
none but bad ones. Besides, the intellect remained 
undivided, and its subordination to the feelings 
found no expression in the theory. 

I have given you this historical introductioik, 
that you may duly appreciate the admirable effort 
of genius by which Gall founded the Positive theory 
of human nature. He was unable however to con- 



THE DOCTTRINE. 253 

struct it in such a way as to secure its efficiency. 
To do so required sociology. He gave a powerful 
impulse however by laying down two general 
principles, the one dynamical, the other statical. 
They are closely connected, and will always be the 
basis of the true study of the soul and the brain. 
Gall showed that our higher fanctions, mental and 
moral, were plural, and that they all had their seat 
in the brain. The several regions of the brain 
must, then, correspond to the real distinctness 
between them. Gall fell into many important errors, 
especially in regard to the intellect They were the 
result of a superficial analysis and an empirical 
determination of the position of the different organs. 
But he succeeded in giving an adequate idea of th6 
general method of analyzing our compound exis- 
tence, and he even succeeded in establishing the fact 
that we have benevolent inclinations. The imaginary 
conflict between nature and grace — ^the conception 
of St. Paul — ^is for the future abandoned. And we 
replace it by the real opposition between the poste- 
rior part of the brain, the seat of our personal in- 
stincts, and its anterior region, the seat both of our 
sympathetic impulses and our intellectual faculties, 
which however have distinct positions. Such is the 
indestructible basis on which, as the founder of Posi- 
tive religion, I proceeded to construct my systematic 
theory of the brain and the soul. I had previously 
constituted sociology, from which alone could come 
l^e inspiration I required. 

The Womtm, — I seem to get a glimpse, my father, 



25i SECOND PART. 

of the wide philosophical importance of the two 
principles laid down hj Gall, the immediate pre- 
cursor of Positivism. The constant mutual action 
of our feelings and our thoughts, as well as the 
natural relations of our several instincts, could not 
be adequately accounted for, so wide apart were 
the positions respectively assigned them. On jowr 
theory of the brain, we can at length form a con- 
ception of these important relations, and by its aid 
we can secure their greater constancy. Still, if we 
deprive the nutritive organs of any moral character, 
however alien such a character is to their merely 
physical function, we have a great omission to 
supply. How are we to accoimt for the undisputed 
connexion of these organs with our higher functions ? 
The reciprocal influence of man's physical and moral 
nature was exaggerated in the ancient hypothesis, 
but it seems unduly neglected in the modern view. 
The Priest. — Your reproach is only applicable, 
my daughter, to the cerebral theory in its rudimen- 
tary state. It is not applicable to its flnal state. 
In that final state these great relations are fully sys- 
tematized. We retain the true notions which so 
long accredited the old hypothesis, but we limit the 
influence of our nutritive system to our iustincts 
properly so called. We do not allow that our in- 
tellectual functions, or even our impulses to action, 
have any direct participation in that influence. 
The speculative and the active regions of the brain 
communicate through the nerves only with the 
senses and the muscles. That communication gives 



THE DOCTRINE. 255 

US the perception of the outer world and the power 
of modifying it. On the other hand, the affective 
region, which forma the largest mass of the brain, 
has no direct communication with the outer world. 
It is only indirectly connected with it through its 
relations with the intellectual and active regions. 
But besides this connexion with the other parts of 
the brain, special nerves bring the affective region 
into the closest relation with the most important 
organs of our nutritive system, in consequence of 
the necessary subordination of our personal instincts 
to the lowest type of life, that which we have in 
common with the plant. If this general correspon- 
dence shall admit, as there is reason for hoping, of 
a sufficient specification in detail, it will furnish 
powerful means for the reciprocal improvement of 
man's moral and physical natura 

TJiS Woman, — ^This Positive conception of human 
nature seems to me, my father, quite in agreement 
with the experience of mankind, especially in that 
it rests the unity of man on the constant subordina- 
tion of the intellect to the heart. You had 
ah'eady explained to me, that of the two modes in 
which this preponderance of the aflfections might 
exist, the altruistic alone can secure for man, even 
as an individual, a complete and lasting unity, one 
however which it is more difficult to constitute than 
the egoistic unity. But in this theory of man's har- 
mony there is yet a serious difficulty. How are we 
to reconcile it with the first law of animal life? 
That law asserts the intermittent character of the 



256 SECX>ND PART. 

whole life of relation, without allowing any excep- 
tion for the functions of the brain. True unity 
cannot be intermittent. The intellect and the 
activity can, and ought to, rest alternately, as ought 
the senses and muscles, which they respectively bring 
into play. But the functions of affection cannot be 
suspended. Can we ever cease to feel love towards 
ourselves and towards others ? 

The Priest — The direct connexion between the 
affective life and the nutritive life ought to lead 
you, my daughter, to see that the first is as con- 
tinuous as the second To harmonize this neces- 
sary continuity with the intermittent character 
common to the whole life of relation, all we 
have to do, is to consider the double structure of 
the brain. All the organs of the brain are, as the 
senses and muscles are, composed of two symme- 
trical portions, separate or contiguous, each of 
which can function whilst the other rests. Such an 
alternation allows the feelings a continuous exis- 
tence, in spite of the general intermittence of the 
brain. Sometimes the intellect functions in this way 
during sleep, if not by its organs of contem[)lation, 
the connexion of which with the senses is direct, at 
any rate by those of meditation, where the dependence 
on the senses is not immediate. This is the origin of 
dreams, states of temporary mental alienation, in 
which, as in madness, subjective impulses, without 
our will, get the upper hand. This occasional per- 
sistence of the intellectual functions during sleep 
enables us to understand the regular persistence of 



THE DOCTRINE. 257 

the affective functions. Nay more, it furnishes us 
with an indirect evidence of such persistence. For 
our dreams always bear the stamp of the dominant 
instincts. Since the heart directs the intellect 
when we are awake, in spite of impressions from 
without, it must assert a greater power over it when 
these impressions are no longer felt. We may 
hope, then, that the cerebral theory will ulti- 
mately lead us to a right interpretation of dreams, 
and even enable us to modify them, so realizing 
the wish of antiquity, which at the time was pre- 
mature. 

The Womcm. — I should, my father, have an un- 
satisfactoiy conception of the Positive theory of 
human nature, unless, after explaining the general 
relations of the heart, the intellect, and the cha- 
racter, you show me the systematic division of each 
of the three into their primary functions, beyond 
which no further reduction is possible. 

The Priest, — You have this division, my daughter, 
in the descriptive system of the brain, which I lay 
before you. {See Synopsis (7, cU the end of the volume.) 
You must become as familiar with it as with our 
encyclopedic synopsis. Though longer than that, it 
will be less difficult. Any person of sufficient age, 
especially a woman, must soon feel the reality of our 
analysis ; for by its very nature, it rests entirely on 
observations within the reach of every one. If 
special and difficult contemplations were indispen- 
sable for its verification, that would be enough to 
prove it defective. It required great efforts to 



258 SECOND PART. 

construct this synopsis. But that in no way affects 
'its use, especially for those who have escaped oor 
classical education. The difficulty of construction 
depended less on the nature of the problem than 
on the prevalence of false theories. It was the 
earliest sphere of our intellectual exertions, and jet 
it was destined to be the last subjected to tke 
gradual process of harmonizing the theoretical with 
the practical reason. But at length it has under- 
gone the process, and with such success that the 
fundamental harmony of the two leads to greater 
progress in this department than in any other. 

My classification of the organs of the brain offers 
you throughout a fresh application of the universal 
principle of decreasing generality, the principle which 
you saw was the foundation of the whole encyclo- 
pedic hierarchy. You may trace it most clearly in 
the case of the instincts, as they are more numerous 
and more marked in character. Their decrease in 
generality, in proportion as they become nobler and 
less energetic, is fully verified in the whole of the 
animal series. In the lowest stage we find simply 
the fundamental instinct of individual preservation. 
There is as yet no complete separation of the sexes. 
Then, in succession, we see the other instincts added, 
first the personal, then the social, in the order indi- 
cated by my system of the brain. Man is the limit 
of the series. This verification from comparative 
zoology is sufficient to prove the truth of my analy- 
sis. It often aided me in working out that analysis. 
Not that, however, I had recourse to any oth^r 



THE DOCTBINE. 259 

gaidance than that of sociology. Id the highest 
animals in our series, the mammiferous animals and 
birds, we certainly find a complete combination of all 
our higher functions. The difference is merely one 
of degree. See how the greatest of poets had a pre- 
sentiment oi this fundamental resemblance between 
man and the animals. In the midst of his sublime 
descriptions of Paradise, Dante introduces this ad- 
mirable picture of the moral existence of a bird — 

Come Taugello intra Tamate fronde 
Posato al nido de' saoi dolci nati. 
La Dotte che le cose ci naBconde, 

Che per veder gli aspetti desiati, 
E per trovar lo cibo onde li pasca. 
In che i gravi labor gli son aggrati, 

Previene '1 tempo in su Taperta frascay 
E con ardente affetto il sole aspetta 
Fiso guardando pur che I'alba nasca. 

Dante, Parad. xxiii. 1 — 9. 

E'en as the bird, who 'midst the leaiy bower 
Has, in her nest, sat darkling through the night, 
With her sweet brood ; impatient to descry 
Their wished looks, and to bring home their food. 
In the fond quest unconscious of her toil ; 
She, of the time prevenient, on the spray. 
That overhangs their couch, with wakeful gaze 
Expects the snn, nor ever, till the dawn, 
Removeth from the east her eager ken. 

Caey's Translation. 

In this charming description an animal very far 
removed from man offers us, equally with man, the 
normal concurrence of feeling, intelligence, and 
aotivity. The feeling of brotherhood between man 
and the other animals is more precious even for the 
s2 



260 SECOND PART. 

heart than for the intellect. For it extends our 
sympathies beyond our own species, and so acts as 
a check on any disposition to cruelty in our too 
frequent conflicts with the subordinate races. 

The Woman. — I am fond of studying animals, 
my father, with the view of tracing in them essen- 
tially the same impulses as in man. But I suppose 
that the synopsis of the bittin is independent of any 
such verification. There are minds which would 
not accept it. 

The Priest, — Even when confined to man, our 
observations, my daughter, a#8 really sufficient to 
remove all uncertainty as to any part of the Positive 
theory of the soul and brain. Even the analysis of 
the intellect, more delicate than the two others, inas- 
much as its divisions are less marked, may be veri- 
fied by an appeal to facts of daily experience. It 
is sufficient to compare the two sexes to see the 
capital distinction, that between the organs of con- 
templation and those of meditation. For the first 
of these two functions is more developed in woman, 
the second in man. Similarly we separate the two 
organs of meditation, by remarking that your sex 
is more adapted for connecting facts, mine for co- 
ordinating them. Were our savans as sagacious 
as most women, and as clear as women of erroneous 
views, the strong evidence of comparative zoology 
would be superfluous. 

The Womom. — My first inspection of the descrip- 
tive system of the brain has given rise to some 
doubts, my father. These I should like to have 



THE DOCTRINE. 261 

deared up before I begin its study. The instincts, 
as a whole, s^m placed in their right light, except 
the maternal instinct. This I expected to find 
under the head of altruism, not under that of 
egoism. 

The Priest, — You must distinguish, my daughter, 
between the maternal instinct and the influence that 
iDstinct may have on our sympathies. Such an 
influence is not inherent in it, as is seen by the fact 
that it is often wanting. The observation of animals 
leaves us no doubt as to the necessity of this dis- 
tinction, for we find ]|LStances of the maternal rela- 
tion in animals, at too low a point in the scale to 
have the sentiments connected with that relation in 
the human species. But you can remove all uncer- 
tainty on the point without going beyond your 
own species. However valuable the improvement 
effected by civilization, particularly modem civiliza- 
tion, in this instinct, as a consequence of the in- 
creasing influence of society on the family, it is yet 
possible, in daily experience, to detect its true 
nature in women of weak sympathies, where it 
stands out more distinctly. In such cases we see 
that the child, for the mother no less than for the 
fifcther, is regarded directly in the light of a mere 
personal possession, on which they may exercise 
their love of power, or by which they may gratify 
their avarice, far more than as the object of any 
disinterested aflection. Only, as the relations which 
spring from, the fact of maternity give a strong 
stimulus to the instincts of benevolence, they spon- 



262 SECOND PABT. 

taneonsly ai(Mn the deyelopment of those iustinots 
wherever the nature is kindly, but they never create 
sympathy. In feict its previous existence is implied. 
When we compare the different states of society, 
either in the present or in the pait, we see the true 
character of an instinct, which, previous to its im- 
provement by the providence of man, often leads 
parents to sell, or even to kill their childreC on 
purely selfish grounds. Besides, look around you, 
and see the principles on which professions are 
habitually chosen, or marriages made, and ask your- 
self whether it is not the ^oism of the parents^ 
and not their love of their children, that is the 
prevailing motive since the anarchy of modem 
times has weakened the influence of society on 
the fiamily. 

The sexual instinct was sometimes honoured with 
a similar mistake, though not by your sex. Women 
are in general not blind to its selfish character. 
But men confused it, as they did the maternal, with 
the sympathies of which, when under due control, it 
stimulates the growth. All our personal instincts, 
not excepting that of destruction, may exert a 
similar influence. But this influence is not misun- 
derstood in the other cases, as it is less direct and 
less marked. This general relation makes it easier 
to solve the great problem for man — ^viz., how to 
subordinate egoism to altruism. For the greater 
energy of the personal instincts may thus serve to 
compensate the natural weakness of our instincts of 
sympathy, by originating the impulse which they 



THE* DOCTRINE. 



staoid in need o^ but do not find in themselves. 
Ouoe set in motion, the benevolent affection per- 
sists and grows by virtue of the immense superiority 
of its attraction, after the coarser stimulant has 
ceased to act. j^The moral superiority of woman 
often supersedes in her case the need of such a pre- 
paration. She is ready to love, as soon as she finds 
obWts to love, without seeking in love any selfish 
gratification. The coarser nature of man can hardly 
ever d]q>en8e with this indirect impulse. But par- 
ticularly is this the case in regard to public life, 
where we want a noble direction for pride and 
vanity. 

The Woman, — ^As for the intellectual: functions, 
I am surprised, my father, not to find in your 
synopsis of the brain the faculties that have become 
classical — memory, judgment, imagination, <fec. ^ec. 

The Priest — ^They are secondary Acuities, my 
daughter. That is, they are results of our whole 
mental organization, though long considered as 
special functiona A comparison of individuals and 
of sexes, completed, if it must be so, by a compaxison 
of species, gives direct proof of the groundlessness 
of the old analysis of the intellect aqd the soundness 
of the new. For such observation shows us marked 
and permanent differences as regards contemplation 
or meditation, but never leads to clear and sure 
results in the case of the Acuities acknowledged by 
the schools. Every judgment, however unimportant, 
requires an habitual concurrence of the five intel- 
lectual functions, to enable us to bring the world 



264 SECOND PART. 

within and the world without into that lasting «od 
perfect coincidence which is the characteristic of 
truth. So it is, even more strongly, with the efforts 
of the memoiy or the imagination. They often re- 
quire inductions or deductions in strict analogy 
with the operations of science. As for th^Vill, it 
is directly a result of every affective impulse, which 
has the sanction of the intellect, in its capacity of 
guide of our conduct. 

The Woman,—! have a remark to make of a con- 
trary tendency to my last. I am surprised, my 
father, to see language have a distinct place assigned 
it in your synopsis of the brain, instead of being 
treated as a product of the whole of our intellectoal 
functions. 

The Priegt. — ^Your mistake depends on this, my 
daughter. You confuse the special aptitude to 
create artificial signs with the results that follow on 
the due subordination of that aptitude to the other 
mental functions. The intellectual analysis of Gall 
was generally inadequate, but even he did not 
hesitate to assign language a separate organ. Its 
existence admits of no doubt, as is shown by the 
observation of animals, of men, and of nations. 

When left to itself, free, that is, from the control 
of the brain, as is often the case in illness, and at 
times even in health, the direct action of this oigan 
of language produces nothing but a mere flow of 
words, requiring reason if they are to be discourse, 
in the true sense of the teim. In other cases, on 
the contrary, the exceptional inaction of this organ 



THE DOCTRINE. 265 

Binders the transmission of thoughts even when the 
thoughts themselves are perfectly worked out For 
the rest^ we must not confuse in animals the peculiar 
function of language with the means of social ex- 
pression. These do not always answer to the func- 
tion, ^'^very one of the higher species has its 
natural language, understood by the whole race, and 
even by the races near it in the series, but the 
physical means of communication are often very 
imperfect As for the actual language of civilized 
nations, it is in reality a very complicated result of 
the whole of man's development. Still, if traced to 
its primary source, it will be traced to that organ of 
the brain which leads us to create, by some means 
or other, artificial signs, without any direct refer- 
ence to the mental and moral communications of 
which they may be the instrument. 

Ths Womom, — To complete this important appre- 
ciation, would you, my father, point out to me the 
general use I ought to make of the synopsis of the 
brain when I have sujficiently studied it? 

The Priest — You can only, my daughter, make 
it your own by constantly applying it Women are 
in the habit of tracing in our actions and language, 
the feelings and thoughts from which they really 
proceed. Consider the synopsis of the brain as 
giving a general assistance to women in improving 
themselves in this part of their work. You will 
often find that the soul of man is not impenetrable. 
The brain thus becomes a book, the truth of which 
cannot be disputed, and which you can read spite 



266 SECOND PART. 

of all the artifices of dissimulation. Complete joxac 
observation of individuals by comparing one with, 
another nations in very different stages. Add evea 
the study of the animals within your reach. You 
will then have finbhed your initiation in the Posi- 
tive theory of human nature. 

But as mistakes are but too easy, to avoid them 
or to correct them, you must always remember that 
most of the results which MI under your observa- 
tion, intellectual as well as moral, spring from the 
concurrent action of several functions of the brain. 
These functions can seldom be observed alone. So 
your inquiry will most frequently involve aa 
analysis. The requisites for such analysis you will 
always find in your synopsis, and you must combine 
them till your synthesis adequately represents the 
case under notice. For instance, envy is the result 
of a combination of the instinct of destruction with 
some one or other of the six egoistic instincts; 
there is besides the secret feeling of personal infe- 
riority, mental as well as moral. There are then 
six kinds of envy, according as the second element 
in the combination is avarice or luxury, &c. 

The synopsis of the brain contains in a shoi*t form 
all that, up to the present time, is demonstrated in 
the Positive theory of human natura Hence we 
merely state the number and position of the intel- 
lectual and moral organs, without any precise state- 
ment as to their form or size. We must look to 
an objective study, not as yet properly organized, 
as the only means of completing our subjectiTe 



THE DOCTBIKE, 267 

theory of the brain, by determining the peculiar 
constitution of each organ. But we must not set 
too high a value on this complement. Without it 
the cerebral theory is sufficient for its chief object, 
as is proved by this Catechism. 

The position of the organs is really the most 
difficult point to determine, as it is the most im- 
portant. It at once points out the mutual influ* 
ence of the organs. This influence, without any 
intervention of the nerves, depends on simple con* 
tiguity. Hence we find it easy to explain the rela- 
tion, which is otherwise unintelligible, and yet which 
indisputably exists, between the sexual and the 
destructive instinct. The order of the organs, espe* 
cdally of the aflective ones, gives the measure of 
their respective energy, in obedience to the law 
which you see written on the synopsis. For in- 
stance, to take the case of two consecutive instincts. 
We see that the destructive is naturally stronger 
than the constructive instinct. We cannot doubt 
that it is so, when we see the preference everywhere 
given it, with no exception in the case of man, when 
a being thinks it is free to choose its means. But 
the noblest use of the cerebral synopsis consists in 
stating in a better form the great problem of human 
nature, — ^how to secure the ascendancy of sociability 
over personality, as you already felt previous to my 
thus directly explaining it. The three practical 
qualities are, in themselves, indifferent to good and 
evil They only directly lead to action. As for 
ihe five intellectual functions, their true destination 



268 SECOND PART. 

is evidently to be the servants of the three social 
instinotS) rather than of the seven personal affections. 
So only can they be developed on a large scale and 
with permanent results. Still their intrinsic weak- 
ness often hinders them from resisting the natural 
energy of the selfish impulses. Hence arises our 
chief difficulty. If the intellect is not &Ise to its 
holy mission, personality, in itself incoherent^ is 
easily made subordinate to a sociability, which never 
refuses it due satisfaction. When harmony is thus 
once established between the feeling and the intel- 
lect, in our action we instinctively obey an impulse 
which opens out an inexhaustible field for our 
energy. Ultimately, then, all depends on a close 
concert of the two contiguous organs which respec- 
tively preside over the most important of our in- 
stincts of sympathy and over the most synthetical 
part of our intellect. By taking the predominant 
organ as the representative of each of the three 
regions of the brain, the sacred formula of Posi- 
tivism is naturally graven on the brain of every 
one. That formulae enjoins the habitual harmony of 
three adjacent organs. 

The Woman, — By the whole of this and the pre- 
ceding conversation, I am led to see, my father, that 
the Positive doctrine is now competent to undertake 
the spiritual government of Humanity. I had been 
led by our first conversation on this subject to antici- 
pate this result The profoundly relative character of 
our doctrine excludes the immutability which was 
the characteristic of the absolute doctrines of theo- 



THE DOCTRINE. 269 

logy. This immutability which theology claimed 
really ended in death. Whereas the gradual modi- 
fications which Positivism introduces are the certain 
symptoms of life, a life as lasting as the race. It 
has an inexhaustible fund of improvements at its 
command. But without waiting for these, I feel 
that the system is already elaborated to the point at 
which it can direct the reorganization of Western 
Europe. 

The Friest, — As you have attained this convic- 
tion, I may, my daughter, end here my exposition 
of the doctrine of Positivism, and proceed to a con- 
sideration of the system of life. 



Cfeirir |ad 



EXPLANATION OE THE REGIME, 
OR MODE OF LIFE. 



CONVERSATION IX. 
THE Rl^OIME AS A WHOLE. 

The Woman, — In this last branch of our subject, 
I am aware, mj father^ that I must be nearly as 
passive as during the exposition of the doctrine, 
though I expect the subject to be less difficult for 
me. The regime is not so essentially within the 
sphere of the affections as the worship, so that I 
cannot here, as in the worship, at times, by my own 
instinct, anticipate your explanations. We cannot 
depend on the heart alone. A competent grasp of 
this subject implies frequently the maturest expe- 
rience and the deepest reflection — an experience 
and reflection beyond my sex. The contemplations 
of women can hardly pass with good result beyond 
the sphere of private life. We are now about to 
construct a system of general rules for all the ordi- 
nary action of man. Kor will his exceptional 
action be exempt from them. To determine these 



THE UFE. 271 

rules demands an accurate survey of our whole ex- 
istence, social as well as personal Without this 
we cannot judge what are really the results of each 
particular line of conduct. In this survey we must 
guard especially against the errors springing from 
the feelings, the more so, as the influence of such 
errors would here be dangerous, from their bearing 
immediately on our practical social life. 

The Priest, — ^You must not allow, my daughter, 
any such proper feeling of reserve to conceal from 
you the fundamental office of your sex, an office 
assigned it by the whole regime. The study of the 
Positive doctrine leads to the conclusion that man's 
true unity consists in living for others. The Posi-H 
tive worship has for its main object the development / 
of the feelings conducive to such a life. Besting 
on the double basis of the worship and the doctrine, 
the regime mtEst aim at securing the direct predo- 
minance, in practical life, of this the one sole prin- v 
ciple of universal harmony. Such is the end pro- 
posed. Its attainment necessarily implies a close 
and constant union of both sexes for joint action. 
I say of both, for such joint action depends as much 
on the heart as on the intellect When we then 
pass from the theory to the practice of morals, it is 
the intellect alone that can say what habits should 
be generally adopted, and what are the means of 
securing their adoption. In the study of these two 
questions, however, we shoidd almost always fail, 
unless we had the constant impulse of feeling 
stimulating us to overcome the arduous difficulties 



272 THIBD PART. 

they present. Hence the respective parts of the 
priesthood and the affective sex in our moral regime. 
The- priest acts on the heart through the inteUect 
by his judgment of the conduct. Women should 
act on the intellect by the heart, and they do flo by 
securing the spontaneous ascendancy of the nobler 
dispositions. The necessary co-operation of the priest 
and women is equally applicable in the penod of pre- 
paration, and in the life for which it is the preparation. 

The Woman. — You encourage me to ask you, my 
father, in the first place what is the real province 
of this third part of our religion. The regime 
always concerns the life of action, as the doctrine 
has reference to the life of thought, and the worship 
to that of affection ; yet I find a jdifficulty in con- 
ceiving the religious precepts of the Positive regime 
as embracing all forms of action indifferently, and yet 
I do not see on what you can base any distinction. 

The Priest, — In practical life the province of re- 
ligion is limited, my daughter, to the dispositions 
which all must have in common. It has nothing 
to do with the particular mode of discharging each 
special office. It must, however, form an accurate 
judgment on the different social functions, but only 
with this object, that it may lay down in regard to 
them such rules as may maintain and develope the 
general harmony. The details of execution are 
entirely a question for the various forms or degrees 
of government properly so called, whether private 
or public They are never a question for the 
priesthood. 



THE LIFE. 273 

To give a more accurate idea of this funda- 
mental distinction^ I will apply to progress the 
general division you are already familiar with as 
applied to order. Your study of the doctrine has 
familiarized you with it. We divided order into 
the order of the world external to man, and the 
order of man's world. We must adopt the same 
division for the improvements of which order 
is susceptible. We then see that there are two 
species of progress, progress external to man, and 
human progress. Both ultimately have reference 
to man, but the last alone concerns human nature in 
itself, the first is limited to our external circum- 
stances. These it improves by acting on all the 
existences which have any influence on ours. 
Hence we habitually apply the term material to this 
external progress, notwithstanding the fact that it 
embraces the phenomena of life properly so called. 
But it does so only in regard to the species which 
supply us with food or service. The point of view 
of progress is necessarily more subjective than that 
of order, consequently though the ideas in both A 
cases are the same, the language will not be always i 
equally uniform. 

This distinction is a sufficient introduction to the ^ 
fundamental division between the respective pro- 
vinces of the government and the priesthood. All" 
the forces of society are, in onr view, equally devoted 
to the work of improvement ; but we must distin- 
guish them according as they improve the outward 
order or the social and moral order. To this ele- 

T 



J 



274 THIBB PAST. 

mentary diBtinction we trace the normal separation 
of temporal and spiritual action. The higher rank 
assigned the latter is a consequence of the naturally 
higher character of the progress it promotes. Thus 
the practical sphere of religion is the improirranent 
of human order, its physical, intellectual, and moral 
improvement. The last is far the most important. 
Different as the three aspects are, their close con- 
nexion forhids their ever being separated. This (dose 
connexion must be attended to in action even more 
than in speculation. As for the external order, its 
direct and special improvement rests not with reli- 
gion. It is the proper province of politics or of in- 
dustry. Keligion indirectly takes an important part 
in the work, though quite a general one, by virtue of 
the great influence which the state of the agent, man, 
necessarily exerts on the efficiency of his action. All 
practical work requires as the first condition of its 
success that each one who co-operates should be 
honest, intelligent, and courageous. Beyond this, 
religion has no part in the constitution of each 
special department of industry. 

The Woman, — Morals, then, my father, as an art, 
are distinguished from all others by being completely 
general. They are the only art which all without 
exception must learn, for they are the only one of 
which all human beings equally stand in constant 
need. All then must study morals, in proportion 
to their natural ability and the Ught they derive 
from experience. Their systei^ti c^culti zation must 
however be left to the priesthood, as a consequence 



THE LIFE. 275 

of the priesthood's necessary connexion with the*~^ 
whole body of theory. This is the way in which, f 
as it seems to me, morals form the essential domain ( 
of religion, primarily as a science, secondly as J 
an art. 

J%« Friest. — To give completeness to your view, 
my daughter, yon must take into account that each 
department of industry, as a whole, comes under 
the influence of the Positive priesthood. For the 
priesthood alone knows the whole system of the 
laws of the external world. The theories of science 
can never enable us to dispense with the results of 
practical experience— it is a mere dream of scientific 
pride to think they can — ^but they must always form 
the basis and even the guide of practice. T^el 
practical man begins by learning from the priest- I 
hood' the more important laws of the phenomena I 
he has to modify. He connects with this know- 
ledge the special developments to which the induc- 
tions of his own experience lead him. Should he, 
in the course of his labours, feel the want of some 
new general ideas, he must go again to the priest- 
hood for them. He must not interrupt his indus- 
trial action by a vain attempt at scientific culti- 
vation. — 

The Woman, — Taking your explanation as a 
whole, my father, I look on the fundamental separa- 
tion of the priesthood and the government as a 
consequence of the necessary division of theory and 
practice. But in what you have hitherto said, you 
have attended only to progress^ that is to say, to 
t2 



376 THIRD PART. 

the activity of man. Now to place so capital a 
principle on a solid foundation, more is wanted. 
You must bring it into direct connexion with order 
properly so called, that is to say, with conservation. 
In the social harmony, the proletariate must natu- 
rally, in the main, represent progress ; my sex holds 
a passive position, and its principal function is to 
conserve. 

The Priest. — Look, my daughter, at man's world 
from the statical point of view, and you will be 
satisfied. « Study it not in motion, but as it exists. 
You will soon arrive at the separation of the spi- 
ritual and temporal powers, as the basis on which 
all social order rests. Your starting point must be 
simply the principle of co-operation, the principle on 
which Aristotle built the true theory of the city 
organization as the result of the combined action 
of several families. For every servant of Humanity 
must always be looked at from two points of view. 
The two are distinct, but coexistent. We must 
first consider his special ofBce, then'his position in re- 
ference to the general harmony of society. The first 
duty of every organ of society is, there can be no 
doubt of it, the proper discharge of his own function. 
But good order also requires every one to assist, as 
far as he can, all others in the discharge of theirs. 
In fact, this second duty is the most important 
characteristic of the collective organism, and the 
obligation is a natural consequence of the fact that 
the agents by which that organism, or society, works, 
are in all cases beings endowed with intelligence 



THE LIFE. 277 

and freedom of action. Now, by their very natui-el 
these two functions of the individual, his sjjecial ) 
iiinction, and his function as a member of society, 
are in opposition to each other. And that opposi- 
tion has a tendency to become more and more 
marked. For in proportion as co-operation is duly 
developed, the special function becomes more special, \// 
and the result is an intellectual frame and moral 
tendencies, which make any general views at once 
more difficult and moi*e distasteful. Such is the 
elementary point of view from which we must look 
at the general theory of government, whether tern- j 
poral or spiritual. — — I 

All the functions of life, and still more all the 
functions of society, require for their proper dis- 
charge an appropriate organ. It follows that any 
combined action of man, on however small a scale, 
requires the existence of a power whose special 
duty it shall be to bring back to general views and 
feelings agents, whose constant tendency is in the 
opposite direction. Such a power must check the 
-disorganizing and foster the converging tendencies of 
these agents. From another point of view, the 
formation of this indispensable power is a natural, 
result of the inequalities attendant on the progress 
of man. 

The simplest form of association, the family, 
would seem exempt from the application of this prin- 
ciple, so close is the tie which connects it. But it ifi 
not so, even when the family is composed merely of 
the original pair. It is in the family that we may 



278 THIRD PART. 

most disiinetty appreciate the great axiom : There 
is no society toithout a government. 

In the larger association, the city, wherever there 
is combined action on the part of several fitmilies to 
attain a given end, such action throws up a leader. 
The limit of his authority is naturally fixed by the 
amount of the operations which either his ability 
or his capital enables him really to conduct. In 
such chiefi} is vested the real temporal power, which 
can impel or check as need directs. If we go 
beyond this and require a power on a larger scale, 
such new power must have a spiritual origin. The 
several practical leaders have however a tendency to 
mutual co-ordination. And the principle of Buch 
co-ordination is found in the natural hierarchy con- 
sequent on the relations of their several depart- 
ments. From this instinctive concert there arises 
a more general government, exercising, however, a 
purely material or temporal power, and qualified for 
resistance rather than directicm. The several mem- 
bers in whom it is vested are, in general, unable to 
master the whole system, though each may be com- 
petent as regards one .of the particular syst^ns 
which make up the whole. 

The inadequacy then of the temporal power, and 
the want of some spiritual power, are evident, even 
if you confine yoursdf to solidarity, if the sphere of 
such solidarity be not too limited. The spiritual 
power must renounce all special action, its aim 
must be to secure the constant harmony of the 
several parts of society. But the want above men- 



THE LIFE. 279 

tioned is placed beyond all dispute, when we take in 
the idea of continuity; and it is on continuity 
tbat moral and social order depend with an ever- 
increasing dependence. The powers which are the 
result of^ and are guided solely by^ experience, 
a£fpire to direct the present, whilst they know 
neither the past which governs that present, nor 
the future for which it is the preparation. Their 
interference is therefore blind, and a source of dis- 
turbance, whenever they do not act on the advice 
of the philosophical class or priesthood. At the | 
same time, they cannot dispense with the assistance / < 
of the priesthood, for its sanction is essential to I / 
their temporal ascendancy, which is constantly/ 
liable to be jealously disputed. Whenever the 
priesthood winctions a pow er, it represents the power 
it sanctions as the minister of a higher power which 
all respect. Under the provisional regime this was 
God. In the final it is Humanity. This implies, 
in every case, but more particularly with regard to 
the final state, that the present is duly connected 
with the past and with the future. The priesthood 
alone can establish this connexion. It falls to us /\ 
therefore necessarily to consecrate all human powers. 
Itself, it needs no consecration from any other 
power external to itself since it is the immediate 
organ of the supreme authority. 

Hence we get a second axiom : J!^o society can 
esdat cmd he developed wUhcmt a priesthood in some 
form or other. All men equally stand in need of such 
a power for education and for counsel. The priest- 



280 THIRD PABT. 

hood alone can give a sanction to the governor and 
protect the governed. It is the regular moderating 
power in public life, as women are in private life, 
not forgetting, however, that both ptibUc and private 
life demand a continuous concurrence of moral 
influence and intellectual power. You may express 
all the social attributions of the priesthood by adopt- 
ing the biblical name, Judge. It has a threefold 
office, t o advi se, toj^s^gcrate, t o rep ilftte. It dis- 
charges the three liy judging, and its judgment is 
the expression of an opinion which all respect. 

The Woman, — Fortunately, Catholicism had pre- 
pared me, my father, to grasp this fundamental 
principle and to disre^rd the popular sophisms of 
the Protestant and the Deist^ sophisms aimed with 
a blind fury against the most important con- 
struction of the Middle Ages. But I do not quite 
see why Positivism, whilst it preserves and con- 
solidates the great idea of which the Middle Ages 
left us the outline, adheres to expressions which, at 
first sight, can only be referred to the theological 
origin of that idea. Of course they can be used in 
a sense perfectly alien to all theology. Over and 
above the respect justly due to this nomenclature as 
historical, I suppose it rests on dogmatical grounds, 
though I do not see what these grounds are. 

The Priest. — The ground for the retention of 
these expressions, my daughter, is their want of 
homogeneity. By their contrast they recall the 
two principal characteristics of the great social 



THE LIFE. 281 

division. Were they homogeneous, they would only 
recall one. When we call the theoretical power 
spiritudli we make it clear that its opposite is 
purely material. Thus, indirectly, we indicate the 
best point of view from which to compare them 
socially. We may look at them as disciplining, one 
the wills of men, the other, their actions. Vice 
versdy call the practical power temporal, and you 
suggest the character which inherently belongs to 
the theoretical power. By the aid of these dis^ 
tinctions, it is easy to define the respective pro- 
vinces of the two powers. The one takes the 
present, the other the past and future; the one 
specially looks to solidarity, the other to continuity ; 
the one claims the objective, the other the sub- 
jective lifa These two essential attributes, simul- 
taneously indicated by the very discordance of the 
terms used, serve further, if combined, to recall the 
last difference between the two powers, viz., their 
respective extent. For the theoretical power, 
whether as spiritual or as eternal, equally in both 
cases, by its very nature admits of absolute uni- 
versality. The practical power, on the other hand, as 
being material and temporal, must always be local. 
From this last point of contrast, if once drawn out 
to its full consequences, we may see that the separa- 
tion of the two is imperative. 

The Womcm, — My old Catholic associations lead 
me, my father, to condense the essential attributes 
of the spiritual power, and to make them consist in 



I 



2S2 THIBJ) PABT. 

the systematic direction of the common education. 
In this province its exclusive competence admita 
of no dispute. 

The Priett. — Such is, in fact, my daughter, th6 
fundamental office of the priesthood. If it dis- 
charges aright this its main duty, it necessaxily 
gains great influence over the whole of human life. 
All its other social functions are related to this its 
characteristic object, either as a natural consequence^ 
or as its necessary complement. To begin with 
preaching. Preaching is but a continuation of edu- 
cation, necessary to remind people of the principles 
on which the harmony of the whole society rests ; 
whereas our action, as individuals, inclines us to 
forget them. Again, on education rests the claim 
of the spiritual power to consecrate both functions 
and organs, in the name of a doctrine which all 
admit to be the proper regulator of human exis- 
tence. On education again rests its consultative 
influence on all the important acts of life, private 
or public. For in life every man often feels the 
need of having recourse to the enlightened and 
kind advice of the sages who presided over his 
systematic education. Lastly, by virtue of its edu- 
cational functions, the priesthood by common con- 
sent becomes the regular appeal in the conflicts of 
life, as it inspires both the higher and the lower 
classes with equal confidence. 

The Womom, — ^Naturally, my father, my next 
question is, what, in the Positive r^ffvme, is the 
educational function of the spiritual power — ^itspre- 



THE LIFE. 283 

dominant fiinction, as you say ? Already I feel that 
the main object of education is to lead us to live 
for others, in order to live again in others by others, 
whereas we are naturally inclined to live for our- 
selyes and in ourselves. To effect the great change 
in us which is to secure this result, women and 
priests must act in close concert, exerting each 
their peculiar influence on the heart and the intel- 
lect. Still I need a more accurate conception of 
their respective offices. 

The Priest, — Begin, my daughter, by looking on 
education, in its strict sense, as ended at the age of 
emancipation. At that time every one receives the 
third social sacrament, and becomes directly the 
servant of Humanity. He was previously its ward. 
Divide this preparatory period of twenty-one years 
into two main parts, the one for unsystematic, the 
other for systematic education. The first lasts four- 
teen years. The second, seven. This done, you 
have marked out periods during which the affective 
sex and the theoretical power preside in succession 
over the system of man*s training. That training 
begins with the heart, and ends with the intellect. 
But in the process of initiation, the heart and intel^ y 
lect ai-e never separated. ^ 

The flrst division lasts till the age of puberty, 
and must be subdivided into two periods of seven 
years each. The cutting of the permanent teeth 
separates the two. During the first seven years 
the mother has the sole direction of education. It 
must be entirely spontaneous, whether for the body, 



284 THIBD PART. 

the intellect, or the moral nature. The develop- 
ment of the body is the most important. But the 
heart must soon be a prominent consideration, so 
much so that the effects of that early teaching shall 
be traceable throughout life. The natural plaj of 
home affections leads the child at this early stage of 
his existence to the rudiments of Positive worship. 
The object of his worship is necessarily his mother. 
She is for him the representative of Humanity. 
Even then, however, the institution of langua^ 
enables him to appreciate Humanity as a distinct 
and all-controlling power. At the same time, the 
intellect collects from experience notions of all 
kinds, the materials for the systematic teaching of 
a later period. The child naturally exerts his 
senses and his muscles. If wisely guided in this 
exertion, taking care always that it preserve its 
spontaneous character, we have in germ a sound 
beginning of the life of thought and the life of 
action, in constant subordination to the life of affec- 
tion. But it is only the mother who can rightly 
combine the three. She will urge the child, espe- 
cially if he be of patrician rank, as a habit, to 
occupy himself with some manual labour. The 
object of this is to make him feel how difficult it is 
to attain in anything, however unimportant, the 
result desired, and so to lead him to more active 
sympathy with the classes whose occupation is tliis 
manual labour. Such exercises will give accuracy 
and clearness to his intellect, as well as tenderoess 
and humility to his heart. 



THE LIFE. 285 

In the period between dentition and puberty, we 
begin to systematize the family education, by intro- 
ducing gradually some regular studies. Still, it is 
with the mother that the direction rests. She will 
not find it difficult to guide her child in simply 
artistic pursuits, for she herself will have received, 
in the needful degree, the education which all are 
to receive. Up to seven years, all study, properly 
so called, should be carefully eschewed, even reading 
and writing, allowing for what the child picks up 
absolutely by himself But after seven we begin to 
form the habit of intellectual exertion, by develop- 
ing within due limits the faculties of expression, a 
branch of cultivation peculiarly adapted to the 
second period of childhood. In cultivating these 
faculties we must keep clear of all niles. We 
must limit ourselves to exercises in the arts. Head- 
ings in poetry must be wisely combined with sing- 
ing and drawing. The moral growth of the child 
goes on naturally, and the worship soon developes 
itself, in proportion as .the child gains fresh means 
of giving expression to his affections. He should 
practically sum up all his exercises in a song and a 
porti*ait, a hymn to his mother and a portrait of 
her. He at the same time is getting a more com- f 
plete conception of Humanity, as he becomes | 
familiar with the great masterpieces in every pro- I 
vince of art. Care must be taken that his* taste | 
and his morality are not lowered by any admixture i 
of mediocre productions. 

Tlie Woman. — The only difficulty I feel, my father. 



250 THIBD PABT. 

as to these two periods of home education, is as to 
religion. Yoa may gain the child's heart and so 
lead him towards religion, but you cannot teach him 
any doctrines, for he has not the needful scientific 
basis, nor can he have, till after his last preparatoxy 
period. And yet you cannot prevent him from 
questioning about religion. 

^ The Priest — You must remember, my daughter, 
that in all cases the growth of the individual must, 
in all essential features, be a reproduction of the 
growth of the race. You may see, then, that on 
this point the child must be allowed to obey, un- 
checked, the general laws that regulate the growth 
of man*s intellect. The first seven years before 
dentition, he will naturally be fetichist; the next 
seven till puberty, he will be polytheist It will 
be with him as it has been with the race. He will 
be led by these two philosophical states to begin 
with developing his powers of observation, then his 
artistic faculties. 

As for the questions he may ask his parents, and 
as for his perceiving that they do not think as he 
does, there will be no need of any hypocrisy in 
their answers. This is owing to the relative nature 
of Positivism. It will be enough, if they openly 
tell him, that the opinions he has are natural at his 
age, but that he will come to have others soon, as 
his parents have done. They may call his attention 
to the fact that he has already instinctively changed 
from fetichism to polytheism. He will easily be 
led to believe that he may change again. And 



THE LIFE. 287 

there is no need to hasten the change hj artificial 
means. His intellect thus escapes all tendency to 
the absolute, and his heart is at the same time led 
to a fdller sympathy with the populations which 
are the representatives of these preliminary states. 

ITie Womcm, — This point clear, I may now, my 
father, proceed to a survey of systematic educa- 
tion. It must always be under the guidance of the 
priesthood, but I can see even now that Positivism 
will never remove the boy from his family. The 
ascendancy of the heart over the intellect, to secure 
which is its constant aim, will forbid this. The 
daily influence of family ties over the boy becomes 
even more needful when his scientific education is 
proceeding, as there is a tendency in this educa- 
tion to dry up his feelings and foster his pride. I 
am well aware of your profound* dislike to our 
scholastic conventual establishments, as corrupting 
the morals even more than they dull the intellect. 

The Priest, — ^Yes, my daughter, it is under the 
constant superintendence of his mother that the boy, 
a,fter receiving the sacrament of initiation, goes 
each week to the school adjoining the temple of 
Humanity, there to hear from the priesthood one . 
or perhaps two lectures on the doctrine of Posi- 
tivism. Kor must it be forgotten, that even this 
amount of instruction away from home must depend, 
for its results, mainly on the work done at home. 
If the teaching exercise its proper influence, it will 
make the learner better able to think, not be a sub- 
stitute for thought. 



288 THIRD PART. 

In its general outlines, the plan to be adopted in 
the systematic study of the doctrine of Positivism 
is pointed out by the encyclopedic hierarchy in 
which the seiieral parts of the universal order find 
their proper place. The novitiate lasts for seven 
years, for there are seven primary degrees in the 
hierjjrchy. A quarter of each year '4s to be devoted 
to examination and rest. One lecture a week gives 
forty lectures* a year, a number sufficient for the 
philosophical study of eacn science. Only in ma- 
thematics the extent and difficulty of the subject, 
which must always be in a theoretic point of view 
-the most important, will require two lectures a 
week for the first two years ; on the other hand, in 
these first two years the practical apprenticeship 
t occupies less time. Thus, from geometry up to 
* morals, every young man must in seven years sys- 
\ tematically go through the objective ascent which it 
! took Humanity so many centuries to accomplish 
: when left to its own natural efforts. 

During this scientific preparation, the learner 
will be monotheistic. His monotheism will gradu- 
ally become simpler and simpler. It will thus be 
for him, as for the race, a general means of tran- 
sition to Positivism. The perfect uniformity, in the 
normal state, of the Western priesthood will make 
it quite easy to combine such a plan of study 
with the valuable custom our proletaries have of 
travelling. Duiing its course, the esthetic training 
will naturally continue and help the mother's influ- 
ence to prevent moral degradation, or to remedy 



THE LIFE. 289 

the evil which has arisen. The inhabitants of 
Western Europe will at the outset limit their poetical 
readings to living languages, but during the last 
years of their education they wiU take in the writers 
of Greece and Eome, as the sources of our intellec- 
tual and moral development. For this, however, 
they must never have special masters. 

The future citizen, after developing his private 
worship, learns to feel the charm of fieimily worship. 
The next step is, the direct adoration of Humanity, 
for he is now qualified to appreciate the principal 
ben^ts of which she is the author. As the result 
of the whole prepafratory period, the young Positivist 
is £.t for the sacrament of admission — when his in- 
tellect is at length competent to serve his Family, 
his Country, and Humanity, as his Heart loves 
them. 

The Woman, — During her superintendence of 
this last peiiod of education, the mother, as it seems 
to me, my father, will have serious matter for her 
attention in the deviation from right conduct 
to which his passions expose the young man at that 
age. The language of physicians on this point has 
often alarmed me. It has led me to fear that vice is, 
as a general rule, not to be avoided, such are the 
natural laws in this respect of our bodily develop- 
ment. I should be glad to be reassured and to feel 
that the danger is not so great. Nor is the moral 
evil the only one. It may compromise the intellec- 
tual development. 

The Priest, — You would attach less weight, my 
u 



290 THIBB PABT. 

(laughter, to the confident assertions of medical mea 
on this point, if you knew how profoundly incom- 
petent they are. They profess to study man; and 
yet physicians, whether theoretical or practical, 
especially in modem times, are far from having a 
real knowledge of man's nature. They only know 
that part of it which we have in common with the 
animals. So that their proper name would be 
veterinary surgeons, were it not that, in the best of 
them, practical experience makes up, in some small 
degree, for the defects of their scientific education. 
Man is, of all living beings, the most emphatically a 
whole. If then you study the parts of that whole 
separately, whether it be body or mind, you can 
gain nothing but fidse or superficial notions of man. 
The materialism taught in our schools of medi> 
cine cannot be allowed to set aside numerous and 
decisive cases of experience, which we find fully 
warranted by the true theory of human nature. 
The alleged necessity for gratifying the sexual in- 
stinct is disproved by the fact that, in most cases, 
during the whole of the Middle Ages, those who 
submitted to the discipline of Catholicism and 
Chivalry overcame it. Even in the midst of our 
modem anarchy, there are not wanting individual 
instances to prove that it is possible to remain pure 
until marriage. A life of labour, and still more 
the constant influence of family afiection, are gene- 
rally sufficient protection against such dangers. In 
very rare cases they are insurmountable ; and these 



THE LIFE. 291 

rare cases have been made a standard by physicians 
wholly unvereed in moral struggles. The young 
disciples of Positivism will be trained to the control 
of their sexual instinct, by an early struggle with 
that of nutrition. The two, it must be remembered, 
are closely connected, as is seen by the juxtaposition 
of their respective organs. Lastly, you are aware 
that a deep affection was always the best preserva- 
tive against libertinage. The mother then, finally, 
will secure her son against the vices you fear. For 
she will lead him to choose a worthy object on 
which to centre the personal affections which must 
determine his home destiny. She will not wait till 
such affection come upon him abruptly as the result 
of some chance contact. 

The Womcm, — I feel the full value of your ex- 
planation, my father. One point remains, and then 
the whole system of Positive education will be clear. 
I refer to a question which concerns my own 
sex in particular. I am aware, by what has been 
already said, that if mothers are to direct the 
education of their children at home, they must 
themselves in due measure have received encyclo- 
pedic instruction. Indeed, with an exception here 
and there, none must be without it. Unless the 
Positive faith become quite universal, it can never 
gain the systematic ascendancy requisite for. its 
social mission. Besides, the mother will be unable 
to retain her moral superintendence over education, 
if her ignorance exposes her to the ill-concealed con- 
u2 



292 THIRD PART. 

tempt of a son puffed up with the pride of know- 
ledge. Tet I can hardly think that women are to 
follow the same course of study as men, and under 
the same masters, though at separate times. 

The Priest, — ^You have your answer already, my 
daughter, in the great Molidre. He lays it down 
that your sex should have clear ideas on all points.* 
This in fact is the proper aim of our encyclopedic 
instruction. It is quite free from the character of 
detail or specialty, which is so justly repugnant 
to you in the existing education, and which is 
as little suited, as a general rule, for men as 
for women. Positive education will be general, 
and common to all. From this conmion stock 
the theoretical or practical man may by him- 
self draw the further consequences which his own 
special object renders desirable. As a general rule, 
he will need no private instruction — ^granted that 
he has duly gone through the training which all 
equally are to undergo. 

The general plan of our novitiate is common to 
both sexes. In the case of your sex, it admits of 
one reduction. The two weekly lectures, which 
men must attend during their two first years, may, 
for women, be reduced to one. Women have not 
to mix in active life. They may be content, there- 
fore, in mathematical science, with a logical rather 
than a scientific training. For this object one lec- 
ture a week will suffice, as in the rest of their 



* See p. 69. 



THB LIFE. 293 

seven years' course. The only thing requisite will 
be a greater philosophical effort on the part of the 
professor. 

As for the professors being the same for both 
sexes, to make them different would tend to throw 
discredit equally on teacher and pupil ; not to say, 
that it would be contrary to the synthetical spirit 
which must be the characteristic of the Positive 
priesthood The more entirely to exclude all dis- 
persive tendencies, it is important that each priest 1 . / 
should in succession teach each of the seven sciences. 
The result must be this great social advantage, that 
during their long education he is in unbroken relsr 
tion with the same pupils, who will owe to him 
the whole of their instruction in science. The 
permanence of this relation will facilitate the after 
influence of our priesthood on the whole of practical 
life. 

Now, on similar grounds, both sexes must draw 
their education from the same sources. If the 
High Priest of Humanity allows the priests, as a 
general rule, to reside permanently in the same 
place, all family disputes will be more easily settled, 
as all the members of the fiimily will be personally 
under the influence of the same masters. Priests 
who could only address one sex would be incom- 
petent for their social office, to say nothing of the 
intellectual incompetence which such a state would 
imply. 

The Woman. — I can now, my father, estimate the 
social influence which the priesthood of Positivism 



294 THIBD PART. 

will derive from its fundamental office, if it ade- 
quately discharge the duties of that office. Still I 
am not clear that, on this basis alone, it can acquire 
sufficient authority. Would you then give me a 
direct statement of the various means it has at its 
disposal to secure, as far as it is possible to do so, 
the harmony of society ? 

Ths Friest. — ^The Positive priesthood has no 
means, my daughter, but such as are the result of 
the educational system. Hightly to estimate them, 
we must remember that the last year of the Positive 
novitiate is entirely devoted to moral science. This 
last branch of instruction will be always divided 
into two equal parts, a theoretic and a practical 
part. In the first, all the essential laws of human 
nature will be shown to rest on a solid foundation 
—on the whole system, that is, of our conceptions 
relative to the world, to life, and to society. This 
basis laid, we shall be able to rest the general rules 
of conduct applicable to the individual, the family, 
and the state, on a definitive system of real demon- 
stration. In that system, the duties of each of the 
four powers which are necessary constituents of 
human providence will be stated in detaiL The 
determining these duties, in which we finally sum 
up the results of the Positive education, may have 
a great effect, in consequence of the moral disposi- 
tion of those whom we thus address at the close of 
their initiation, and who are yet free from the errors 
which active life involves. 

The system of these practical rules answers two 



THE LIFE. 295 

piirpofies in eacli case. Thej are a guide for a 
man's own action. They are a standard for his 
judgment of others. This second use of them is 
lees exposed than the first to the disturbing action 
of the passions. For our passions seldom prevent 
va from appreciating the faults of others^ however 
blind they make us to our own. An egoist is the 
last person to tolerate egoism in others. It leads to 
a competition which he cannot get rid of. 

We thus learn to distinguish the two modes in | 
which the spiritual discipline of Positiyism may be 
exercised, the direct and the indirect. The priest- 
hood's main effort is directed to change the guilty 
person, by acting first on his hearty then on his 
intellect. This is at once the purest and most 
efficacious method, though its results are less strik- 
ing. It will always be the only method perfectly 
consonant to the nature of the spiritual power. 
For the spiritual power disciplines the will by per- / 
suasion and by conviction. It should have no in- V 
fluence at all for coercion. But this direct method ' 
is often found inadequate, though wisely applied 
and during a long time. In such cases the priest- 
hood, not being able to correct the internal tenden- 
cies, proceeds to attack them indirectly, by calling 
in the opinion of others. 

It does not convert the criminal, it controls him J 
by the judgment of others. That this its indirect 
mode of action is perfectly legitimate, cannot be 
denied. It rests in all cases on a simple judgment 
of the conduct of the person who is judged No 



/ 



296 THIBD PAST. 

one can bar such a judgment For erery one con- 
curs in it, aa directed against others, and it is based 
on a system of doctrine which has the assent of all, 
and an assent freely given. However, the criminal 
who does not allow that he is wrong, or whose will 
has undergone no change, is thus made to feel the 
pressure of a real coercive force. Nor can he object, 
as the coercive force is simply a moral forces If 
others were to abstain from judging, they would in 
reality be the oppressed party, and that without 
having in any way deserved to be so. Legitimate, 
however, as such indirect method evidently is, we 
must only have recourse to it when the direct method 
has been tried and &dled« 

Supposing recourse to it inevitable, it admits of 
three degi*ee8. The priesthood begins, as a &rst 
step, with a simple remonstrance within the family 
cii*cle, before the relations and friends called together 
for the purpose. The second step is public, the 
piiesthood proclaims its condemnation in the temple 
of Humanity. The third and last stage is, excom- 
munication from society, either for a time or for 
ever. Without outstepping the just limits of its 
authority, the spiritual power may go so far as to 
pronounce, in the name of Humanity, that a falae 
servant is absolutely unworthy, and, the sentenoe 
once uisued, the subject of it becomes incapable 
of sharing in the duties and benefits of human 
society, The priesthood may abuse this power, to 
gratifjr unjust animosity, or from a blind or mistaken 
zeal. Its abuse will bring a speedy punishments 



THD UFE. 297 

Exoommunicatioxi can have no force but such as it 
deriyes from the free sanction of the public. If 
then this public stand neutral, the blow will fail, 
and those who aim it will naturally incur discredit 
from the fidlure. When the general opinion strongly 
supports the priesthood in its condemnation, then 
this spiritual discipline will be efficacious to a 
degree of which we can form no conception from 
the past. For in the Positive rigime the union 
attained will be very Deut greater than was previously 
possible in the absence of a Positive education. 

There will be occasions when, however rich or 
powerful he may be, the criminal will, without any 
loss of property, see one by one his dependents, hia 
servants, his nearest relatives even, drop off from 
him. In spite of his wealth, it may well be, in an 
extreme case, that he will be reduced to provide 
himself his own food, as no one will serve him. 
He will be free, it is true, to leave his country. 
But he will only escape the condemnation of the 
Universal priesthood by taking refuge with popula* 
tions which have not yet adopted the Positive &ith. 
Ultimately even this refuge will be closed, as the 
£dth will spread over the whole of the earth. For- 
tunately, so extreme a case of religious discipline 
-will always be exceptional. It was necessary to 
state it here as an indication of the efficiency of 
the Positive system of life. 

The Wmnan, — ^Allowing its full strength to this 
moral power, it is hardly possible, my father, that 
it should ever entirely supersede the necessity of 



i 



298 THIBO FABT. 

recourse to temporal compression/ whether directed 
against property or life. 

The Priest, — In truth, my daughter, legislation 
properly so called will always be necessary, to make 
up for the inadequacy of mere moral force in cases 
of uigent social need. Conscience and opinion will 
be often powerless to prevent daily violations of 
right. In such cases the temporal power must step 
in with some physical repression. Besides these 
common and slight deviations, the result in the 
main of the inaction of our good instincts, we shall 
be obliged to have recourse to the temporal power 
for the repression of the more serious evils result- 
ing j&om the active predominance of our bad in- 
stincts. In the human species, as in the other 
animal species, we have instances of thoroughly 
vicious individuals, for whom correctives are as 
useless as they are undeserved. In the case of such 
exceptional organizations, society in its own defence 
will not stop short of the destruction, by a solemn 
act, of every such vicious organ, when once its com- 
plete un worthiness has been sufficiently proved by 
decisive acts. It is only a false philanthropy that 
can lead us to lavish on scoundrels a pity and a 
care which would find much better objects in so 
many honest victims of the imperfect arrangements 
of society. Capital punishment, therefore, and d 
fortiori, the total or partial confiscation of property, 
will never entirely be given up. Still such remedies 
naturally become of less frequent use as humanity 



THE UFS. 29^ 

advances. Our constant advance in feeling, intelli- 
gence, and activity, has a tendency to make spiritual 
discipline more and more efficacious, as compared 
•with temporal repression, though we can never 
-wholly dispense with this last 

The Woman* — In this general view of the rigime 
of man, you seem, my Either, to* omit the cases in 
which the moral evil should have its source in the 
priesthood itself 

jTAe Frieat — In such a case, my daughter, the 
spiritual discipline follows the course we have 
marked out, though somewhat irregularly. For 
moral science is of universal application, and points 
out the duties of the priesthood as much as those of 
any other class. Nay, it even gives them greater 
prominence, as is natural from their greater impor^ 
tance. There is moreover a natural tendency in the 
public to blame more freely the priests as the judges 
of the rest. They are the object of the secret hatred 
of the patrician body, of a cold esteem on the part 
of the proletariat*, and of no deep sympathy, as a 
general rule, on the part of any but women. 
Finally, the Positive faith is, by its nature, always 
open to discussion, and so prevents the rise of any 
prestige sufficient to bar criticisms when really 
necessary. 

However great the veneration usually paid to the 
priests of Humanity, it can but be the result of their 
due discharge of an office, the duties of which are 
weU defined. And the intellectual and moral con- 



300 THIRD PABT. 

ditionSy to which the spiritual power requires all 
others to conform, may be urged against it, in its 
turn, in case of its feiilure. 

If, as we suppose will be the commonest case, the 
perversion is partial, the priesthood is competent to 
meet it by its own internal discipline. In case 
of its neglecting to do so, then every believer is 
competent to urge a reparation of the error. For 
by the fulness and accuracy which are the charac- 
teristics of the Positive £Btith, each individual can 
exercise for himself on his own responsibility, a 
species of irregular priesthood in such cases, which 
will be efficient if sanctioned by opinion. Lastly, 
supposing the corruption of our priesthood general, 
then it would not be long before a new one would 
arise to meet the want of society, one which would 
better fulfil the conditions required by a doctrine 
/'which is not exposed to adulteration, and which 
is always superior to its organs, whoever they 
may be. 

Thj& Womtm. — This leads me naturally, my father, 
%o ask you to end this general survey by pointing 
out the actual constitution of the Positive priest- 
hood. 

The JPm»fcr— You will at once feel, my daughter, 
that the first condition required by its fundamental 
object is, that it should entirely renounce aU tem- 
poral power, and even all property. Every one 
who aspires to the priesthood must, at the outset, 
solemnly contract an engagement to this effect, at 
the age of twenty-eight, when he receives the sacra- 



THE LIFE. 301 

ment of destination. The priests of Positivism 
must not even inherit property from their families. 
The object is that they may keep clear of all 
temptation, also that they may leave capital in the 
hands of those who can employ it to good purpose. 
The contemplative class must, as a body, be main- 
tained by the active. At first, they will look to 
the free contributions of believers, afterwards to y 
assistance from the public treasury, when the faith 
is universally adopted. The priesthood must have 
nothing of its own, land, houses, nor revenues. All 
that is allowed is its annual budget, the amount of 
which must depend on the temporal power. 

The generality of views and the generosity of 
feeling, which must always be the distinctive marks 
of the priesthood, are absolutely incompatible with 
the ideas of detail and the disposition to pride in- 
herent in all practical power. If you would restrict 
yourself to giving counsel, you must put it out of 
your power to command, even by your wealth. 
Otherwise, so poor is mau*s nature, we are often 
inclined to make force take the place of demonstra- 
tion. This condition for the priestly office was felt 
and carried to its sublimest exaggeration by the 
admirable saint who, in the thirteenth century, 
endeavoured, but in vain, to regenerate Catholicism, 
which was already exhausted. But St. Francis of 
Assisi forgot that, in prescribing to his disciples 
a1:>solute poverty, he was distracting them from their 
proper office, by the needful daily care for their 
subsistence. 



302 THIRD FABT. 

There must be some limit to poverty, and to 
assign the proper limits, I will name the yearly 
payments for each of the several degrees of the 
y priesthood, adaptuig them to the actual rate of ex- 
pense usual in France, which is a mean on this 
point between the different nations of Western 
Europe. This summary statement will serve, at 
the same time, to describe the internal organization 
of the Positive clergy, an outline of which I gave 
whilst explaining the worship. 

Generally stated, the organization of the Posi- 
tive clergy requires three successive orders: the 
/ aspirants, admitted at twenty-eight ; the vicars, or 
\! substitutes, at thirty-five ; and the priests proper, 
at forty-two. 

The first of these, the aspirants, with no natural 
limit to their numbers, are considered to have a 
real spiritual calling; but they do not as yet belong 
to the spiritual power, and they exercise none of its 
functions. Their free renunciation, therefore, of any 
' inheritance must be simply provisional, as is their 
stipend, fixed at 3000 francs, or 120^. They do 
not live with the priests, but are under regular 
surveillance as to their work and conduct. 

The vicars are irrevocably members of the 
priestly body, though limited to the functions of 
teaching and preaching, except in cases of urgency, 
where other powers may be delegated. They 
\ must definitively renounce all property, and they 
' must, besides, be married before admission. They 
live with their families, but apart from the priests, 



THE LIFE. 303 

in the philosophical presbytery which adjoins each 
temple of Humanity, parallel to the Positive school 
The class which is to guide all other classes in 
influencing the intellect by the heart, must itself 
furnish the best type that man can furnish of moral 
deyelopment. It must therefore give full play to 
the home affections, without which the love of the 
race is an illusion. Marriage then, which other 
citizens may or may not contract, is obligatory on 
-the priests. For the priestly office cannot be duly 
performed unless the man be constantly under the 
influence of woman. Of coui'se that influence may 
be objective or subjective. The better to test its 
priestly body on this point, Positive religion re- 
quires even its vicars to fulfll this obligation. This 
second rank, which, with exceptions for failure, 
always leads to the third, secures a yearly stipend 
of240;. 

During the seven years which elapse before he is 
full priest, every vicar must teach all the seven 
encyclopedic sciences, and exercise his powers of 
preaching. After that> he becomes a true priest, 
and may discharge, in &,milies or in cities, his three 
offices, of advising, consecrating, and regulating, 
which are the social characteristics of the Positive 
clergy. In this flnal state, his annual stipend is 
raised to 480^., besides the expenses of visiting his 
diocese. 

Every philosophical presbytery has seven priests 
and three vicars. Their residences may be changed 
by the High Priest. But such change must always 



/ 



304 THIBD PABT. 

have some really serious ground to justify it. The 
number of these priestly colleges will be two 
thousand for the whole Western world. This gives 
a functionary for every six thousand inhabitants, 
or one hundred thousand for the whole earth. The 
rate may appear too low ; but it is really adequate 
for all the service required. For it must be re- 
membered, that the doctrine of Positivism seldom 
demands systematic explanations : for these we 
substitute the free intervention of women and prole- 
taries. It is important to limit very strictly the 
priestly corporation, both to avoid superfluous ex- 
pense and to secure a better composition of the 
clerical body. 

The Womcm. — In your statement, I do not see, 
my father, the head which directs this vast body. 

The Frieat, — The doctrine and the office of the 

priesthood are such, my daughter, that it might 

function of itself, with the aid of public opinion. 

/Still it really does require one supreme head. The 

/ supreme power is vested in the High Priest of 

\l Humanity, whose natural residence will be Paris 

as the metropolis of the regenerated West His 

stipend is five times that of ordinary priests, 2400^., 

and he must have besides an allowance for the 

expense necessarily involved by his vast labours. 

He is the sole governor of the Positive clergjr. 
He ordains its members, he changes their residence, 
he revokes their commission, all on his own moral 
responsibility. The main object of his care is to 
maintain the priestly character in its integrity 



THE LIFE. 305 

against all temporal seductions. Every servile or 
seditious priest, who aims at temporal power by 
flattering the patriciate or the proletariate, will be 
absolutely banished from the priesthood. Such an 
OBe may, in certain cases, find a place amongst its 
pensioners, supposing him to have scientific merits 
to justify the exception. 

To assist him in the discharge of his functions, 
the supreme head of Western Positivism is to have 
the aid of four national superiors, each of whom has 
a stipend of half the amount of his, 1200^. Under 
his direction, they guide their four respective 
churches, the Italian, the Spanish, the English, and 
the Crerman. As for France, the High Priest is 
the national superior, though he need not necessarily 
be a Frenchman, but may come from any one of the 
populations that are Positivist. The regular mode 
of replacing him is, as in the temporal order, by a 
successor whom he is to name himself. But in this 
case, such nomination must have the unanimous 
assent of the four national superiors. Supposing 
them divided in opinion, then the nomination must 
meet the wishes of the senior priests of the two 
thousand presbyteries. 



306 THIBD FABT. 

CONVEESATION X. 

PRIVATE LIFE. 

The Womom. — ^At the close of oar last conversa- 
tion, I omitted to ask you, my &ther, what would 
be respectiyely the subjects of the two remaining 
conferences on the PodtiTe system of life. I felt 
that the two halves of the practical domain of our 
religion must have essentially the same subdivisions, 
corresponding to the existence of which the worship 
is to be the ideal representation, the rigime, the 
guide. My study of the worship, then, indicated 
the plan on which the rigime is to be studied. We 
must begin with private life, and then proceed to 
public. The former is our subject for to-day, and 
I feel that you will here, as in the worship, 
separate our individual existence from our family 
Hfe. 

The Priest, — ^The life of the individual is nor- 
mally the basis of all man's conduct Its regenera- 
tion by Positivism consists, my daughter, in placing 
it on a social footing, and insisting on its social 
character. No theological system, and monotheism 
less than any, could effect so radical a change. ITet 
. men have always had an instinctive presentiment 
that such a change was necessary, and have looked 
for its introduction. Positivism can effect it, and 
that without recurring to any sentimental exaggera- 
tion. It rests the change solely on an accurate 
. appreciation of the real state of the case. Such an 



THE UFE. 307 

appreciation leads us to see that in reference to 
man and the order of man's world, by its being 
more synthetical than any other, you must treat 
the whole before the parts, you must consider 
society as prior to the individual. 

It is true that every one of man's functions 
necessarily requires an individual organ. But it is 
no less true that it is by its nature a social function, 
since the share of the individual agent is always 
subordinate to that of his contemporaries and pre- 
decessors. The degree of concurrence of the two 
cannot be distinguished. Everything we have be- 
longs to Humanity. For everything we have comes 
from her — ^life, fortune, talents, information, ten- 
derness, energy, &c, Metastasio, a poet never sus- 
pected of subversive tendencies, puts into the mouth 
of Titus this decisive sentence, a sentence worthy 
of an emperor — 

So che tutto b di tutti; e che nd pure # 

Di nascer merito chi d'esser nato 
Crede Bolo per se. 

Clem, de Tito, act II. sc. x. 

I know that all is from all ; and that he deserved not to be 
born, who thinks that he is bom for himself alone. 

Similar anticipations might be found in the oldest 
writings. Thus we see that Positivism, when it 
condenses all human moraUty into Umngfor otherSy 
is, in reality, only giving a systematic form to the 
universal instinct. As a previous step, it places the 
scientific spirit at the social point of view, which 
x2 



308 THIRD PART. 

was unattainable by the synthesis of either theology 
or metaphysics. 

The whole system of Positive education, its edu- 
cation of the intellect as well as that of the affec- 
tions, will familiarize us thoroughly with the idea 
of our complete dependence on Humanity. We 
shall thus be led duly to feel that we are all neces- 
sarily destined to serve her constantly. In the 
preparatory period of life, when incapable of useful 
action, every one owns his inability to supply his 
own chief wants. He sees and acknowledges that 
he depends on others for their habitual gratifica- 
tion. At the beginning, he looks on himself as in- 
debted for their supply to his own family only. That 
feeds him, takes care of him, instructs him, <bc But 
it is not long before he comes to form a distinct 
conception of a higher providence, of which he sees 
in his mother merely the special minister and the 
best representative. The institution of language 
alone would be enough to disclose to him this 
higher providence. For to construct language is 
wholly beyond the power of an individual It can 
only be the result of the combined efforts of all the 
successive generations of men — combined in spite of 
the diversity of idioms. And putting language out 
of the question, the least gifted man has a constant 
sense that he is indebted to Humanity for quanti- 
ties of other accumulations, material, intellecftual, 
social, and even moral. 

Our aim should be during the period of prepara- 



THE UPE. 309 

tion, to give clearness and yividness to this feeling, 
so as to enable it, at a later period, to resist the 
sophisms of the passions to which our intellect and 
our practice are exposed in real life. At that 
time the exertions we habitually make have a ten- 
dency to make us underrate the true providence, 
and to overrate our own individual value. Our 
illusion leads us to be imgratefuL We can free 
ourselves from it by reflection, and we can set 
others free if they have been properly brought up. 
Simply point out to them that, whatever their work 
and whatever their success in that work, such suc- 
cess depends in the main on the co-operation of 
others, the immense extent of which in their blind 
pride they would keep out of sight. The most 
skilful man with the best directed activity can 
never pay back to Humanity but a very slight 
portion of that which he receives. As in his child- 
hood, so in his later life, he continues to depend on 
Humanity for food, protection, and growth, &c. 
The only change is in the agents employed. They 
no longer stand out distinct to his view. Originally 
he received her gifts through his parents. He now 
receives her benefits through the indirect agency of 
large numbei-s, most of whom he will never know. 
To live for others is seen to be, then, for all of us, 
a constant duty, the rigorous logical consequence 
of an indisputable foot, the fact, viz., that we live 
by others. Such is the necessary conclusion drawn 
from an accurate appreciation of our real state, when 



310 THIRD PABT. 

wa view it pbiloBophically as a whole. It is a ocm- 
clusion free from all tinge of an exaggeration of 
sympathy. 

The Wofrum. — ^It is a great pleasure, my &ther, 
to find that our reason thus systematically sanc- 
tions a disposition for which at times I re- 
proached myself, attributing it to an exagg«:ated 
feeling. Before I became Positiidst, I used often 
to say : " Wh<U pletMuares ca/n be greater than tkoae 
of devotednesa to others ?" Now I shall be able to 
defend this holy principle against the sneers of 
egoists, and perhaps raise in them feelings which 
will prevent their doubting its reality. 

The Priest, — ^Your instinct, my daughter, has led 
you to anticipate the most important characteristic 
of Positivism. Positivism finally sums up in one 
formula, the law of duty and the law of happiness, 
hitherto asserted by all systems to be irrecon- 
cilable, although the instinct of men always aimed 
at reconciling them. That the two are necessarily 
in harmony, is a direct consequence of the eidstenoe 
in our nature of the feelings of benevolence ; a fact 
demonstrated by science, in the last century, on a 
correct view of the animal world. In the case of 
animals the respective action of the heart and the 
intellect admits of a more distinct appreciation. 

Our harmony as moral beings is impossible on 
any other foundation but altruism. Nay more, altru- 
ism alone can enable us to live, in the highest and 
truest sense. The degraded beings who at present 
exist only to live, would be tempted to give up their 



THE LIFE. 311 

brutal selfishness, had they but once had a real 
taste of what 70a so well call the pleasures of 
doYotednees. They would then understand that, to 
liTe for others is the only means of freely develop- 
ing the whole existence of man. For we extend it 
by one simultaneous effort so as to comprise the 
present in the largest sense, the remotest past, and 
eTen the most distant future. None but the sym- 
pathetic instincts can haye free scope without any 
check, for in giving them play each individual is 
aided by all others, whereas his personal instincts, on 
the contrary, find a constant check from others. 

In this way you see how happiness and duty will 
necessarily coincide. Of course there is no doubt 
but that the fine definition of virtue given by a 
moralist of the eighteenth century, as a/n effort over 
oneadf in f<voour of others, will always remain 
applicable. We are so imperfect by nature that we 
shall always need a real effort to subordinate our 
personal to our social tendencies. The conditions 
tinder which we live are a constant stimulus to our 
selfishness. But the triumph once gained, our 
social instincts have a natural tendency, . putting 
aside the power of habit, to gain strength and to 
grow, by virtue of the incomparable charm in- 
herent in sympathy, whether of feeling or in 
action. 

In this state, we feel that true happiness is, in an 
especial degree, the result of due submission, the 
only sure basis of a large and noble activity. The 
conditions under which we are fated to Uve no 



312 THIRD PAST. 

longer inspire regret. Far from it. We exert otir- 
aelves to strengthen the order which they form by 
a voluntary obedience to rules of our own creation, 
which enable us more successfully to contend with 
our egoism, the main source of man's unhappineas. 
Where such rules are established by free consent^ 
we soon see, according to the admirable precept of 
Descartes, that they deserve quite as much respect 
as the laws imposed on us from without, which 
have less moral efficiency. 

The W(yin(m» — Such a view of human nature 
enables me at length to see, my father, that it is 
possible to give an essentially altruistic character 
even to the rules which concern our own individual 
existence, hitherto always placed on an egoistic 
ground, on an appeal to our prudence. The wisdom 
of antiquity summed up morality in this precept : 
JDo to others as you would he done imto. This 
general rule had at the time very great value, but 
all it did was to regulate a mere personal calcula- 
tion. Nor is the great Catholic formula, if you sifb 
it, free from the same character : Love yvwr neigh- 
horn* as y&wredf. It does not compress egoism, but 
sanctions it. And if we look to the ground on 
which the rule rests, the love ofGod,we find a direct 
stimulus to egoism. There is here no sympathy 
with man, not to say that love was generally but 
another expression for fear. Still when we com- 
pare the two precepts, we see that the Catholic is a 
great step in advance. The other only bore upon 
action, whereas it goes further and touches the 



THE LIFE. ^ 313 

feelings which guide action. This moral improve- 
ment remains, however, very incomplete, so long as 
love in the theological sense retains its stain of 
selfishness. _ 

rnra»Uvlsm alone holds at once both a noble and 
true language when it urges us to live for others. 
This, tiie definitive formula of human morality, 
gives a direct sanction exclusively to our instincts 
of benevolence, the common source of happiness and 
of duty. Implicitiy and indirectly it sanctions our 
personal instincts, as the necessary conditions of our 
dsqstence, with the proviso that they must be sub- 
ordinate to those of altruism. With this limitation, 
we are even ordered to gratify our personal instincts, 
with the view of fitting ourselves to be better ser- 
vants of Humanity, whose we are entirely. 

Now, too, I understand the strong reprobation 
with which I always saw you looked on suicide, 
hitherto, as it seemed to me, only condemned by ; 
Catholicism. Our life is less even than our fortune i 
or any of our talents at our arbitrary disposal It i 
is still more valuable than they are to Humanity, ' 
and it is of Humanity that we hold it. In obe- 
dience to the same principle, Positive religion also 
condemns, however respectable the motives from 
which it often proceeds, that kind of chronic 
suicide, suicide at least for all social purposes, 
which the Catholic system too often encouraged. I 
remember that the daily abuse of bodily discipline 
had so completely reduced the hermits of the 
Thebaid^ that their abbots were at length obliged 



I 



314 THIBD PABT. 

to authorize them to pray nlttingy or ev^i Ijrixig 
( down, because they were unable to remam long 
enough on their knees. 

The Priest, — I would call your attention, my 
daughter, to the fact, that not only do we give a 
nobler character fco our gratification of our personal 
instincts, within the limits allowed by their sub- 
ordination to their social purpose, but that on this 
necessary subordination, as the only possible basis^ 
we rest the authority of our prescriptions relative 
to such gratification. Suppress this, the only true 
principle, and the simplest rules for the reg^ulation 
of our individual existence lose their hold on us, 
unless they are brought into an arbitrary connexion 
with supernatural ordinances, ordinances which were 
valid for certain times and places, but which are 
now no longer so. 

If our control over our eating is a mere questicm 
of personal prudence, we are liable to be infiuenced 
by the sophisms of greediness. And there are cases 
in which these cannot be refuted, for some men can 
commit excesses for a long time without any evil 
consequences to their health. But if you adopt the 
social point of view, all hesitation disappears at 
once, and you prescribe for all alike an amount of 
food almost always less than that which they might 
take without risk. For if we exceed the very mode- 
rate limits set by the requirements of the service 
we owe to our Family, our Country, and Humanity, 
we are consuming provisions which in moral fidmess 
belonged to others. At the same timue, a greater 



THE LIFE. 

amoant of food reacts on our brain, and has a 
weakening effect on our feeble intelligence^ whether 
in science, the fine arts, or industry. The images 
become habitually less clear, induction and deduction 
harder and slower : everything is weakened, even 
our &culties of expression. 

But it is the moral iuflueaK^e of the slightest daily 
intemperance that is the chief danger, as being at 
once more difficult to avoid and more corrupting. 
Eating is the most entirely personal of all our acts. 
When we exceed the amount required for our sup- 
port, we are cultivating, as &r as possible, egoism 
at the expense of altruism. For we overcome the 
sympathy we involuntarily feel for those who, at the 
time, are in want of food. Besides, so closely con- 
nected in the brain are the several egoistic instincts, 
that the strong excitement of one soon spreads to the 
rest, even though the excitement be but for a time. 
The admirable painter of human nature to whom 
we owe that unrivalled poem, the Imitation, had a 
profound sense of this moral connexion, when he 
tells us (book I. chap. xix. § 4), Frena guUvm et 
<mmem ca/rnia vncUrwitume^ Bridle 

thy ajppebitey and thou shaU the easier bridle aU 
JleMy desires. Bead daily this inexhaustible treasure 
of true wisdom. Substitute Humanity for Gk)d) 
and you will soon feel that this, the last change re- 
quired, gives great strength to such a precept, as it 
does to most others. 

The restraint upon the instinct of nutrition re- 
quired by health, is £Gur less than it will be when it 



316 THIBD PART. 

shall hare received a gradual and systematic exten- 
sion from Fositire religion. In our sensuality we 
reason sophistically and treat as essential wants 
what are the results of stimulants which are rather 
hurtful than beneficial. This is especially true of 
the use of wine, which was forbidden by Mahomet- 
anism. The prohibition was generally and sincerely 
obeyed during the centuries in which Islamism dis- 
played the precise kind of activity for which we 
think wine indispensable. When we properly ex- 
amine the admirable designs of the great Mahomet, 
we soon see that what he aimed at in this prohibition 
was, to introduce a thorough improvement of the 
whole nature of man, beginning with the individual, 
but extending afterwards to the race, by the law of 
hereditary transmission. His noble attempt has 
not been really more a £Edlure than the other dis- 
tinct efforts of the monotheism of the Middle Ages, 
Eastern no less than Western monotheism, to im- 
prove man's nature. It wants what they want. 
It requires to be systematized by Positivism. When 
systematized, it will be strengthened and developed 
without any risk to the progress of industry. Even 
at the present day the judicious abstinence from 
wine, so common with your sex, at least in the 
South, may gradually extend to all the advanced 
organs of human progress. As Positivism spreads, 
women and priests will of their own free will, 
throughout the West, allowing for exceptions, re- 
nounce the habitual use of this stimulant, the more 
fatal inasmuch as it often leads to other excesses. 



THE LIFE. 317 

The Womam. — I see, my father, why you lay so 
i\iuch stress on the Positive discipline of the nutri- 
tiye instinct. Besides its predominance directly 
and its influence indirectly, you take it as a type of 
the control that we must regularly exert over all 
our personal instincts. The rules of this control, 
when formed into a system, represent in both sexes 
pwrUy in the true sense, the flrst basis of Arm 
morality. For we must not limit purity to the 
two adjacent organs, on which depend the preserva- 
tion of the species and of the individual. It must 
include the whole of our seven personal instincts, 
which we always have to purify to a considerable 
extent, in furtherance of their normal subordination 
to the service of Humanity. 

The Priest — This great principle of subordina- 
tion, my daughter, will always be able to overcome 
all honest doubts on the point, and even to solve 
the most captious sophisms. The heart of the true 
Positivist must, within itself, reject any arbitrary 
will, just as his intellect rejects it in the world 
without. Our humble Divinity is, in truth, exempt 
from the various caprices appropriate in the case 
of her omnipotent precursor. In all her actions 
she follows intelligible laws, made more and more 
clear to us by the Positive study of her nature and 
her destinies. By subordinating ourselves as much 
as possible to these laws, we shall never cease taking 
&esh steps in our endless progress towards peace, 
happiness, and dignity. 

The Womcm, — On combining the indications you 



318 THIBD PABT. 

have given me, I seem, my father, to see clearly what 
is the system of individual life in Positivism. With 
our synopsis of the cerebral functions in our hand, we 
might take each of the egoistic instincts in turn, 
and study it from the moral point of view as we 
have done the most important of them, in order to 
determine what is the suitable method for its re- 
pression. As for the means of developing our 
several sympathetic instincts, our system of worship 
points these out, all, that is, that are distinct from 
the direct action of the instincts themselves. To 
explain all these points in detail would be beyond 
the limits of our present exposition. We should 
even lose sight of our main object were we to 
attempt it When Positive religion shall be gene- 
rally accepted, it will be time to compose a new 
Catechism, more closely resembling those used by 
the Catholics, and these practical rules may then be 
given in detail. The general principles on which 
they rest will then be familiar to all true believers. 
This Catechism is, on the contrary, a beginning, and 
its object is to state these general principles, so essen- 
tial as a foundation. Any applications of them it 
takes into account only so far as they are indis- 
pensable to the establishment of the principles. 
Without dwelling, then, any longer on personal 
morality, would you pass on to the second part 
of our private life, and give me a clear idea 
of the regeneration of family life in the Positive 
regime 9 

TJie Friest. — The regeneration of the fiimily 



THE UFE. 319 

depends essentially on marriage, my daughter, on 
our giving marriage an altruistic character. Origi- 
nally the institution rested on a purely egoistic 
basis, that is, marriage was regarded as the legitimate 
satisfaction of the sexual instinct, which had for 
its object the reproduction of the species. This 
coarser view was naturally adopted on system so 
long as the prevalent theory denied the existence 
of the benevolent instincts. The general feeling 
of mankind was, however, always against this view. 
Hence a constant series of efforts, each stronger 
than the last, though based on purely empirical 
grounds, to introduce improvements into the ori- 
ginal institution. Positivism alone can show that, on 
this fundamental point, theory and practice, rightly 
viewed, are in harmony; and to show this, it relies 
on the most important discovery of modem science, 
the existence in our nature of altruistic instincts. 

This great conception, the importance of which 
is as yet so imperfectly understood, involves 
directly the regeneration of marriage. For we look 
on marriage henceforth, as having for its especial 
object the mutual improvement of both sexes, 
putting aside any sensual idea. It shows by direct 
proof the woman's affective superiority. It does 
this by establishing two points : first, the selfish 
instincts are less intense in woman, especially the 
lower ones; secondly, the sympathetic are much 
more energetic. On this demonstration we rest the 
Positive theory of marriage. By that theory your 
sex improves mine, by disciplining the mere animal 



330 THIBD PART. 

desire which is necessary for man. Such is his 
moral inferiority, that he would without this 
impulse want sufficient tenderness. Such is the 
essential relation of the two sexes in marriage. 
The other points of difference which the cerebral 
organization of the two sexes offers^ fortunately 
lend their aid in the same direction. The man is 
indisputably the superior in all that regards the 
character properly so called. And it is the cha- 
racter on which; in the main, depends command. 
As for the intellect, in the man it is stronger and 
of wider grasp ; in the woman it is more accurate 
and penetrating. Everything then combines to 
show the mutual efficacy of the marriage union, 
which constitutes the highest form of Mendship, 
with the additional charm of mutual possession. 
In all other human ties, there is a possible, 
if not actual rivalry, checking the full confidence 
which can only exist between those of different sex. 
In this view, the real object of the sexual appetite 
is to originate or to sustain, more particularly in 
the man, the feelings which lead him to give full 
scope to his tenderness. But if so, that appetite 
must be gratified very moderately. Otherwise it 
is, by its nature, so profoundly egoistic that it tends 
to stimulate our selfishness almost as much as 
excess in food does, and often with even more serious 
results, as the woman is odiously sacrificed to the 
brute passions, of the man. When my sex is suffi- 
ciently pure (yours is so as a general rule) to dis- 
pense with this coarse stimulant of tenderness, 



THE LIFE. 321 

marriage is much more certain to produce its 
highest results. 

Such will be the case in one form of the marriage 
union — an imion, viz., on the principle of chastity. 
Positire worship sanctions this form £Dr those who 
ought not to aid in the propagation of the species. 
Many diseases are transmitted hereditarily, and 
not unfrequently in an aggravated form. So that 
thousands of poor children are bom merely 
to die early. Their life is never anything but a 
burdaiL As in modem civilization all birtl^^ 
equally are recognised, the sad results of hereditary 
disease are fSeur more frequent than they were in 
ancient times. For the ancients destroyed as a 
general rule their offspring when weak. A tho< 
rough sifting of this important question would per- 
haps show that a fourth of the population in 
Western Europe would be wise to abstain from 
having children, and that such a function should 
be exercised only by those who are properly qua* 
lified. When we shall pay the same attention to 
the propagation of the human species as we do to 
that of the more important domestic animals, it will 
be seen to be necessary to regulate it. But the 
only method of regulation is the voluntary adoption 
of the institution of chaste marriages, in accordance 
with the Positive theory of the marriage union, by 
which sexual intercourse is not a necessaiy con* 
dition of marriage. To forbid marriage by law in 
the case of hereditary disease, as physicians have 
often wished, would be a remedy as odious as it 

T 



322 THIBD PABT. 

would be illuflory. The influence of Positive re- 
ligion on private and public life can alone induce 
people to form resolutions which^ if not absolutely 
voluntary, lose their efficiency, and trench upon our 
dignity. In these exceptional unions the true 
nature of marriage will be better appreciated, if the 
minds of both parties are properly disciplined. By 
an extension of the practice of adoption we shall 
give the &mily aiSections free scope, and at the 
same time relieve those who can have children. 

The Womcm, — ^Your theory, my fiither, is ade- 
quate as an expression of the true idea of marriage, 
when viewed independently of its bodily results, 
which are at times not attained. The amelioration 
of man's moral nature is then the principal fimction 
of woman, in this unrivalled union, which is insti- 
tuted for the mutual improvement of both sexes. 
The mother's functions you have already deter- 
mined to consist especially in directing the whole of 
education, and you assign her this province in order 
that the heart may in education prevail over the 
intellect. So, as these two offices of- woman suc- 
ceed one another with a regular succession, yoigr 
sex is under the constant care of the affective pro- 
vidence of woman. If such are the objects of the 
marriage union, it is clear it must be monogamic; 
there must be no second marriage, and it must 
be indissoluble. So only can the family relations 
attain the completeness and stability required for 
their moral efficiency. These two conditions are so 
consonant to human nature that illicit unions in- 



THE LIFE. 323 

stinctively aim at fulfilling them. Still I believe 
divorce ought not to be absolutely prohibited. 

The Friest. — You are aware, my daughter, that 
St Augustin, overcoming by his own unaided 
reason the necessarily absolute character of his 
theological belief, opens his chief work by remark- 
ing that murder may often be excusable, and, at 
times, even praiseworthy. The same may be said 
of falsehood, and of everything else that generally 
deserves reprobation. Divorce is no exception to 
this general rule. But whilst we allow this, we 
must never impair the fundamental indissolubility 
of the marriage tie. There is in reality but one 
case in which marriage may be dissolved by law, 
the case where one or other of the parties has been 
condemned to any such degrading punishment as to 
be socially dead. In all other cases of disturbance, 
a long continuance of unworthy conduct on the 
part of husband or wife may lead to a moral dis- 
ruption of the union, the result of which is a sepa- 
ration, but without allowing a second marriage. 
Positive religion imposes on the innocent in such 
cases the observance of chastity, but the recognition 
of that obligation is compatible with the deepest affec- 
tion. If the condition is felt to be hard, it must be 
submitted to, primarily in the interest of social 
order; then, as the just consequence of the original 
error. 

The Womcm. — I am already acquainted, my 
father, with the holy law of eternal widowhood, 
the law which forbids any second marriage. By it 
y2 



32i THIBD FABT. 

Positivism gives at length its fall completeness to 
the great institution of marriage. No objection 
will come from women ; and you have taught me 
how to refute the various sophisms, even when they 
wear the form <^ scientific conclusions, which may 
be originated by men. Unless so completed, mono- 
gamy is an illusion. For a second marriage must 
always involve a subjective polygamy, unless the 
first wife is forgotten, a prospect of small comfort 
to the second. The ma*e thought of such a change 
is enough greatly to impair the existing union, as it 
is never absolutely impossible. Unless you make the 
&mily ties unchangeable and eternal, you cannot 
ensure them the consistency and completeness 
which are indispensable if they are to have their 
due moral effect. None of the sects sprung from 
the anarchy of modem times seem to me so con- 
temptible as that which wishes to make inconstancy 
a condition of happiness, just as it would make the 
frequent change of occupations a means of improve- 
ment. I saw in the FcHMqw Positive a remark on 
this point which struck me greatly: "When two 
beings are of so complex a nature and so different 
as man and woman, the whole of life is &r from 
being too long for them to learn to know each other 
fully, and to love each other perfectly." Far from 
considering as an illusion the high estimate which 
in a true marriage the husband and wife have of 
one another, I have almost always attributed it to 
the deeper insight which can only be gained by 
complete intimacy. In such intimacy, it must be 



THE LIFE. 325 

remembered, qualities are developed which escape 
the indifferent. Nay, if we think of it, it is very 
honourable to our species, that its members inspire 
one another with such strong mutual esteem when 
they study each other careMly. Hatred and indiffer- 
ence alone really deserve the reproach of blindness, 
which a superficial view attributes to love. We 
must consider then the institution which prolongs 
after death the union of husband and wife as quite 
in keeping with human nature. No intimacy can 
stand a comparison with theirs. In the case of the 
mother and the son, the disparity of age, and even 
a just veneration, are always a bar to entire har- 
mony. 

The Priest, — Besides, my daughter, our law of 
widowhood can alone secure for woman's influence 
its main efficacy. During her objective life, the 
sexual relation impairs to a great degree the sympa- 
thetic influence of the wife, by giving it something 
of a coarse and personal tinge. Therefore it is that 
during our objective life the mother is the principal 
guardian angel. Angels have no sex, as they are 
eternal. 

In her subjective existence the relation of the wife 
to the husband is purified. By virtue then of her 
closer union, the wife then definitively becomes our 
highest guardian angel. One single year of a noble 
marriage is enough to constitute, during the longest 
life of man, an inexhaustible source of happiness 
and improvement Time is constantly increasing 
its effects, for time purifies it as imperfections sink 



326 THIBD PAST. 

into the shade, and good qualities come into fuller 
light. Thus, without the subjective union which 
is the consequence of our law of widowhood, the 
moral influence of the woman on the man would 
end at the very moment when its main action ought 
to begin, perfected as it is and purifled by death. 
Once let this complement of marriage be adequately 
appreciated, and it will furnish one of the best 
practical distinctions of Positive religion. For such 
an institution is evidently incompatible with the 
principles of theological belief. 

The Womcm. — To complete my view of the con- 
stitution of the family, my father, I need but an 
explanation of one point. What are its material 
conditions — ^in other words, the arrangements as to 
property 1 

The Priest — They are the natural consequences, 
my daughter, of the social and moral purposes the 
family is meant to answer. Woman, in her two- 
fold character of mother and wife, discharges in the 
family an office equivalent to that of the spiritual 
power in the State. It requires then the same 
exemption from the duties of active Ufe, and the 
same renunciation of all command. To stand aloof 
from both is still more indispensable for the woman 
than for the priest, i£ she is to preserve that supe- 
riority of affection in which woman's real merit 
consists, and which is less qualified than superiority 
of intellect to resist the pressure of practical life. 
Women therefore must never have work away 
from their homes. This rule must be carefully 



-•*^;^ 



THE LIFE. 327 

observed, as on its observance depends the due 
accomplishment of their holy mission. Confined by 
her own will to the sanctuary of her home, the 
woman freely devotes herself to the moral improve- 
ment of her husband and children, and gracefully 
receives her just meed of homage. 

Our constitution of the family, from the material 
point of view, rests on a fundamental principle 
never systematically adopted but by Positivism. 
The general instinct, however, has always had a 
pi*esentiment of it. It is this : The man must sup- 
port the vxrnian. The obligation is equivalent to 
that of the active class towards the contemplative 
class. There is of course an essential difference 
in the mode of discharging it. The maintenance 
of the priesthood is an obligation for the society ; 
it becomes an obligation for individuals only in very 
exceptional cases. Precisely the reverse is the case 
with women, in consequence of the difference in the 
moral influence of the two bodies. The influence 
of women acts on the family, that of the priesthood 
on the whole society. At first the woman is main- 
tained by her father or brothers ; then by her hus- 
band or sons. If all special support of this kind 
fail, then comes in the general obligation of the 
active sex towards the affective, and the government 
must provide for her support on the representations 
of the priesthood. Such is the flrst material basis on 
which the true constitution of the family rests. 

The fulfilment of this condition necessitates at 
once another institution, the renunciation by women 



328 THIBD FABT. 

of all claim to inherit. This renimciatioii must be 
fi«e, and the grounds for it are as valid as those on 
which it rested in the case of the priesthood. The 
object is first to prevent the corrupting influence of 
wealth, secondly to concentrate capital and place 
it in the hands which direct its employment. 
Wealth is even more dangerous to women than to 
priests. For it weakens moral superiority even more 
than it does intellectual. Lastly, the renunciation 
of property by women is the only means of putting 
an end to the custom of giving dowries — a custom 
which is very injurious in many cases, and directly 
contarary to the true objects of marriage. When 
women have no property, marriages will be a matter 
of free choice, wisely exercised. And there will 
be no restriction as to classes, for a common 
education will produce a general uniformity, in 
Bpite of the necessary inequalities of power and 
wealth. But to give all these reasons their fall 
validity, the woman's renunciation must in all cases 
be absolutely voluntary, never the result of a legal 
enactment. 

The Wmnom, — The Positive religion will have 
little difficulty, my Either, in getting women to 
adopt this resolution, if you guarantee them their 
existence. The obligation to support them must be 
made binding on individuals, and its fulfilment 
must be secured by the general convictions of society. 
People often lament the caprices which idleness and 
wealth lead women to indulge when they prefer 
power to love. But it seems to me the moral 



THE UFS. 329 

degradation of womeu is &r greater when thej gain 
their wealth by their own labour. There is a harsh- 
ness produced by the constant pursuit of gain which 
robs such women even of the instinctive kindness 
which the others keep in the midst of their dissipa- 
tion. There are no worse industrial chie& than 
women. 

The Prte«^.— In order to complete our general 
view of the family constitution peculiar to Posi- 
tiyism, it remains for me, my daughter, to point 
oat an institution which is indispensable if the 
veneration we advocate is to have its full effect. 
We must give perfect freedom of devising, perfect 
freedom also of adopting. There must be no check 
on the head of the family, beyond his moral responsi- 
bility. His conduct will of course be open to the 
examination of the priesthood and the public. Our 
next conversation will show you the importance to 
society of these two institutions They are the 
remedies, as far as there is any remedy, for the main 
inconveniences attending the hereditary transmis- 
sion of property. But for the present I only men- 
tion them that you may see their aptitude to purify 
and strengthen all the family relations by clearing 
them from the meanness of aim which at present 
stains them. By no other means can we make the 
affection sons feel for their fathers, if not as tender, 
yet at least as noble as that of the wife for her 
husband. The affection of brothers for one another 
will also be more secure than it is under the revo- 
lutionary system of equal division, or than it was 



330 THIBD PABT. 

under the feudal system, when the younger were 
dependent on the elder. Amongst the rich no one 
will expect anything from his family beyond the 
assistance required for his education and his esta- 
blishment in society. Under such a system there 
will be no check on the full cultivation of all our 
best affections. If the sons are unworthy, the 
&ther will supply their place by a wise adopbion. 

Such is the family in the Positive regime. And it 
is in a society composed of such families that its 
priests will labour. Objects of the free veneration of 
all, they will exert themselves to guard against, or to 
repair, the evil results of the contests occasioned by 
bad passions. Most especially will the priesthood 
endeavour to make women feel the merit of sub- ' 
mission. It will draw out to its full consequences 
the admirable maxim of Aristotle : The greatest 
strength of woman lies in her overcoming the dif- 
jlcutty of obeying. By their education women will 
be led to see that all power, far from raising 
them, necessarily degrades them. It vitiates the 
very basis of their claim, for it makes them seek 
to gain by force that ascendancy which is^due 
only to love. At the same time, the priesthood 
will protect them against the tyranny of their hus- 
bands, and the ingratitude of their sons. It will 
judiciously remind the husband and the son of the 
precepts of Positive religion as to the moral supe- 
riority and social office of the affective sex. In 
the reaction of public on private life we have 
hitherto found the principal means of improving 



THE LIFE. 331 

the latter. This preponderating influence is, in the 
Positive system, placed under the direction of the 
priests of Humanity. They alone are qualified to 
enter the family circle in order to raise and 
strengthen all the family affections by subordi- 
nating them constantly to their social destination, 

CONVERSA.TION XI. 
PUBLIC LIFE. 

The Womcm. — Before we enter on the higher 
part of Positive morals, there are three points, my 
father, which I wish to have cleared up. 

The first is the metaphysical objection often made 
to Positivism that it admits no kind of rights. If 
it is so, I am much more inclined to congratulate 
you on it than to regret it. For it seems to me 
that rights are almost invariably introduced to su- 
persede reason or affection. Women are fortunately 
not allowed to call in the idea, and they are the 
better for it. You know my favourite maxim : 
Ma/rif more them other animals, needs duties to prodiice 
feejf,ng8. 

The Priest — It is true, my daughter, that Posi- 
tivism recognises no right in anybody but the right 
to do hifl duty. To speak more accurately, our re- 
ligion imposes on all the obligation to help every 
one to discharge his peculiar function. In politics 
we must eliminate Rights, as in philosophy we 
eliminate causes. Both rights and causes involve 
the idea of a will admitting of no discussion. Thus 



332 THIBD PART. 

rights, of whatever order, imply of necessity a super- 
natural source, for no other can place them above 
discussion. Divine right, in its concentrated form, 
the divine right of the governor, that is, was really 
efficacious for social purposes. For it was the 
normal guarantee of obedience, and obedience was 
indispensable during the preparatory regime, based 
on theology and war. But divine right, in its dis- 
persive form, the divine right, that is, of the go- 
verned — ^and this is the form in which, more or less 
distinctly, it has been put forward since the decay 
of monotheism — is as anarchical, as it is retrograde 
in the other form. Under both forms equally, it 
can lead to nothing but simply to prolong the 
disorder attendant on the revolution. All honest 
and sensible men, of whatever party, should agree, 
by a common consent, to eliminate the doctrine of 
rights. 

Positivism only recognises duties, duties of all to 
all. Placing itself, as it does, at the social point of 
view, it cannot tolerate the notion of rights, for such 
notion rests on individualism. We are bom under 
a load of obligations of every kind, obligations to 
our predecessors, to our successors, to our contem- 
poraries. After our birth these obligations increase 
or accumulate, for it is some time before we can re- 
turn any service. Where then, in the case of man, 
is the foundation on which we are to rest the idea 
of rights? That idea, properly viewed, implies 
some previous efficiency. However great our efforts, 
the longest life, well employed, will never enable us 



THE UFE. 333 

to pay back more than a scarcely perceptible part 
of what we received. And yet only on the con- 
dition of complete payment could we be aathorized 
to require reciprocity of services. Bights, then, in 
the case of man, are as absurd as they are immoral. 
Divine right is abandoned. The whole notion, then, 
must be completely put away. It had a value in 
reference to the preliminajy state, it is perfectly 
incompatible with the final state of our race. In 
this final state we only recognise duties as the con- 
sequence of functions. 

The Womcm, — My second question, my father, is 
this : over and above the general relation that exists 
between public and private life, does not private 
life call into existence dispositions calculated to fit 
us individually for public life ? 

ITie Priest — So far as our private and individual 
life calls out such dispositions, my daughter, it is as 
the consequence of our private worship. That 
worship is not merely adapted to strengthen and 
develope all private virtues. It finds its most im- 
portant application in our public life, for in it our 
three guardian angels must turn us from evil and 
urge us to good. For this purpose we must address 
short special prayers to them, prayers suited to 
each important case as it arises. 

The powerful efficacy of this assistance was felt 
in the Middle Ages. The noble feeling of the 
knights of chivalry led them to attempt even then 
to institute the worship of woman. So thoroughly 
had they brought into harmony their private and 



334 THIRD PABT. 

public life that the image of the lady of their love 
often animated and embellished their warlike ex- 
istence, giving rise as it did to the tenderest emo- 
tions in the very midst of scenes of desolation or 
terror. If the softer affections could be familiarly 
combined with the destructive activity of man, it 
will not be difficult, nay, it will be fer easier, to com- 
bine them with labours the direct object of which 
is the happiness of man, free from any alloy of pain 
to any one. The holy canticle, with which the most 
beautiful of all poems concludes, is still more suit- 
able in the new than in the old worship — 

Donna, se' tanto grande e tanto yali 
Che qual vuol grazia e a te non ricorre 
Sua disianza vuol volar senz' ali. 

La tua benignitd, non pur soccorre 
A chi dimanda, m^ molte fiate 
Liberamente al dimandar precorre. 

In te misericordia, in te pietate, 
In te magnificenza, in te s'aduna, 
Quantunque in creatura 4 di bontate. 

Dante, Parad. zxziii. 13 — 21. 

So mighty art thou, lady, and so great, 
That he who grace desireth, and comes not 
To thee for aidance, fain would have desire 
Fly without wings. Not only him who asks 
Thy bounty succours; but doth freely oft 
Forerun the asking. Whatsoe'er may be 
Of excellence in creature, pity mild, 
Relenting mercy, large munificence, 
Are all combined in thee. 

Cabt's Translation. 

More than any other class must the priesthood of 
Humanity derive advantage from this assistance. 



THE LIFE. 335 

Its conflict with social evils "will largely develope 
courage, perseverance, and even prudence. But at 
the same time there will be a tendency to impair 
its moral purity by the seductions of ambition, and 
these will be the more formidable as they will seem 
to spring from a holy zeal. Our priests then will 
frequently find it necessary to repair the inroad 
made and to temper afresh their true character, by 
a noble intercourse with women, an intercourse 
primarily subjective, but also objective. 

As for the dispositions called out by the second 
form of private life, by our family life, that is, the 
family will be always our best apprenticeship for 
practising the rule which we must all freely adopt, 
as the primary basis of our public life : Live vnth- 
out concealment. To hide their moral baseness, our 
metaphysicians secured the adoption of the shameful 
legislation, by which we are forbidden to scrutinize 
the private life of public men. Positivism, on the 
contrary, openly sanctions the common instinct of 
men, and courts a careful inquiry into the life of 
the individual and the family, as the best security 
for public conduct. We should not wish for the 
esteem of any but those for whom we feel it. No 
one then is bound to give to every one without dis- 
tinction a constant account of all his actions. But 
however limited, in certain cases, may be the num- 
ber of our judges, it is enough that we have judges 
to secure the law of living openly from losing its 
moral e^cacy, as it impels us constantly to do 
nothing but what we can at any time own. The 



336 THIHD PABT. 

adoption of tliis principle involves an nndeviating 
respect for truth and a scrupnlons adherence to 
every engagement In these two general duties, 
the introduction of which we owe to the Middle 
Ages, we sum up the whole of public morality. 
They show the thorough soundness of the admirable 
judgment given by Dante, the unconscious r^nre- 
sentative of the spirit of chivalry, which places 
traitors in the lowest depth of helL Even in the 
midst of modem anarchy, Ariosto, the best poet 
of chivalry, nobly proclaimed the grand maxim of 
our heroic ancestors — 

La fede unqtia non deve esser corrotta, 
O data a un boIo, o data insieme a mille. 

« « « « 

Senza ghirare, o segno altro piu espresso, 
Basti una yolta che s'abbia promesso. 

Orlando Furioso, xxi. 2. 

Faith never must be broken, 

Be it given to one, or to a thousand. 

« « « « 

No oath is needed, nor other distinct sign; 
Enough that once the promise be given. 

Such presentiments of the morals of sociocratic 
times are systematically incorporated into the Posi- 
tive religion. It represents falsehood and treason 
as directly incompatible with any co-operation. 

The Wamcm. — My third and last question is this, 
my &ther. May we not divide public life as we 
divided private life, taking as our guide the inequa- 
lity in point of extent of the ties which each of the 
parts of our division represents) The interval be- 



THE LIFE. 337 

tween the Family and Humanity is too wide for the 
heart, or even for the intellect. To rise from one 
to the other they require the intermediate step, the 
Country. If so, public life seems to me necessarily 
to fell into two very marked divisions, and we 
deal, first with our relations as citizens, then with 
our relations as men. 

I%e Priest. — ^You are right, my daughter, and on 
this distinction rests the general plan of our actual 
conversation. But before we apply it, we must see 
that it have the requisite accuracy and consistency. 
For this we must limit the sacred idea of Country, 
which has in modem times become too vague, and 
consequently almost without influence, as a result 
of the exorbitant extension of the States of the 
Western world. We must follow up the indication 
which we threw out in the study of the doctrine, 
and look on the republics of the future as much 
smaller than the revolutionary prejudices of the 
present day seem to consider probable. The gradual 
break-up of the colonial system since the indepen- 
dence of America is, in reality, only the first step 
towards a final disruption of all the overgrown 
kingdoms which arose on the dissolution of the 
Catholic bond of union. 

Ultimately, the normal extent of the States of 
the Western world will be much the same as that 
of Tuscany, Belgium, and Holland, at the present 
time. Sicily, Sardinia, (fee, will soon follow. A 
population of one to three millions, at the average 
rate of one hundred per square mile, is the best 
z 



338 THIBD FABT. 

limit for States which are really free. For the term 
, free is only applicable to States, the parts of which 
coalesce of their own free will, without any violence, 
from the instinctive sense of a real genuine com- 
munity of interest. The continuance of peace in 
Western Europe will dispel all serious fear of fo- 
reign invasion, and even of a coalition for retro- 
grade purposes. As a consequence, there will soon 
be a general feeling that it is desirable by peaceful 
means to bring about the dissolution of all facti- 
tious aggregates, for there will be for the fature no 
real justification for them. Before the end of the 
nineteenth century, the French E.epublic will, of its 
own free will, break up into seventeen independent 
republics, each comprising five of the existing de- 
partments. Ireland will ere long separate from 
England. This will lead to the rupture of the arti- 
ficial bonds which now imite Scotland, and even 
Wales, with England proper. All the States which 
are now too large will undergo a similar process, so 
that, at the opening of next century, Portugal and 
Ireland, granting they remain entire, will be the 
largest republics of the West. It is to a State within 
these limits that we can apply the term Country, 
and this is the sense in which we use the term 
in our survey of public life in the normal state. 
In such a country the national feeling can really 
occupy an intermediate position between &inily 
aflTection and the love of our race. 

The W(ynficm. — Accepting this valuable simplifi- 
cation, due to Positivism as a political system, I 



THE LITE, 339 

tope that I shall find, my father, no serious diffi- 
ciJiy in your direct explanation of public life. 
'The Priest — Public life, my daughter, consists 
ttoUy in the due realization of these two maxims — 
Pevotion of the strong to the weak; veneration of the 
dk/or the si/rong, No society can last if the infe- 
feors do not respect their superiors. The strongest 
onfirmation of this law is seen in the actual degra- 
ation, when, in default of love, every one obeys 
inere force. And yet our revolutionary pride laments 
the so-called servility of our ancestors, though they 
could love the chiefs they obeyed. The second 
then of our social maxims is common to all times 
equally. The first really dates from the Middle 
Ages. Antiquity almost universally thought other- 
wise, with here and there a happy exception. Its 
favourite aphorism is sufficient evidence— if aw^c? 
is horn for the few. We find then that the social 
harmony rests on the combined activity of our two 
best altruistic instincts, respectively adapted to the 
inferiors and superiors in their relations with one 
another. This concurrence, however, can only exist 
and be permanent where men are prepared for it 
by the habitual exercise of the most energetic, 
though the lowest, of our three sympathetic in- 
stincts, an habitual exercise which depends on 
the legitimate development of our home affections. 
The primary condition for the attainment of this 
result, the harmony, viz., of society, is the sepa- 
ration of the spiritual and temporal powers. To 
secure the devotion of the strong to the weak^ 
z2 



340 THIKD TABT. 

we must amongst the strong have a class whose 
social ascendancy depends entirely on their devoting 
themselves to the weak,, as a return for the venera- 
tion freely given by the weak. Thus it is that the 
priesthood becomes the soul of true sociocracy. 
It is of course implied that the priesthood limit 
itself to counsel, and never exercise command. 

This is why I laid such stress on complete renun- 
ciation by the priesthood of power and even of 
wealtL The better to secure this, the priests must 
also abstain from deriving any material profit from 
their work, whether it take the shape of lectures or 
books 3 they must subsist solely on their annual 
stipends. The central budget of the priesthood will, 
with certain exceptions, provide for the printing of 
all their works. All that will be required is the sig- 
nature of the author. He will have the control of 
their distribution, as being the best judge in the 
case, and thus he will be constantly responsible. 
The priest who sells his books or his lectures will 
be severely punished, even with the loss of his posi- 
tion on the third ojffence. 

Still more to purify the priesthood, it must have 
no power to crush any opinions contrary to its own. 
For this reason the Positivist regime will always 
require full liberty of exposition and even of dis- 
cussion. This is but reasonable where the doctrines 
are throughout demonstrable. The only admissible 
restriction of this liberty is public opinion. As a 
consequence of a sound education, which is common 
to all, men will, of themselves, reject doctrines 



THE UFK.. 



341 



which are contrary to any of their cbj^Ji*'*^^'^^- 
We may see to what an extent this will be tiii?^^^*^ 
by the discipline already unconsciously exercised b^ 
the Positiye faith. It has no power to constrain ^ 
men, and yet exerts a control in the case of the 
leading doctrines of modem science. If there is no 
legal hindrance to any opposition, then no one can 
complain reasonably if the public rejects his teach- 
ing. Such are the conditions of the priesthood. 
And under these conditions it will be compelled to 
persuade or convince, if it wish to exercise any real* 
influence on great and small equally. 

The Woman, — ^The interference of the priesthood 
in civil life must mainly be directed to regulate the 
habitual relations of the patriciate and proletariate. 
I would wish you, my &.ther, to explain in detail 
its office on this essential point. 

The Priest. — I must begin, my daughter, by a 
more detailed exposition of the constitution of 
modem industry in the normal state. Its organiza- 
tion depends on two general conditions. We can 
trace their existence even at the close of the Middle 
Ages, and they have been in constant growth ever 
since. The first is — ^the distinction of masters and 
workmen; the second is — ^the hierarchy of the 
patriciate, and, as a consequence, that of the pro- 
letariate. Add the subordination of the country 
districts to the towns, and the organization is 
complete. 

On the abolition of serfage, industry became suffi- 
ciently strong to dispense with the system of work- 



343 



THIBD PABT. 



ing to Qji^er. It anticipated the public demancL 
'J^h^^ff itself involved a separation of the masters 
rs) from the simple workmen. The pro- 
egress of the two classes was distinct Graduallj, in 
its course, there arose the normal hierarchy already 
indicated in our worship. First comes the agricul- 
turist; then the manufacturer; next the merchant ; 
the last step is the banker. Each of the four rests 
on the class that precedes it. Where the operations 
are more indirect and the agents more carefdlly 
selected and in smaller numbers, a greater breadth 
of view and power of abstraction are required, and 
the responsibility is greater. The classification 
above given was spontaneously adopted ; it is sys- 
tematized by Positivism in accordance with the 
principle of its hierarchy. Thus the normal co-ordi- 
nation of industry is a continuation of the same 
process which was found applicable in the first place 
to science, then to art. 

If this industrial hierarchy is to have a powerful 
influence on society, the patriciate must -be concen- 
trated as &r as is consistent with each patrician's 
himself administering his afi&irs within the limits 
of his personal superintendence. This secures two 
objects : it lessens the expenses of management, and 
it ensures responsibility. In this point the true 
interest of the workmen entirely coincides with 
the natural tendencies of their superiors. For 
great duties require great means. The existing 
disorder is greatly aggravated by the jealous ambi* 
tion of the smaller capitalists, and their blind con- 



^ 



THE LIFE. 343 

tempt of the people. When they are regenerated, 
under the joint stimulus of circumstances and con- 
victions, the higher members will be absorbed into 
the patriciate, the great body into the proletariate, 
BO as to put an end to the middle classes properly 
so called. 

The Womom, — ^This necessary concentration of 
riches is even now, my father, desired by the pro- 
letaries of our large towns, as a real social benefit. 
The country population still clings to an almost 
indefinite dispersion of property. But the attain- 
znent of this concentration must largely depend on 
the hereditary transmission of property. Would 
you now complete the remarks on this point which 
you made when explaining the worship ? They do 
not appear to me adequate. 

The Priest, — ^We must, my daughter, connect 
the hereditary transmission with a more general 
principle, with the principle which is to regulate, 
in the normal state, the succession of all ^mction- 
aries whatever. The method of election was only 
introduced as a protest, and, for a long time, a ne- 
cessary protest, against the caste system, which had 
finally become oppressive. In itself the choice of 
the superior by the inferior is, in all cases, tho- 
roughly anarchical. It has never been of use ex- 
cept as a means of breaking up a defective social ^ 
order. The final state must, in this respect, differ 
firom the primitive state of mankind only so &r, 
that it substitutes for the hereditary succession of 
theocracy, which was founded on birth, the heredi- 



344 THIBD PABT. 

tarj succession of sociocracy, which is, in all cases, 
the result of the free initiatiye of each ^ino- 
tionary. 

The whole cfystem of checks and complicationfly to 
which distrust gives rise, ends after all in irrespon- 
sihilitj. Perfect confidence and complete respon- 
sihilitj, such are the two characteristics of the 
Positiye system. He who worthily discharges any 
function whatever is always the best judge of his 
successor. He names him^ but submits his nomi- 
nation to his own superior. In the spiritual order 
alone, the choice is vested in the supreme head, 
with the view of obtaining the requisite concentra- 
tion in an office of such difficulty. 

For the highest temporal functions^ there can of 
course be no control of a superior. Its natural 
substitute is the examination of the appointment 
by the priesthood and the publia This is the 
ground on which the chief must solemnly nominate 
his successor^ at the time when he receives, as you 
are aware, the sacrament of retirement, at an age 
that is when his choice need not be final, but 
may be modified on suitable advice. In exoep* 
tional cases, the priesthood may refuse this sacra- 
ment, and so prevent a man who was morally 
or intellectually unworthy exercising this last act 
of power. 

Erom the social point of view we look on wealth 
as a power. It must pass then by the same general 
rules as all other powers. The free choice of an 
heir, involved in the ftdl liberty of devising acid 



THE UFE. 345 

adopting, offers the best remedy against ordinary 
abuses. Indeed each one in this way becomes re- 
sponsible if his successor is bad^ whereas under the 
French law it can be no reproach to him. We 
need not fear that the inheritance will generally 
£aJl to one of the sons, supposing them all to be 
really incapable. The industrial chie& aim at per- 
petuating their hotues in proper hands, and this 
leads them often to choose their successors out of 
their own family. This, at the present day, they 
can only do by sacrificing their daughters. Thus, 
the hereditary succession of sociocracy, so &r from 
lessening the power of wealth, is more &.yourable 
to it than that of theocracy, at the same time that 
it largely increases its moral responsibility. 

The Woman, — After this explanation^ my fether, 
I feel sufficiently to understand the temporal con- 
stitution of the Positive rigvme. You may proceed 
to the direct consideration of the manner in which 
the priesthood of Humanity will, as a general 
rule, interfere in civil conflicts. 

The Priest, — ^With a view to the clearer appre- 
ciation of this, the highest attribute of the priest- 
hood, it will be as well, my daughter, to begin by 
giving you the statistics of the patriciate when it is 
regularly organized throughout the West. Two 
thousand bankers, a hundred thousand merchants, 
two hundred thousand manufacturers, four hundred 
thousand agriculturists, — such are the numbers 
sufficient, in my judgment, to provide industrial 
chiefs for the hundred and twenty millions who 



w 



346 THUCD PABT. 

inhabit Western Europe. In the hands of this 
small nmnber of patricians will be concentrated the 
capital of the West. Their task is to direct its 
employment. They are subject to no control, and 
must act on their own moral responsibility^ and 
in the interest of a proletariate of thirty-three 
times their number. 

In each separate republic, the goyemment pro- 
perly so called, that is to say, the supreme temporal 
power, will be vested exclusively in three bankers. 
The three will have their separate departments; 
they will represent commerce, manu&ctures, agri- 
culture. Before these two hundred triumvirs the 
Western priesthood, acting under the direction of 
the High Priest of Humaniiy, will lay in proper 
form the legitimate claims of an immense prole- 
tariate. The exceptional class, which is in the 
habit of habitually studying the future and the 
past, concentrates its care on the present It speaks 
to the living in the name of those who have lived, 
and in the interest of those who are to live. 

The Wamcm, — ^Your language, my fisither, seems 
to me never to depart from a sound estimate of 
human existence in its manifold forms. By making 
all citizens social functionaries, on the ground that 
all their respective offices are really useful. Positiv- 
ism ennobles obedience and strengthens power. 
Every form of active life has its due honour, as par- 
ticipating in the promotion of the public wel&re, 
and as no longer limited to a purely private purpose. 
Now to effect this wholesome change, the priesthood 



THE LIFE. 347 

never need appeal to an enthusiasm which can only 
be exceptional. Enough if it can lead men gene- 
rally to form an accurate judgment of what is really 
habitually the case. 

The Priest. — ^It is a primary principle of Posi- 
tivism, that man's labour is necessarily gratuitous. 
This gives us, my daughter, a powerful means of 
developing the feelings and convictions which are 
suited to each class of society. When wages are no 
longer viewed as paying the value of the func- 
tionaiy, but simply as replacing the materials he 
consumes, the merit of each individual stands out 
more clearly in the eyes of alL The priesthood 
finds it easier to accomplish its most important 
social duty. This duty is to put forward openly 
its abstract classification founded on its intellectual 
and moral appreciation of the individual, and so to 
counterbalance the concrete classification necessi- 
tated by social subordination. If properly drawn 
out, the contrast between the two views will recall 
the superiors to a better disposition towards their 
inferiors; for it will lead them to see that their 
own elevation depends more on their position than 
on their deserts. True, it is the subjective life alone 
that can really ensure the preponderance of the 
classification by merit, without involving any sub- 
versive tendency. Still this contrast, emanating 
from the religious body, will place in a truer light 
the official classification, whilst it in no degree 
lessens the respect due to it. 

But, at the same time, the priesthood will make 



348 THIBD PART. 

the proletary body deeply conscious of the real 
advantages of their social condition. Their minds 
will be prepared by a wise education, and they will 
be under the constant influence of home affections. 
To them then there will be no difficulty in proving 
the perfect soundness of the admirable maxim of 
the great Corneille : — 

On yad'un pas plus ferme d, suivre qu'& conduire. 
Our step is firmer when we follow than when we lead. 

The happiness that springs from a noble submis- 
sion and from the legitimate absence of respon- 
sibility will be appreciated by the proletaries, when 
family life 'shall have been properly organized in 
the class which is best qualified thoroughly to enjoy 
it. The proletariate will feel that the main office 
of the patriciate is to secure to all the peaceable 
enjoyment of the satisfactions of home, on which our 
true happiness chiefly depends. There will be less 
scope for such satisfactions in the case of the spi- 
ritual or temporal rulers of society. And the.vast 
responsibility which prevents their enjoying them, 
will make their exalted position more an object of 
pity than of envy. For the only compensation for 
this responsibility is in their more largely con- 
ducing to the public welfere. This noble reward 
requires, for its thorough enjoyment, a high order of 
mind, rare at all times in the patrician body, and 
not common even in the priesthood. Within due 
limits, then, we must acquiesce in the vulgar grati- 
fications of pride or vanity. They are generaDy 



THE LIFE. 349 

the only stimulants of sufficient strength to call out 
the zeal requisite for command and counsel. 

The Womom, — I should be glad, my father, to 
have a more accurate idea of this essential function 
of those who freely administer the capital of the 
race. I should like, that is, to see how the patri- 
cians are to secure the proletary the &ir develop- 
ment of his home existence, the first guarantee of 
order in the normal state. 

The Priest, — All you have to do, my daughter, 
is to look on every one in the first place as possess- 
ing property, then as receiving wages. Every pro- 
letary must possess as his own all the materials 
which are in constant use, and the use of which 
cannot be common, whether they be required 
by himself or his family. It is clear that we may 
get so far as a rule, and in no other way can we 
ensure order in practical life. But we are as yet 
far from this point. Many estimable men are not 
owners of the furniture they daily use, some not 
even of the clothes they wear. As for their dwell- 
ings, you well know that most proletaries are rather 
in the position of soldiers under tents, than of 
citizens with houses, in our anarchical towns. All, 
however, that would be required would be, not to 
sell entire houses as is now usually done, but to sell 
them in apartments, as we see done in some towns. 
Every family of the people would then be the abso- 
lute proprietor of its dwelling, on payment of a 
slightly increased rent for some years. 

Our private worship and our private life fix the 



350 THIBD PABt. 

limits of the dwelling. And they also show how 
important it is that it should be permanent. For 
without permanence, we may say that the first 
revolution in man's existence, that by which he 
passed from the life of the nomad to a sedentary life, 
is incomplete. The permanence of the dwelling 
naturally will influence the stability of all indus- 
trial relations, by suppressing a fatal tendency to a 
Tagabond life. Positive religion sanctions the fall 
liberty of man to give or withhold his co-operation, 
but not the less does it make it a duty for every 
one not to change his inferiors or superiors without 
serious grounds. Even to change capriciously the 
shops we deal with is blameable, tending as it does 
to disturb the economy of their operations, which 
presupposes some degree of steadiness in their cus- 
tomers. . 

As for wages paid at fixed periods, they must be 
regularly divided into two unequal parts. The first 
part, independent of the actual results of the labour, 
must pay the discharge of a given duty. The second 
must depend on the results obtained. Otherwise you 
cannot secure the workmen against the effects of 
interruptions for which they are in no way respon- 
sible, whUst at the same time you give their chie& 
free scope for the various industrial improvements, 
especially improvements in machinery. Machinery, 
which raises the moral dignity of the workman and 
gives him increased ef&ciency, may then spread 
freely, and be open to no objection on social 
grounds. The proportion of the fixed salary to 



THE UFB. 351 

that which yaries must differ in different branches 
of industry, in obedience to laws which it rests with 
the patriciate to discover and apply. 

The WoTncm. — I do not doubt the healthful in- 
fluence of this normal order, and yet, my father, I 
feel, that the instinct of destruction, stimulating the 
other egoistic tendencies, will always occasion some 
conflicts amongst the Western nations, eyen when 
regenerated. I must ask you, then, how is the 
priesthood to interfere in these inevitable discus- 
sions? 

The Priest, — In the first place, it will endeavour, 
my daughter, to prevent them as far as possible, by 
the wise use of its spiritual discipline. The differ- 
ence between this discipline and the temporal is 
mainly this. The spiritual brings into play our 
good instincts, whilst the temporal contends with 
the bad. It is positive rather than negative in its 
action; it corrects by comparison rather than by 
compression; it rewards the good rather than 
punishes the bad. And yet, at need it can be 
severe, as I have already explained. 

By the use of all the means at its disposal, as a 
spiritual power, it will often prevent, or if not, will 
soon repair, the civil conflicts which result from the 
practical activity of man, under the natural play of 
egoistic passions. The whole of Positive religion 
tends to inculcate the truth, that, as society only 
exists by virtue of free co-operation, no lasting com- 
promise is possible, nor any legitimate modification, 
unless as the result of the voluntary assent of the 



352 THIRD PABT. 

different classes whicli co-operate. The greatest of 
all social revolutions, the gradual abolition of 
slavery in Europe, was effected in the Middle Ages, 
without a single insurrection. Still, as from the 
imperfection of our mental organization the priest- 
hood will not always be able to secure due respect 
for the will of man, it must ultimately exert itself 
to moderate when it cannot prevent the struggle. 
Its general rule, in accordance with the nature of 
modern civilization, is this. It must brand as 
radically wrong, as equally anarchical and retro- 
grade, all recourse to arms either on the one side or 
the other. In the industrial society, material con- 
tests, when inevitable, must be decided by wealth, 
whether in the hands of the few or of the many, 
never by personal violence. This must be reserved 
for criminals in the strict sensa We never 
ought to use force except against acts which are 
unanimously disapproved, disapproved even by those 
who commit them. 

The destructive instinct is always susceptible of 
this change. In fact, the change has already taken 
place, for the most part, in the case of chronic 
violations of order, such as strikes, even where large 
masses are concerned. It remains to introduce it 
systematically, and to extend it to acute distur- 
bances of the social system. Persecution formerly 
attacked life, it now habitually respects even per- 
sonal liberty; it attacks property, so that it is 
easier to avoid it and to remedy it. So in crime, 
murder has given way to theft. There is ground 



THE LIFE. 353 

for hope, then, that Positive religion wiU bring men 
to decide their most vehement disputes without any 
war properly so called, even between citizens. This 
final change wiU be rendered much easier by the 
normal restriction of the several republics, as the 
power of the patriciate will increase side by side 
with the increase of independence in the proletariate. 
TU Fbwaw.— Great as is the value of this 
change in the chara<;ter of material contests,it seems 
to me, my father, more advantageous to the supe- 
riors than to the inferiors. The workmen are to 
renounce, you say, all use of force, and to limit 
themselves to a struggle of purses. If they do so, 
they seem to me to do an act of great generosity in 
the interest of society, not but that there is ample 
reason for their so acting. 

But I am afraid that by joining issue on the 
ground where the masters are the strongest, they 
wiU often be victims to the selfishness of the rich, 
even supposing that they have everywhere obtained 
what is but simply just, viz., the liberty to form coali- 
tions at their pleasure, so that there be no violence. 
The social power which the plebeians derive from 
their just refusal aa a body to co-operate in industrial 
operations will be inadequate. The immense capital 
of the rich will enable them ultimately to triumph 
over the most legitimate resistance. The priest- 
hood wiU, of course, give great strength to the com- 
binations of workmen by its sanction. I still, 
however, fear that the predominance of wealth will 
be abused. 



A A 



354: THIRD PABT. 

The Priest, — ^You may take courage, my daughter, 
by considering first of all the habitual influence of 
the priesthood on the patriciate, resulting from 
close personal relatione According to our statis* 
tical survey, the regular nutaber of bankers, in the 
West, is the same as that of the Fositivist temples. 
Each temple will be naturally under the temporal 
protectorate of the adjacent banker, who will be 
commissioned by the triumvirate of the State to 
transmit the priests their stipends. There will be 
frequent intercourse between the priests and the 
principal industrial chiefe, so as to revive in an 
especial degree in these last the feelings of venera- 
tion which resulted from their own education, and 
which have been continued by the education of 
their children. 

The Woman, — Allow me to interrupt you a 
minute, my father, on the subject of this last source 
of influence. Our encyclopedic instruction is never 
to be compulsory. The rich then will refuse, from 
a foolish pride, to let their sons share in it, and still 
more their daughters. They renounce, of course, 
the sacraments which follow on the education and 
the social weight it will carry. If so, the personal 
influence you speak of would be essentially nothing 
more than the involuntary deference everywhere 
paid to ability and virtue. 

The Priest. — ^Your incidental objection has more 
force in it, my daughter, than you think. Still I 
shall find it not diflGicult to remove it. Attendance 
on Fositivist schools is not necessary for admission 



THE LIFE. 355 

to the social sacraments, or even to our public ex- 
aminations. The only question asked will be, is 
the instruction real and adequate 1— not, where does 
it come from ? Only, where the instruction has not 
been given by the priesthood, the priests will have 
to take greater pains in getting their information 
as to the moral character of the candidate. Such 
information will always be as indispensable as the 
judgment on intellectual ability. 

Notwithstanding this full liberty of instruction, 
which will have the further result of increasing the 
zeal of our professors, the official schools will never 
be deserted by the rich, unless the priesthood dege- 
nerate. For the rich will not wish their children 
to have less instruction than the mass of the people, 
and yet they will not be able to get them so good 
an education, even at a great cost, in private. In- 
deed the priesthood will naturally absorb the best 
professors, and their functions will prevent them 
giving private instruction, to say nothing of its 
being, as you are aware, strictly forbidden. The 
private masters must recruit their members from 
these who are incapable of becoming priests or even 
vicars. The result will be that their lectures will 
be in permanent disrepute. 

The Womom, — ^Your explanation quite sets me at 
ease, my father, as to any aristocratic dislike of a 
common education. So I beg you to resume your 
important appreciation of the peculiar influence 
which the priesthood of Positivism exerts over the 
industrial chiefs to prevent, or, if that is not 
A a2 



356 THIRD PART. 

possible, to remedy the more serious practical dis- 
putes. 

The Priest — Over and above its personal rela- 
tions with the highest patrician class, whose influ- 
ence will be great on the rest, the priesthood will 
everywhere find, my daughter, special allies. This 
it will do by a suitable reorganization of a volun- 
tary protectorata The institution of knighthood 
is in no way exclusively adapted to the military 
form of existence. On the contrary, the principle 
of brute force, the essential principle of the military 
regime^ shackled the admirable development of 
chivalry in the Middle Ages. Positivism adopts 
the institution of knighthood, and gives it a better 
form. Properly modified, it is still more adapted 
to the Positive regime than to the Catholic-feudal. 
The protection emanating from the order of knight- 
hood in Positivism must in the main be given in 
the form of money, but it will often call forth a 
devotion which, though less striking than that seen 
in feudal times, will be more effectual, and also 
more susceptible of due regulation. Many indus- 
trial chiefs, especially amongst the bankers, will in 
early life enrol themselves as members of a free 
association, which shall have at its disposal enormous 
wealth, and either on its own impulse, or on an appeal 
from the priesthood, shall generously interfere in 
the more important contests. The noble protection 
of this society will not be limited to oppressed 
proletaries. It will also secure priests against all 
tyranny of the temporal power. 



THE LIFE. 357 

The WoTMm, — ^Witt this valuable institution, it 
seems to me, my fiather, that the sum of the means 
at the disposal of the priests of Humanity is com- 
plete—the means by which^ they are enabled duly 
to regulate the mutual relations of the citizens. 
ITou may proceed to explain to me the normal mode 
of tlje priesthood's intervention in international 
questions. 

The Priest, — Such questions must fall into dis- 
tinct classes, my daughter. We must first take the 
case of Positivist populations ; secondly, that of the 
populations which have not yet adopted the true 
religion. The first case simply requires us to 
enlarge the views already stated, and may therefore 
be soon settled. Nay, it is even true that the in- 
fluence of the priesthood in the sphere of inter- 
national relations is at once more easily brought to 
bear, and with more decisive results. The existing 
States will soon be broken up, and the great Western 
Republic will be divided into sixty independent 
Republics, which will have nothing in common but 
their spiritual organization. There never will arise 
within the limits of this Western Kepublic any 
temporal power with universal dominion, answering 
to the phantom emperor of the Middle Ages, who 
was for Catholicism nothing but an element of dis- 
turbance, empirically introduced from the Koman 
system. In the new order, all collective action 
will be temporary, and as such will be directed by 
the national triumvirates acting for the time in con- 
cert. Any practical institutions which are meant to 



358 THIBD PART. 

be really uniyersal^ are, by that very fact, reserved 
for the priesthood, for no other power can override 
national rivalries sufficiently to secure the adoption 
of such institutions. The particular governments 
only interfere to aid in their foundation by finding 
the requisite money. This is the way in which an 
uniform system of moneys, weights, and measures 
may readily and peaceably meet with universal 
acceptance. 

The sixty republics of the regenerated West 
will, in the normal state, have no other habitual 
bond of union but their common education, their 
community of manners and customs, and their 
common festivals. In a word, their union will be 
religious, not political. Allowance must be made 
for the historical relations resulting from previous 
aggregatioDS. But these will soon be forgotten in 
the new connexion, unless they rest on community 
of language. The High Priest of Humanity will 
be, more truly than any medieval Pope, the only 
real head of the Western world. He will have it 
in his power, if it be necessary, to concentrate the 
action of the whole priesthood so as to repress any 
tyrannical triumvirate. He will be able also to 
call on the neighbouring^ knights for aid, and on all 
neutral governments for their peaceful mediation. 
If industrial contests are inevitable, he can, if he 
sees proper, secure for the combinations of the 
workmen an extension which must decide the issue, 
for he can bring to their aid all their feUow- 
workmen in the West, even when they do not 



THE LIFB. 359 

belong to the branch of industry which is actually 
threatened. And conversely, if the priesthood in 
any case blame the conduct of the workmen, or 
even simply refuse its approval, the masters will find 
it easy to overcome any unwarranted resistance. 

The Womcm. — All that is left, my father, is to 
determine what are the systematic relations of the 
population that has embraced Positivism with the 
nations that have not yet done so. 

The Priest, — Looking at the close connexion 
formed by the Catholic-feudal system, which 
throughout Western Europe followed on the Roman 
incorporation, you may see, my daughter, that the 
new faith will prevail simultaneously in the whole 
of Western Europe, including in this term its 
various colonial appendages^ and especially Ame- 
rica. The progress of the Positive spirit in science, 
in art, and in industry leads to convergence far 
more powerfully than the disruption of Catho- 
licism, and even an undue nationality, lead to 
divergence. But the vast spiritual republic thus 
fotmed scarcely comprises the fifth part of our race. 
It is important then to consider in outline the 
method by which the West, when regenerate, 
must gradually bring into communion with it all 
the inhabitants of our planet. 

Once let the reorganization of the West be fairly 
secure, and a noble proselytism will become the 
principal collective occupation of the Positive 
priesthood. No claim of the temporal power is 
valid against the evidently exclusive claim of the 



360 THIBD PABT. 

priesthood to this function. If that priesthood alone 
is competent to regulate properly the mutual inter- 
course of the several nations of the West, there is 
still stronger reason for allowing that it can have 
no competitor in regulating still wider intemational 
relations. There have been many ephemeral and 
disastrous attempts at domination, but it is after 
all to the improvements in science or industiy that 
is really due any beneficial and permanent inter- 
course of the West with the other portions of the 
globe. Positivism alone, by virtue of its relative 
character, can organize missions worthy of the name. 
By these missions it will gradually unite all na- 
tions with the unity which is its characteristic, the 
only unity which is worthy of universal extension. 

The Womcm. — This immense conversion, without 
which the organization of Humanity would be in- 
complete, will, my father, follow some natural 
course. What that course will be, I shoidd like to 
have explained, in its essential features at least 

Ths Priest, — Its course, my daughter, is deter- 
mined by the decreasing affinity of Positivism with 
the several populations outside its pale. They are 
the monotheistic, polytheistic, and lastly the fetich- 
ist nations. But the cases that seem most un- 
favourable, from the smaller amount of spontaneous 
preparation, allow on the other hand a more com- 
plete systematic interference, if we rightly apply the 
general theory of man's transitiona The whole 
conversion may be effected in three generations, 
that is, its outline may be traced, — ^a generation for 



THE LIFE. 361 

each of the main phases. It will be for the next 
centuiyto develope the various bases of uniformity, 
-which a numerous and zealous priesthood may with 
proper assistance lay down. 

We have, first, the monotheists of the East, the 
Christian monotheists, and the Mussulman; or, 
Xtassia, Turkey and Persia. In both cases, these 
populations may be raised to the level finally 
attained by the West, without requiring a servile 
and hazardous imitation of the stormy and difficult 
course necessitated by the original evolution. Even 
at the present day, the historical theory of Posi- 
tivism offers a valuable assistance to the noble 
governments which are exerting themselves to 
direct this ascending process by keeping it clear of 
disturbance from the West. Bussia in the last cen- 
tury put herself under the guidance of France. In 
the present she sees that it is advisable to hold 
aloof from France. The change is a very wise ona 
To follow the old policy of imitation would hence- 
forth render the Sclavonian nations liable to vio- 
lent disturbance, whilst it would bring with it no 
real progress, intellectual or social. 

But when Paris, in its regenerate state, shall 
have lost its revolutionary character, the Czars will 
look to it for the ideas and for the assistance they 
need in their great work. Their noble instinct 
leads them to be zealous in peaceably ameliorating 
the internal condition of their vast empire. They 
will wish for aid in systematically acting on that 
instinct. Positivism will not urge them to imitate 



362 raxBD past. 

a past which can never return. But it will urge 
them to form a sounder estimate of their pecu- 
liar advantages. For instance, it was necessary 
in France to break up the great feudal fortunes as 
a step to the advent of a new patriciate, to be fos- 
tered under the ephemeral ascendancy of the middle 
dasses. In Bussia, on the contrary, it is im- 
portant at the present day to nmintain the concen- 
tration of wealth which is desirable in the final 
state, and which we shall have great difficulty in 
returning to in France. A wise autocrat will 
limit his efforts to the substitution of the industrial 
for the military character. The basis for this 
change is already laid in the permanence of general 
peace, on which we may calculate for the future. 

The Womcm. — The influence of Positivist sug- 
gestions, my fiither, may power^illy affect Buasia, 
for Bussia resembles the West in point of religion. 
Turkey and Persia have not yet reached the mono- 
gamic state. They afford less scope, then, for in- 
tervention. 

The Priest. — At the present moment, my 
daughter, polygamy is of more common occurrence 
at Paris than at Constantinople. Islamism has, in 
&,ct, undergone the same dissolving process as Catho- 
licism. Besides, we form in general very ex- 
aggerated ideas of the difference of manners and 
Qpinions in the Eastern and Western nations. 
That we do so is clear from the instinctive tendency 
of the Mussulman nations to put themselves under 
our guidauca 



THE LIFE. 363 

The incomparable Mahomet rejected the separa- 
tion of the spiritual and temporal power. He did 
so the more easily to constitute his military theo- 
cracy. He had at the same time a feeling that 
this great improvement of the social order was 
premature, as being incompatible with the theolo- 
gical principle. It was natural at that time that 
he should look on such an attempt as confined to 
the West. Even in the West its ultimate failure 
would long be a source of serious danger. If then 
Islamism depiived the Eastern nations of the 
admirable progress effected under the impulse of 
Catholicism in the Middle Ages, it has preserved 
them, since that time, from the transitional anarchy 
from which we have suffered these ^ve last cen- 
turies, and which even now is the origin of so many 
obstacles. Thanks to their rigime, Mussulmans are, 
in the main, exempt from metaphysicians and even 
from lawyers. Positivism will dissuade them from a 
disastrous imitation, and will enable them fully to 
appreciate this capital advantage, which may be a 
powerful aid in their final regeneration. 

The Woman. — I understand, my father, our re- 
lation to Islamism, though I had missed the prin- 
ciple on which it rests, from want of a competent 
knowledge of your theory of history. But for the 
polytheists, and they are nearly half the human 
race, it would surprise me much if our faith were 
shown to be equally susceptible of an immediate 
efficacy. The distance between us and them is too 
great. 



364 THIBD PABT. 

Ths Priest. — On the oontraiy, my daughter, we 
may be much more useful to the polytheist than to 
the monotheisty for we may spare the polytheist a 
longer and harder transition. If left to their own 
course, the polytheistic nations would begin by 
passing through some monotheistic staga Natu- 
rally they are indisposed to this, when they see 
the complete discredit which has attached to mo- 
notheism, for the last centuiy at least, in the West 
and even in the East. But the Positive religion 
will enable them to dispense with any such em- 
pirical course. It will take special measures for 
enabling them to pass directly to the final religion. 
Monotheism is absolutely indispensable only in the 
original evolution. Many boys will unconsciously 
omit the monotheistic stage in their encyclopedic 
novitiate. If so, clearly it will be easy for the 
Western priesthood by a zealous and systematic 
effort to preserve the polytheistic nations from it. 
For their leading doctrines may be transformed into 
Positive conceptions, with a species of theological 
colouring, which might soon be removed. 

The Woman. — The fetichists are, it is true, but 
few in number, but their state seems to me, my 
father, so &r removed from ours that I cannot 
conceive it possible to raise them rapidly to the 
level of the West, which is the final state. 

The Priest. — Though few in number, my daughter, 
they occupy in the centre of Africa a vast region, 
as yet wholly out of the reach of our civilization. 
For it to reach them, it will require a sustained effort 



THB LIFE. 365 

on the part of the priesthood of Positivism. The 
noble missionaries of our Mth will find in Africa 
the greatest stimulus to exert their intellect, and 
the fairest field for their active zeal. They will set 
themselves the task of spreading among the simple 
African populations the Universal religion. There 
will be no intermediate step, thej will not be re- 
quired to pass through either monotheism or even 
polytheism. That the success of the effort is pos- 
sible, is the consequence of the profound affinity 
between Positivism and Petichism. The difference 
in doctrine is that fetichism confuses activity and 
life, the difference in worship is that fetichism 
worships materials instead of products. 

In the initiation of man, whether it be sponta- 
neous or systematic, fetichism is the only form of 
the theological or fictitious regime which cannot be 
avoided. This is because both for the race and the 
individual it comes at a period when we are inca- 
pable of reflection. The other two preliminary 
phases, polytheism and monotheism, may be spared 
where the evolution is completely systematic. If 
we thought it an object to preserve our children 
from polytheism, we could do so by prolonging the 
fetichist state, till by gradual modifications it issued 
in Positivism. But in our children's case the 
effort would be uncalled for, not to speak of its 
tendency to disturb the natural development of 
the human imagination. The case is quite different 
with the evolution of the nations of central Africa. 
There the direct transformation of fetichism 



366 THIRD PABT. 

into Positivism would lead to most sound and 
valuable results, not merely for the AMcan tribes^ 
but for the whole of mankind. 

The Woman, — One last remark, my Neither, you 
must allow me on these vast intellectual and social 
metamorphoses, which give such an interest to the 
most extended relations of men, which have hitherto 
been always stained by selfishness and empiricism. 
I in no way share the barbarous prejudices of the 
white race against the black, yet I scarcely venture 
to hope that the universality of the Positive Mth 
will not be hampered to an indefinite extent by the 
difference of raca 

The Priest. — ^The true biological theory of the 
races of men, my daughter, is a consequence of the 
conception of Blainville. He represents their dif- 
ferences as varieties, which had their origin in the 
aggregate of circumstances, but which subsequently 
became fixed and hereditary when they had reached 
their greatest intensity. Adopting this view, we 
may subjectively construct a theory which shall 
meet the only difierences which the objective study of 
the question establishes. In reality, there are but 
three distinct races, the white, the yellow, and the 
black. 

Indeed, no essential and permanent difierences 
could be developed, except as regards the relative 
preponderance of the three essential constituents of 
the brain, its speculative, active, and afiective 
organs. We have then, of necessity, three races to 
correspond with these difierences. Each of the 



THE LIFE. 367 

three has its point of superiority. It is superior 
either in intellect, or in activity, or in feeling. 
This conclusion is confirmed hy all sound observa- 
tion. This final judgment must put an end to all 
mutual contempt. It must also make them see 
how efficacious their concert might be to complete 
the constitution of the real Great Being. 

When by our labours we shall have made our 
planet uniformly healthy, these organic distinctions 
will have a tendency to disappear, as a result partly 
of their natural origin, but especially of inter- 
marriage. The increasing fusion of the races will, 
under the systematic direction of the Universal 
priesthood, procure us the most precious of all im- 
provements, one which b^ars on the whole of our 
cerebral constitution, which will become by this 
means more adapted for thought, for action, and 
even for love. 



Contlusion. 



THE GENERAL HISTORY OF RELIGION. 



CONVERSATION XII. 

The Woman, — These two last conversations have 
a strong attraction for me, my £stther. During yovr 
explanation of ^e worship, the doctrine, and the 
life, I have often felt the want of historical know- 
ledge as a complement of that explanation. Even 
as it is, I could see, from time to time, that the 
final state, the state in which the religion of Hu- 
manity^ should be supreme, needed in all cases long 
and difficult preparation, and that such preparation 
was above all necessary in every case of original 
evolution. But partial glimpses such as these ex- 
cite, rather than satisfy, my desire to know the 
outlines of the historical theory by which you are 
able so to appreciate the past as to determine the 
future, in order to form a clear judgment on the 
present. 

The Priest. — The main foundation of this theory, 
my dear daughter, is the double law of mental 
evolution with which you are now familiar. You al- 
ready know how there follo^ from it the general divi- 



THE OEKESAL HISTOBY OF RELIGION. 369 

V 

sdon of the preparatory period of man's existence. 
The fii-st step was fetichism. The preparation was 
carried on by polytheism, it was completed under 
monotheism. It will be as well, however, before 
we proceed further, for you to concentrate your 
attention for a short time on this fundamental 
principle, to convince yourself that the course which 
at first seemed simply inevitable was really indis- 
pensable. 

Attend particularly to the necessity for the 
intellect of such a preparation ; this is a point les6 
clearly seen than any other. If every real theory 
necessarily rests on observation of £tcts, it is not 
less certain that any connected observation of facts 
is impossible without some theo^ or other. Origi- 
nally then the human mind could find no other outlet 
but a purely subjective method ; it must draw, that 
is, upon itself for the connexion which it could not 
get from without till after a long course of. study. 
In such a case, feeling supplies the weakness of our 
intelligence, and finds it a principle on which to 
explain every theory. It supposes all beings what- 
ever actuated by certain feelings, and instinctively 
it assimilates them to the type of man. This pri- 
mitive philosophy is necessarily fictitious, and as 
such merely provisional. It gives rise to a con- 
stant antagonism between theory and practice — an 
antagonism which underg6es gradual modifications 
from the increasing influence of our action on our* 
intellect, but which continues during the whole of 
the preparatory period. ^.Positivism alone can end 
* B F 



370 CONCLUSION, , 

it. At the same time that man, in his speculation, 
was attributing everything to arbitrary will, he 
was acting on the assumption of invariable laws. 
The knowledge of these laws, at first empirical, 
becam^ less and less so ; it became more and more 
extensive, till at length it reorganized our whole . 
intellectual system* 

The Woman, — Previous to this explanation, my 
father, I had not understood what purpose, philo- 
sophically, was answered ty fetichism. I had felt' its 
aptitude in regard to art. How it met our moral 
wants seems to require no explanation. Every one 
who has studied children to any purpose, or who 
has even been al^le to see through the accounts of 
travellers and form a true idea of savages, must 
look on the external support which the fetichist 
theory gives, as indispensable to us in our original 
weakness. The fictitious regime is still more adapted 
to develope in us tenderness. In this respect, it 
is only when Positivism has reached its full matu- 
rity that it can offer us an equivalent for the 
nurture of fetichism. Thus suited to our nature 
as individuals in its threefold aspect, the primeval 
religion must be no less adapted to our social ex- 
istence. There was, in the earliest stage of society, 
no other source from which it could draw the 
community of opinion or the authority which it 
requires. 

The Priest, — To complete our theory of this 
primary stage of our evolution, all I have to do, 
my daughter, is to point oAt the law which governs 



THE GENEBAL HISTORY' OP BEUOION. 371 

our temporal progress. In ifc, as in the spiritual, 
and for similar reasons, we see three distinct states 
succeed one another with a necessary succession. 
The first is simply provisional ; the second simply 
transitional; the third alone is definitive. vEach 
corresponds to a particular form of our activity. 
Man's existence is in fact originally warlike. It 
becomes ultimately completely industrial. But it 
passes through an intermefliate stage in which con- 
quest ceases and defensive war takes its place. 
Such clearly are the respective characteristics of 
the civilizations of antiquity, of modem society, and 
of the Middle Ages, which form the transition be- 
tween the two. 

In our action, as for our intellect, the course 
taken was the only one possible. For society to be 
strong and^ to develope itseli^ there must be labour. 
On the other hand, the development of labour im- 
plies the previous existence of society, just as much 
as the development of observation implies the exis- 
tence of some theory to give the impulse. We are in 
a circle then. And again we escape from our 
difficulty by a spontaneous evolution, which super- 
sedes the necessity of any complicated preparations. 
War is the only branch of action which fulfils this 
condition, from the natural preponderance of the 
instinct of destruction over that of construction. 
To produce great results, war requires the collec- 
tive action of large bodies. Hence it is peculiarly 
adapted to form strongly cemented and permanent 
associations, in which the sympathy is intense 
bb2 



372 CONCLUSION. 

though limited ifk extent. In war the sense of 
solidarity, of a common interest, is very strong. 
Lastly, it is only by war that can be effected the 
formation of large States by a gradual prftiess of 
incorporation. The result of incorporation is to 
confine, military activity to the ruling people, and 
to give it a higher character by giving it a noble 
destination. There is no other method generally 
applitoble^by which the aversion man at first feels 
for all regular labour can be overcome.' 

When the empire acquired by war has reached a 
certain limit, an instinctive change of policy takes 
place. !Qefence becomes a more important consi- 
deration than conquest. Thus we enter on the 
intermediate stage, on which, whilst war keeps its 
predominance, the foundations of industrial exis- 
tence are laid. And the industrial form of society is 
soon seen to be the only one susceptible of unin- 
terrupted progress. 

The Womcm, — I find, my father, man's progress 
in the sphere of action easier to master than liis 
intellectual growth. But I am surprised at your 
thinking that the two combined afford a sufficient 
basis for your theory of history. True, there is a 
natural correspondence between them. The fic- 
titious synthesis harmonizes with war, as Positive 
religion harmonizes with industry. I can even see 
that metaphysics would naturally prevail whilst 
war was in the main defensive. Still, this dyna- 
mical conception of Humanity seems to me hardly 
in consonance with the statical conception of our 



THE GENERAL HISTORY OP RELIGION.* 373 

nature, for this places feelms above both the 
intellect and oiur action. After the two laws of 
our spiritual evolution, and afiber the Jaw which 
goverm our temporal evolution; I expected a «tat&- 
ment of the law^ which govern our affective life. 
Without it, motion and existence are to me equally 
unintelligible. \ 

The Priest,— Ygm. forget, my daughter, that the 
affective region of the brain is not, as the two 
others are, in direct conmiunication with the\)uter 
world. So that the out^r world cannot act on feel- 
ing, except through the medium of the intellect or 
action* It is true, that the organs of affection are im- 
mediately connected with the viscera of of^anic life. 
But the moral influence of th^se last, to say nothing 
of its depending on laws imperfectly known, is 
only of importance within the range of our private 
existence. When we come to consider society, we 
may neglect it And on this ground : its action iti 
neutralized as the spontaneous result of the opposite 
forms it takes, either in any one generation, or in 
the succession of ge(nerations. 

Our opinions then and our situations constitute 
the only normal sources of the variation in our 
feelings which we experience in the different phases 
of man's evolution, especially of his social evolu- 
tion. But the general course of these variations, 
indirect though they, be, harmonizes, it must be re- 
membered, with that of the direct changes on which 
they depend. To sum up the result of the evolu- 
tion of our intellect and of our aotivity, we may 



374 * CONCLUSION. 

t 

consider that they make us intelleciually more syn- 
thetical, in action more disposed to co-operation* 
Similarly^ wit^ regard to the evolution of our affec- 
tions, it chiefly consists in ^ our becoming more sym- 
pathetic. As the essential characteristic of human 
existence is unity, the prevailing direction of onr 
progress must be towards developing the harmony 
of the race. Thus the whole history of Humanity 
is necessarily condensed in the history of ^religion. 
The general law of man's progress, whatever the 
point of view chosen, consists in this, that man 
becomes more and more religious. Such is the 
ultimate result of dynamical conceptions, which are 
thus seen to be in perfect consonance with statical 
The education of the race, as that of the individual^ 
is the gradual training of man to live for others. 

The Womcm. — By this last explanation, my 
father, I am clear from all serious difficulty as to 
the theory of evolution, which is the basis of 
the true philosophy of history. You may proceed 
then at once to explain in outline the principal 
phases in the existence of Humanity. 

The Priest. — To make the study easier, I would 
urge you, my daughter, to consult frequently the 
two tables I subjoin. {See ToMea DD,atthe end of 
the volume, taken from the ^^ Appeal to ConserwUives.'* 
Parley 1855.) 

The first point that will strike you will, be the 
entire absence of any notice of fetichism. And yet 
this was the primeval state, and it still exists in 
vast populations. The omission is inevitable, in 



t 

THE GENERAL HISTOBT OF BEUOION. 375 

consequence of the concrete character of our sy- 
noptical -view. As such it cannot include a phasis 
of our history in which no one arose who has left 
a name. The fetichist state can only receive its 
due honour in our abstract system of worship. You 
are aware how fully we shall discharge the debt. 
The chief intellectual value of fetichism is this. It 
spontaneously originates the stibjective method. 
That m^^thod, in its primary absolute form^ presided 
over the whole of the preparatory period. In its 
relative form it will exercise (ncreasing influence 
over man in his normal state. I The true logic, that 
in which feelings take precedence of images and 
signs, is of fetichist origin. There are times when 
some strong emotion impels us to seek for the 
causes of phenomena, the lai^s of which we know 
not, in order first to foresee and then to modify the 
phenomena. At such times we attri])ute directly 
to the beings with which we are concerned human 
affections; we do not look on them as subject to the 
action of some external '^L We see then that 
fetichism is a more natural state than polytheism. 

The great moral efficacy of fetichism is beyond 
dispute. Everywhere it instinctively puts forward 
man as the type. It inspires us with a deep sym- 
pathy for all forms of existence, even where there is 
the least action, for it represents all forms as essen- 
tially analogous to our own. And therefore it is 
that this primal state of humanity is the object 
of a keener regret than any other in those who 
have been rudely torn from it. This is a &ct 



376 f COKOLUSION. 

which we may verify by daily experience in the 
unhappy Africans, who are carried to a distance 
ftY>m their homes by the cruelty of Western nations. 

Even from the social point of yiew, and this is 
less favourable to fetichism, it has rendered- im-* 
portant services, which the Positive worship will 
duly honour. In the nomad period of man's ex« 
istence, its tendency to the worship of external 
nature exerts a wholesome moderating influence on 
the destructive instinct. That instinct works 
blindly, and leads the hunter or the pastoral tribes 
to destroy on a vast scale the animals or vegetables 
in order to prepare the ground for man's action. 
Such destruction is necessary, but should not be 
without check. But the highest service rendered 
by fetichism is, its unconscious guidance of the race 
through the first social revolution, the revolution 
which is the basis of all subseijuent ones, our tran- 
sition fr^m the nomad to settled life. This great 
change, of which we but little see either the dif- 
ficulty or the importance, certainly belongs to 
fetichism, and is the consequence of the deep attach- 
ment it fosters for our native land. 

The chief imperfection of fetichism is, that not 
till a late period does it allow the rise of a priest- 
hood qualified to direct man's future progress. The 
worship of fetichism, even when highly developed, 
requires at first no priest. For it is, by its nature 
essentially a private worship; each one may wor- 
ship without a mediator beings which are almost 
always within his reacL Ultimately, however, a 



THE GENERAL HI8T0BY OF RELIGION. 



377 



priesthood arises. This is when the stars, which 
axe long without honour, come to be the principal 
fetiches, and, as such, common to vast populations. 
They iire sieen to be beyond our reach. Hence a 
special class is formed whose duties are to transmit 
the homage of men, and to interpret the will of the 
fetiches. In this its last stage, fetichism borders 
on polytheism, the origin of which in all cases was 
astrolatry. This is clear from the names of the 
greater gods, which are dlways borrowed from the 
stars most adapted to/ perpetuate the fictity>us 
synthesis. / 

ITie Woman, — ^Although the passage from one 
qrstem to the other cost no effort, it seems to me, 
my father, the most difficult change for man's in- 
tellect in the preparatory period. It requires us 
to pass by an abrupt .transition from activity to 
inertia in our general conception of matter, otherwise 
there would be no motive for the exertion of divine 
power. 

The Priest, — It 14 however, my daughter, a na- 
tural step to introduce the agency of beings external 
to matter. The mind takes this step spontaneously 
when it reaches the second period of childhood and 
passes from the contemplation of beings to that of 
events, the only basis for scientific meditations. 
Proceeding onwards, on the method originally 
adopted, we consider phenomena as existing simul- 
taneously in many bodies, and we still attribute 
them to a will. But we do not identify each body 
with a separate will, rather we consider that one 



378 CONCLUSIOK. 

will directs many bodies. Such a will mnst of 
necessity be external. We must £a,miliarize our- 
selyes with this intellectual change. Nor is this 
difficult, as we have frequent opportunities of 
observing it at the corresponding period in the 
growth of each individual mind. 

Be this as it may, polytheism has been the prin- 
cipal agent in the whole preparation of man. This 
is true of his mental evolution, but especially true 
of his social. In the first place polytheism alone 
gims completeness to the primitive philosophy by 
eirtending it to our highest functions. These func- 
tions shortly become the ^eivourite occupation of the 
gods. For fetichism in the main had reference to 
the external world, and could not distinctly com- 
prehend our intellectual and moral nature. On the 
contrary, these were the source from which it drew 
its explanations of physical fsicts. Bat when we 
introduce supernatural beings we can adapt them 
to this new sphere, and it soon becomes the chief 
one. At the same time polytheism necessitates a 
priesthood in the strict sense, or rather it consoli- 
dates and developes the priesthood which astrolatry 
had originated. 

Polytheism offers a variety of forms, but in all 
its forms alike we can trace two institutions, which 
have a close connexion with one another. These 
are : the complete union of the spiritual and tem- 
poral powers, and the slavery of the industrial 
population. 

The first is eaaly explained. It was the sponta- 



THE OENEBAL HISTORY OF RELIGION. 379 

n^otis result of all the requirements of the intellect, 
and all the wants, of society. In the first place^ it 
is impossible to limit yourself to giving advice if 
you speak in the name of a power that has no 
limits. The suggestions of such a power naturally 
become commands. In the second place, the ap* 
pointed task of the preliminary regime was to 
develope all man's powers j it was reserved for the 
fiboial state wisely to regulate them when developed, 
on a comprehensive view of this long apprentice- 
ship. In the preparatory period then, there nwist 
be a concentration of all the powers of society, in 
order to overcome the indiscipline natural to man 
in his primitive state. Had the spiritual and 
temporal powers been separated, such separation 
would have been a great hindrance to the attain- 
ment of the object of polytheism, by thwarting 
the progr*s of conquest. For the function of 
polytheism was active. Lastly, the scientific concep- 
tions of men were so alien to their practical views, 
that to neutralize the defects of both, it was 
requisite that both should equally influence the 
intellect of all. On the other hand, this indispen- 
sable concentration was eflfected quite instinctively. 
This is shown by the inability to conceive a real 
separation of counsel from command which we can 
trace even in the philosophers who were most pre- 
pared to admit such an idea. 

A similar remark is applicable. to slavery in the 
ancient world. It waa always considered necessary 
to society, till a period just previous, to the final 



S80 doNGLUSIOK. 

emanoipatioiL The slave, as we are renmided by 
the etymology of the Latin name, was at first a 
prisoner of war, saved to labour, instead of being 
killed or eaten. 

Polytheism is a conciliatory system, and the slave 
oonld keep his own worship, in subordination of 
course to the religion of his conqueror, who became 
his spiritual and temporal leader. The social con- 
dition of the slave, to which all were more or less 
liable by the vicissitudes of war, was at that time 
so iiatuial that men often accepted it without being 
taken in war ; as a general rule, however, war was 
the origin of slavery. 

The institution of slavery was in two ways the 
basis of ancient civilization. Without it, conquest 
on a large scale was impossible Secondly, it ao- 
customed men to labour. For laboxur was the only 
way in which the slave could better his^sition, as 
it had been the condition on which he had been 
given his life. Under all these aspects it is impos- 
jiible to compare the slavery of antiquity with the 
ephemeral and monstrous form of it which is a 
consequence of modem colonization. 

The Woman. — ^Afber this general survey of the 
r^ptma of polytheism I need, my father, a summary 
of the principal forms in which it existed. 

The Priest. — ^Its primary and most charac- 
teristic form, my daughter, is theocracy pro- 
perly so called. The conservative polytheism 
to which we give this name is the only complete 
organization possible in the preparatory period of 



THE QENERAIi HISTOBT OF RELIGION. 381 

man's existence. All the other phases of poly- 
theism are but modifications of this primitiYe 
system ; from it they draw such partial consistency 
as they have^ though their tendency is to break it up. 

Theocracy rests on two institutions which are 
closely connected with each other. All professions 
equally are hereditary ; this is the first ; the uni- 
versal suprecil^y of the priestly caste is the second. 
Without the fi^t, the progress made would soon be 
lost. Nor is th^re any other system which could 
allow the slow ii^troduction of secondaiy modifica- 
tions; so long, that is, as education was given rather 
by means of imitatio|i than by direct instruction, 
from there being' no separation between theory and 
practice. Hereditary professions then were neces- 
sary; but the whole population would have been 
broken up into castes completely independent one of 
another, had not the supremacy of the priesthood 
been there to organize the state. It bound all castes 
together with a bond which they revered, one 
which was naturally susceptible of a wide extensioi^ 

This primitive theocratic constitution is so com- 
pletely in accordance with our nature, that it is 
still the organization of the largest existing popu-^ 
lations, though it has been subjected to disturbing 
influences of the greatest magnitude. It was uni- 
versally adopted. But it could only attain such 
durability in countries where the development of 
intelligence and industry had preceded that of the 
warlike spirit. Systematic military activity acts in 
all cases as a spontaneous solvent of theocracy, for 



382 coNCLusioy. 

it places the soldier above the priest. The priests 
made great efforts to avert this result by directing 
the military energy on distant expeditions, the 
invariable consequent of which was a permanent 
colonization. Still, notwithstanding this policy, 
the theocracy in all cases succumbed to the dominion 
of a military patriciate, but in succumbing it 
preserved the old manners' and customs. That it 
could ,do this is convincing evidence of the 
tenacious character of the regime, and by virtue of 
it we have at the present day actual theocracies to 
study. And the study of them in China and India, 
even though far advanced in decay, enables us to 
have a better understanding of ancient Egypt, the 
venerable mother of the civilization of Western 
Europe. We are enabled to appreciate, on a large 
scale, the social office of the priesthood in its 
manifold forms, as called upon to counsel, to con- 
secrate, to moderate, and to judge. And we may 
also see at the same time to what an extent the 
exercise of these its fundamental attributes was 
vitiated by command and wealth, though the 
assumption of power and the possession of wealth 
were necessary accompaniments of the first inter- 
ference of the intellect in the domain of feelin» 
and action. 

It will naturally surprise you that the theocratic 
system finds so small a place in the synopsis I have 
given you. The chief reason, as in the case of 
fetichism, is the concrete character of this histo- 
rical composition it is more within the province of 



THE GENERAL HISTOBY OF BELIGItx)^. 385 

art than of science. Still, when dealing witii^ to 
system which has lefb so many memorials of alH^ 
kinds, a more detailed explanation is required. I 
would call your attention, then, to one of the 
noblest characteristics of tl^e true theocracy. It is a 
system in which the government is vested in a vast 
and permanent corporatioii ; so that the services it 
renders society are not coniected with the names of 
individuals. Had there i^t been this tendency to 
absorb the individual, the; various priestly colleges 
would often have been disturbed by the natural 
rivalries of the gods of polytheism. In one case, 
happily a solitary exception, theocracy is based on 
monotheism. In this c$se, that of the Jews, an 
extreme concentration jfchrows forward into full 
light the names of the inbre eminent leaders. Thus 
it was that the cdJui^ character of my synopsis 
forced me to choose MosW as the individual type 
of the theocratic regirnei though but a very im* 
perfect representative (Qf an organization which is 
essentially polytheistic. 

The Woman. — ^Your thoughtful and dispassionate 
admiration for theocracy shows me more clearly, my 
father, how profoundly unfair are the blind re- 
proaches it yet meets with from men who claim to 
be advanced thinkers. Listen to them, and you 
would think the primeval organization from which 
all others spring, and which has outlasted all others, 
was in all its stages an oppressive and degrading 
system. If so, it would <jbe difficidt to see to what 
we are to trace the progress which has been made. 




OOirCSLUSIOK. 

itvtfhe FrieH. — ^Yon may troat all soiih criticisins of 
lieocracy, my daughter, as frivolous. They are as 
groundless as the reproaches levelled by St. Angostin 
against the whole system of piii^ytheism, or the 
attacks of Voltaire on Catholicism^^ No system 
ever deserved such blame except in its decay. For 
a system to rise and be generally adcmted, it must 
during the greater part of the period of its supre- 
macy be to a considerable extent in agreement 
with our nature, and fax from un&vourable to our 
progress. 

The tendency of theocracy to become oppressive, 
from its aversion to all change, is one which is only 
developed in its latest stage, as the consequence of 
the inevitable degradation of the priestly character 
resulting from their power and wealth. But after 
all, the aversion to change in theocracy has been 
considerably exaggerated. Theocracy has been 
judged by the contrast in this respect offered by 
the greater rapidity of the Western movement. 
Quite apart from any external inteiference, there 
are many decisive indications of a spontaneous 
movement in the theocratic civilizations. For in- 
stance, Bouddhism, though crushed in Hindostan, 
in Thibet led to very great modifications of the 
theocratic system. These were developed in China 
by the adoption of Vsystem of examinationa 

When Positivism reaches in due course tbese 
immense populations, then will be the time carefully 
to investigate the question : what would naturally 
have been the series of advances by which, if left 



THE GENEBAL HISTORY OF BELIGIOK. 385 

to themselves, they wo^d have ultimately risen to 
the level of the Westi Such a progression weiild 
have been distinct from, but substantially identical 
with, that of the West. It will be necessary to 
examine their instinctive tendencies, for it is with 
ihem that, if we are wise, we must connect any 
attempt at a systematic acceleration of their pro- 
gress. And we must carefully eliminate from our 
inquiry all the elements of disturbance forcibly in- 
troduced by the Mussulman monotheism in the first 
place, and at a later period by the Christian. This 
important question, then, is left for future consi- 
deration. For the present we must concentrate our 
historical studies on the immediate ancestors of 
Western civilization, and we are naturally led to 
select for examination the populations in which the 
establishment of theocracy was anticipated by a 
precocious 'development of military activity. 

Polytheism, in its progressive period, appears 
under two very different forms, the one mainly 
intellectual, the other eminently social. Polytheism 
takes an intellectual character when, owing to local 
and political circumstances, war, although very 
general, leads to no system of conquest. In such a 
case, it exerts a secret influence on all the higher 
minds which leads them to cultivate their intellects. 
This is also the direction which the attention of 
men generally has taken, and thus the cultivation 
is free from all priestly sacerdotal discipline. When, 
on the contrary, there is no check on war, and it is 
fr§e to follow out its tendency to universal empire, 

^' CO 



386 CONOLUSIOK. 

the intellect becomes sabordiiiate to action, and the 
citizen, as a rule, is absorbed in social questions 
relative to his own state or to foreign policy. 
These two forms of progressive polytheism were, 
each according to its nature and each in its own 
time, equally indispensable to the great movement 
in the Western world, which followed on the spon- 
taneous throwing off the yoke of theocracy. 

Ultimately, in every theocracy, the priestly caste 
becomes socially subordinate to the warrior caste. 
Even in Judea, spite of its exceptional concentra- 
tion of power, theocracy had to submit to this 
change. The kings took the place of the judges, 
six centuries from the organization of the theocracy. 
But we must carefully distinguish the cases, in 
which this change is not effected till after the theo- 
cratic spirit has gained a firm hold, from those in 
which the change is effected sooner, and the theo- 
cracy is consequently never really strong. The 
evolution of Western Europe took place mainly 
under this latter condition ; the soldier antici- 
pated the priest ; it required, however, for its suc- 
cess a judicious introduction of ideas borrowed 
from pure theocracies. 

The times sung by llomer mark distinctly the 
beginning of the series of movements which have 
resulted in Western civilization. Two generations, 
at the most, had elapsed since the warrior caste had 
begun to take precedence of the priests among our 
Grecian ancestors. The primeval theocracy can 
yet be traced in the numerous oracles, respect for 



THE GENERAL HISTORY OP RELIGION. 387 

which, though they were dispersed, lasted longer in 
Gi^ece than anywhere else. 

The Womcm, — Dating from this era in the West, 
you told me, my father, that our progress has been, 
in reality, but an immense transition, during which 
any real organization was impracticable. It is easy 
to see the accuracy of such a view. We have but to 
contrast the shorfc duration of the several states of 
society, which henceforth follow in rapid succession 
one on the other, with the persistence of their pre- 
decessor, the theocracy which arose out of fetichism ; 
or, on the other hand, with the magnificent future 
that awaits Positivism. Still I should like now 
to follow the general outline of this transition. 

The Priest. — The transitional, or preparatory 
period, accurately represented by our concrete sy- 
nopsis, must be viewed, my daughter, as must the 
system of human nature, in reference first to the 
intellect, then to the action, finally to the feeling 
of man. In the primitive theocracy these three 
phases of our existence were cultivated simultane- 
ously, and the existence was thus brought under 
a complete system of rules. But however com- 
plete, such a system was not fiivourable to progress. 
And yet so true is it that this discipline was the only 
one admissible under the theological regime^ that 
it was impossible to find any durable substitute for 
it so long as the fictitious synthesis lasted. To 
quicken the rate of progress, it was necessary to 
break up the harmony, in order to develope in suc- 
cession each part of man's nature at the expense of 
cc 2 



388 CONCLUSION. 

the two others. Hence the marked character of 
incompleteness, traceable equally in the intellectual 
cYolution of Greece, in the social action of Rome, 
in the affective discipline of the Catholic-feudal 
period. These three partial evolutions succeed one 
another in an order which is at once seen to be a 
consequence of their common destination. The first 
object was to detelope all the powers of our nature. 
Any attempt at their discipline was premature, ex- 
cept so far as discipline was a consequence of their 
spontaneous antagonism. And the only effect of such 
a premature attempt would have been a return to 
theocracy. For theocracy was always imminent, 
and to return to it was to prevent the partial 
development desirei You see then how it was, 
that feeling, the chief source of human discipline, 
was for a long time neglected, and how its supre- 
macy could not be recognised till science and action 
should have made sufficient advance. For the free 
play of all our powers, it was necessary that intel- 
ligence should precede action. The tendency of action 
was to unite all the progressive polytheists in one 
empire. Such an union would have been incom- 
patible with the full liberty required for our intel- 
lectual growth. That growth then must precede, 
as was actually the case, the development of our 
activity. 



THE GENERAL HISTOBT OF BELIGION. 389 

CONVERSATION XIII. 

GENERAX HISTORY OF RELIGION — continued. 

> 

The Womom, — Our last conversation lias shown 
me, my fether, the three great periods of transition 
through which we have necessarily passed since the 
Homeric times. I understand also their order of 
succession. But I still need a clearer understanding 
of the course of each and the connexion of the three, 
beginning with the Greek evolution. 

The Priest — ^The Greek period is one of im- 
perishable brilliancy. But, my daughter, if you 
place Greece and Rome side by side, and judge them 
by the standard of the influence each civilization 
had on .'its respective nation, you will regret that 
the contrast is unfavourable to Greece. In Roman 
history we are in contact with a constructive 
system, the work of the nation, in which all the 
citizens must take an active part, or the failure 
would be complete. In Greece the people is, in 
the main, passive. It forms a kind of pedestal for 
some few thinkers of real eminence. Their number 
is not above one hundred, in art, in philosophy, in 
science, from Homer and Hesiod to Ptolemy and 
Galen. In Rome a high degree of common action 
stamps the whole nation with a character of nobility, 
and the traces of that character are yet distin- 
guishable. In Greece the monstrous predominance 
of speculation over action led to the degradation of 
the people, which was sacrificed to it. And here 



390 COKCLUSION. 

again the effects are yet quite traceable. In their 
last stage, the Greeks considered the Acuities of 
expression as the paramount object. It was their 
conquest by Borne that alone preserved the Greek 
cities from suc(^mbing to the tyranny of ^bme 
despicable rhetorician. 

There is but one fme period in the social ex* 
istence of these tribes which have been the object 
of such excessive admiration. Its duration was 
scarcely two centuries. Even during that time 
there were constant interruptions from their 
wretched internal disputes. The period I mean 
was that of their admirable struggle with the 
Persian empire. Defensive at the outset^ the 
war became ultimately (tensive. The issue was 
to vindicate from all forcible oompression on the 
part of the Persian theocracy the sixiall band of free 
thinkers, on whose existence depended, at the time, 
the intellectual destinies of Humanity. And even 
in this struggle the success is mainly due to some 
few citizens of pre-enbin^it merit. The several States 
constantly showed themselves ready to sacrifice the 
national defence to their mutual jealousies. 

This long process of intelleotual elaboration is 
divided into three periods of unequal length. Each 
of them is faithfully rq>resented in our calendar. 
The movement began with fat, and Homer is for 
all time the representative of art. It was natural 
that poetry, as at once by nature more independent 
of and yet more fettered by theocracy, should be 
the first to separate &om the parent stem, and lead 



THE GENERAL HISTORY OF RELIGION. 391 

the way in the emancipation of the Western world. 
Poetry made the way clear for philosophy. In 
Thales and Pythagoras we have the first rudiments, 
but the incomparable Aristotle is its genuine re-' 
pres&ntative. He was so far abovi^ his age that it 
was not till the Middle Ages that he' could be 
appreciated. The value of his philosophical elabo- 
ration is imperishable, and the results obtained 
were so definitive as to force on all true thinkers 
the conviction that the limit Aristotle had reached 
could not be passed without a long Scientific pre- 
paration. The aim of suoh preparation should be 
the development of mathematics, as the primary 
basis of Positive philosophy. Under this convic- 
tion, the genius of the Greeks directed its chief 
attention to practical science, and this finds an 
admirable representativ^in Archimedes. The ca- 
pacity of the Greeks for art and their philosophical 
power had been irreparably exhau»bed. 

The Woman, — ^I have always found it easier, my 
&ther, to understand the Boman period of the pre- 
paratory regime. This is owing to the homogeneous 
and strongly marked character which distinguishes 
Bome*s ^adual march to universal empire. Bos- 
suet's UnwerBol History contains some brilliant 
remarks on this point, and I have long known 
them. The policy of Eome stands out so clear that 
Yirgil could embody it in a few matchless lines, which 
were once explained to me. (J^a. vi. 847 — B65,) 
Directly they bear only <m. Bome's action on other 
nations, yet in reading th^ju we feel how intimate 



392 COKCLUBIOK. 

the connexion i» between that foreign action ajid 
Rome's internal constitution. 

The PrieaL — ^All you have to do, my daughter, 
is to complete your general idea of Rome's action 
by distinguishing two main periods in her history. 
Prior to the period when the incorporation of the 
greater part of Western Europe was effected, the 
direction of the warlike energies of Rome was na- 
turally in the hands of the senatorial caste. Strong 
in its theocratic ascendancy, the senate found in the 
common efforts a sufficient check on the jealousy of 
the plebeians. But this order of things, based upon 
war, was destined to undergo a change when the 
Roman dominion became so extended and so con- 
solidated that it no longer absorbed the attention of 
the Roman people. The emperors then stood 
forwaid as the true representatives of that people, 
its protectors against the tyranny of the patricians. 
At the very time that Virgil expressed the policy 
of Rome, the best representative of which is the 
great Dictator, the incomparable Caesar, that policy 
was undergoing, unknown to the poet, this decisive 
change, the first symptom of its inevitable decline. 

These two periods of nearly equal length were, 
one of ihem eminently progressive, the other essen- 
tially conservative. Both equally have had a power- 
M social influence on the whole preparation of 
Western Europe. To the first we owe the salutary 
dominion which everywhere put a stop to froitlesB 
and yet continuous wars. To the second we owe, 
in the civil order, the benefits attendant on inoor- 



THE GENERAL HISTORY OP RELIGION. 393 

poration into one political whole, benefits greatly- 
dependent on the uniform propagation of the Greek 
intellectnal moTement. Rome conquered Greece, 
but she always paid her a noble tribute, and de- 
Toted her own influence to spread the results of 
Greek art, of Greek philosophy, and Greek science, 
which, unless so disseminated, would not have ful- 
filled their highest purpose: 

Thus had finally been effected a junction between 
the two last movements peculiar to antiquity, the one 
intellectual, the other social. After this combina- 
tion, the preparatory stage of man's existence na- 
turally set towards the last of its necessary phases. 
Theoretically and practically, our intellect and 
activity had been developed. There soon came the 
consciousness of the need of some discipline. A 
species of spontaneous discipline was a natural con- 
sequence of having an end in view, however tem- 
porary that end might be. But that end attained, 
all discipline was over. The intellect, and the heart 
fell a prey to an unparalleled dissipation, and the 
treasures accumulated by the thought and labour of 
man were wasted in the ignoble gratification of un- 
controlled selfishness. At the time when regenera- 
tion was becoming iudispensable, it seemed to have 
a systematic basis laid for it. The whole ante- 
cedent history of Greece and Bome seen).ed to 
furnish that basis, by a combination of the intel- 
lectual superiority of monotheism with the tendency 
of society towards an universal religion. 

It was to satisfy this great want of some complete 



394 CONCLUSION, 

discipline that Catholicism rose. Its success was 
due to the impulse given by the incomparable 
St, Paul, a fact a£ yet too little recognised. In his 
sublime self-abnegation he facilitated the pro- 
gress of the new^ unity, by aoceptiilg a founder 
who had no real claim. But Catholicism is pro- 
foundly self-contradictory, and thus, even at its 
birth, there were evidences that this last transi- 
tional state would be less permanent and less 
extensive than its predecessors. For to attain its 
chief end, it was necessary to effect a radical 
separation of the spiritual from the temporal power. 
It is true, such a separation was the spontaneous 
result of a position in which monotheism was 
slowly making way under the political supremacy 
of polytheism. Not the less, however, is this 
division of the temporal and spiritual powers at all 
times incompatible with the absolute character of 
theology. For theology, and this is especially true 
of its concentrated form, monotheism, only allows 
its priesthood to con£ne itself to counsel when it 
cannot exercise command. 

That Catholicism is thus necessarily contradic- 
tory may be best seen by taking two general points of 
contrast, the one social, the other intellectual. And 
firstly, the only possible foundation for human dis- 
cipline was, at that time, a future state. Hence 
the doctrine of a future life acquired^ in the hands 
of the new priesthood, a £sj: greater importance 
than it had ever before had, even in Judea. Tke 
priesthood found in it the exclusive domain it 



THE GENERAL HISTORY OF RELIGION. 395 

needed. But a religion constitated on iMs basis 
was incompetent to guide practical life, for every 
believer was diverted from hid duty as a social 
being, and urged to a solitary asceticism. In the 
second place, the schism between theoiy and 
practice, concealed and even atoned for whilst the 
temporal and spiritual powers remained concen- 
trated, became prominent on their separation. 
Monotheism by its concentration drew out more 
strongly the inherent opposition between arbitrary 
will and immutable laws. 

Aristotle had skilfully invented a scheme by 
which the two might be reconciled, but his method 
was only available at a later period when the 
Positive spirit should be advancing towards its final 
ascendancy, though still under the guardianship of 
theology. 

If we combine the two points above given, we 
need not be surprised that Catholicism was long 
rejected by the most eminent philosophers and 
statesmen of the E.oman empire. They looked 
upon it as purely retrograde. These great chie& 
had been gradually {H'epared, from the time of 
Scipio and Csesar, for the direct advent of the 
kingdom of Humanity, in which the Positive spirit 
and the industrial life should be paramount. They 
^dledto see that one more preparatory phase of 
society, which dbould essentially have reference 
to feeling, was needed to introduce the final rigime, 
and that the results of that phase would be a two- 
fold emancipation, the peculiar work of the 



396 CONCLUSION. 

Middle Ages, the emancipation of women and the 
emancipation of the industrial classes. 

The Womcm, — ^When you attribute these great 
results to Catholicism, you seem to me, my father, 
to do so with the view of bringing out more clearly 
their historical filiation, by representing them as 
the possible effects of the old system under the 
impulse of the new religion. But their attainment 
was greatly aided and even accelerated by the in- 
fluence of feudalism. Catholicism once had my 
belief, and it shall always have my respect. I c^jild 
never, however, prevent n^yself from secretly pre- 
ferring Chivalry. The noble motto which embodies 
the feelings of chivalry, I hear proclaimed et^en 
in the sixteenth century : Fais ce que doisyktdoienne 
que pourra. Do thy duty, come what may. 

The Priest — ^Tou are right, my daughter, as to 
the respective merits of the two systems ; and I 
need but complete your view, by showing you that 
feudalism, erroneously attributed to the German 
invasions, was in reality the necessary consequence 
of the Koman empire, which in its later period had 
a natural tendency towards the feudal organization. 
The wide extension of the Eroman empire speedily 
substituted defence for conquest. This is the great 
change, of which the two other characteristics of 
the Middle Ages are the necessary result. On the 
one hand, we have the gradual substitution of 
serfage for slavery, when as a natural consequence 
of the cessation of foreign conquests the slave* 
market was confined within, the limits of the Roman 



THE GENERAL HISTOBY OP RELIGION. 397 

iworld. On the other hand, we have a gradually 
increasing dissolution of the central power, and the 
su.'bstitution of local governments, each charged 
wdth its share in the common defence. The 
hierarchical subordination of these governments 
i^SLB what constituted feudalism in the strict sense 
of the word. All that Catholicism did was to 
sanction these three political tendencies by recom- 
mending peace, emancipation, and submission. 
Catholicism at that time was the fit exponent of 
the feelings called forth by the position of affairs 
in Western Europe. This we may allow without 
attributing it to its doctrine, a doctrine which, at a 
later period, sanctioned dispositions of an entirely 
opposite nature, and sanctioned them by virtue of 
its vagueness and anti-social tendencies. 

Catholicism contributed far less than feudalism 
to the abolition of slavery in Europe. The move- 
ment began in the towns and subsequently extended 
to the country. Neither did Catholicism contribute 
as powerful an aid as feudalism to the emancipation 
of women. In this respect we owe it the initial 
step, purity ; the final step, tenderness, is in no way 
due to Catholicism, but to chivalry. Throughout 
the Greek Church, Christianity still sanctions the 
seclusion of women and serfage ; and the only at- 
tempts at due modifications proceed from the Czars. 
Ths Woman. — I am prepared, my father, to 
accept this general estimate of the Middle Ages. 
It remains for me to learn the chief divisions of 
this last organic period of transition. 



398 COKCLUSIOK. 

The Priest. — ^We may divide it, my daughter, by 
the two systems of defensiye wars, on which the 
attention of the West was naturally oonoentrated, 
whilst the great social revolution which I have 
just explained was in process of gradual accom- 
plishment. The first period begins with the 
opening of the fifth, and ends with the close of the 
seventh century. It is occupied by the first great 
settlement of the barbarians. In that settlement, 
where, that is, the conditions of the invasion 
permitted its final success, we can trace all the 
characteristics of the Middle Ages^th the excep- 
tion of language. In this first period independence 
was the primary object ; concert was of secondary im- 
portance. The second period is of equal length, 
from the eighth to the tenth century. In it, the 
paramount want was concentration. The object 
was to repel the invasions of fresh tribes, and to 
secure from further disturbance the settlement 
effected. 

The tribes who had effected it had shown them- 
selves fit for incorporation into Western Europe, 
by the care with which they had been converted 
fr^m polytheism to Catholicism. The action of 
Europe then in this period was collective, under 
the guidance of the Oarlovingian princes, and 
especially under the dictatorship of the incom- 
parable Charlemagne. The work of Charlemagne 
found men worthy to complete it in the German 
Emperors. 

Thus was founded the republic of Western 



THE OENEBAL HlffTORT OF BELIGION. I 399 

i. 

Europe. The earlier association, originating iir^the 
forcible incorporation effected by Eome, now 
assumed a new form. It became the voluntary 
association of independent States, whose only bond 
of union was a common spiritual organization, 
centred in the person of the Pope. Even at its 
commencement this change had a tendency, not- 
withstanding the influence of the Church and 
political associations, to form a new centre for the 
whole system, and to substitute Paris for Rome. 

By the end of the Middle Ages the choice had 
been irrevocably made. The central situation of 
Paris was more adapted to meet the requirements 
of European society. It was during this second 
period that the East experienced a vast convulsion. 
The reaction of that convulsion was deeply felt ^y 
the whole of the Western world. Its first effect 
was to prolong the existence of the Catholic-feudal 
T^me. Later, it gave the first impulse to its 
irreparable dissolution. 

The want of a really universal religion had been 
long felt by the greater part of the white race, 
not excepting that portion of it which, though 
adjacent to the Koman empire, had not fallen under 
the power of Rome. Universality had been 
claimed by Catholicism, and the claim is at once 
the chief merit of the system and the soundest 
test by which to try it. N'o theological system can 
make good the claim. Universality is the exclusive 
apanage of Positivism. Monotheism, however, is 
nearer its attainment than polytheism. For poly- 



400 COKCLUSION. 

theism was always essentially national^ thougb. 
perfectly compatible with the incorporation by war. 
Monotheism, on the contrary, may be the rallying- 
point for nations quite independent of one another, 
though it has never practically been so except in 
Western Europe, in the medieval period. It was 
natural then that the East should aspire to a 
monotheistic belief, one however which should be 
entirely incompatible with that adopted by the 
West, in consequence of its different social 
destination. 

In fact, the chief function of Islamism was to 
direct the warlike development of another noble 
portion of the white race, which aimed in its tura 
at becoming the central population of Humanity. 
Hence it was necessary for Islamism to fuse, as of 
ol3, the spiritual and temporal powers. Nay, it 
even gave greater force to the fusion, by its mono- 
theistic concentration. Thus become more consonant 
with the natural genius of theology, monotheism 
was enabled, and even required, in the East, to 
simplify its doctrine to a degree unattainable in 
the West. For, in Europe, the factitious separa- 
tion of the two powers had compelled St. Paul, 
the real founder of Catholicism, to complicate its 
doctrinal system. In common with every form of 
monotheism, he had adopted a basis of revelation ; he 
was driven to add to that basis the doctrine of the 
divinity of Christ, the reputed founder of Catholi- 
cism. This led to other secondary complications. 
It is the boast of Islamism that it rejected all 



THE GENERAL HISTOBY OF RELIGION. 401 

equally, in order the better to secure the predomi- 
nance of the military character against the de- 
generacy of the priesthood in the person of its 
supreme head. The independence of the clergy was 
the real ground of the subtle refinements of the 
Catholic system, which, judged historically, deserve 
the respect of the philosopher, however repugnant 
they may be to his reason. 

At the very beginning of the struggle between 
the two irreconcileable monotheisms, an impartial 
observer might have foreseen that its result would 
be to discredit both equally, by showing the 
thorough groundlessness of the claim they both put 
forward to be universal. The contest between 
Catholicism and Mahomedanism occupies the last 
period of the Middle Ages. It begins with the 
eleventh centuiy, and ends at the close of the thir- 
teenth. During this period, what we call the feudal 
system in the strict sense was established. Inde- 
pendence had been the dominant idea originally ; it 
had given way to the idea of concert. Feudalism 
combined both without impairing either, so as to 
constitute an anticipation of the final sociocracy. 
The admirable institutions of feudalism in the 
twelfth century served as a general basis for the 
Crusades. Those heroic expeditions organized and 
developed the collective activity of the Western 
republic, and finally put an end to all the anxious 
fears of a Mussulman invasion. In the next century, 
the Crusades ceased to have any great social pur- 
pose ; they lost their true character and fell into 

D D 



402 COKCLUSIOK. 

discredit. The result was, tliat the Roman world 
was divided between two incompatible mono- 
theisms ; both alike doomed to an inevitable decline. 
The only obstacle to retard the process in either case 
was the dij£culty of finding a system to substitute. 

The Womom, — This general theory of the Middle 
Ages, my &ther, at length enables me to under- 
stand Catholicism as an intellectual and social 
system. I see the necessity of its rise, why its 
mission was but temporary, why its decay is irre- 
mediable. At the same time this appreciation of 
Catholicism shows clearly how unjust it was towards 
the intellectual development of Greece and the 
social work, of Rome, the incorporation of the 
Western world. The spontaneous combination of 
the results of Greece and Rome had led to Catho- 
licism. It cursed its parents, and was in its turn 
cursed by its children. The first wrong is no excuse 
for, but it explains, the second, and shows where 
the continuity of the race was broken. 

The Priest. — ^Yes, my daughter, this continuity 
had been respected in the preceding revolutions. 
At the outset, polytheism had almost insensibly sup- 
planted fetichism by a natural process of incorpora- 
tion. When the primitive form of theocracy gave 
place to its progressive and military form, there 
was still no breaking ofi;* from the social antecedents, 
no withholding their due honour. So again, when 
Rome absorbed Greece, she made it her glory to 
continue the intellectual movement originated by 
Greece. But the advent of Catholicism has, on the 



THE GENERAL HISTORY OF RELIGION. 403 

contrary, an anarchical character. In the Catholic 
conception of the future and the present, and the 
direction of the latter, the Greco-Boman past is as 
completely set aside as if it had never existed. In 
its un&imess Christianity makes no exception even 
for its Jewish antecedents, and this notwithstanding 
the importance which it unwisely attaches to them. 

This rude disruption of continuity, which Islam- 
ism carefully avoided, greatly weakened the general 
consciousness of social progress. Yet the first germ 
of the idea of progress was naturally due to Catho^ 
licism, by virtue of its real superiority over the 
older system. It is very important to form a sound 
judgment on the Catholic disruption of historical 
tradition. First of aU, it explains the profoundly 
contradictory position, both intellectually and mo- 
rally, which Catholicism occupied. Its doctrinal 
system was the child of discussion, yet subsequently 
it endeavoured to stifle discussion. Again it 
demanded of its children the respect which it refused 
its parents. But further, it is to this rupture of his- 
torical continuity that we trace the origin of the worst 
tendency which characterizes modem anarchy. The 
anti-historical feeling and spirit, the prevalence of 
which is the greatest obstacle to the regeneration 
of the West, date as far back as the rise of Catho- 
licism. Positivism alone can overcome the enormous 
difficulty they cause, for Positivism can do equal 
justice to all the phases, whether social or intellec- 
tual, of the evolution of the human race. 

Still, here as everywhere else, we must acknow- 
dd2 



404 COKOLUSION. 

ledge that the Catholic priesthood by its remark- 
able wisdom for a long time neutralized the main 
yioes of its deplorable doetrin& It adopted as it» 
own the language of Rome when it ceased to be 
the language in common use, and instinctively pre- 
served all the intellectual treasures of antiquity, 
even its beautiful theology. Dante was right in 
immortalizing the touching legend of the successful 
intercession of Gregory the Great in behalf of 
Trajan. We read in it a clear indication of the 
regret felt by the nobler Catholics that their doc- 
trine in its blindness prevented their honouring 
their best ancestors. However, there was prevalent 
a general respect for our Greek and Roman pre- 
decessors, a respect especially felt by the statesmen, 
notwithstanding the ignorance which was common. 

Throughout we find the same contrast. All our 
feelings were subjected by Catholicism to an admi- 
rable discipline. And yet the very basis of Catho- 
licism is the existence of an egoistic being, whose 
preponderance was necessary to overpower the ordi- 
nary selfishness of the individual The faith of 
Catholicism is more adverse to women than any 
other which has ever held supremacy, and yet this 
very feith paved the way for, and sanctioned, the 
tenderness of chivalry. By its institution of celi- 
bacy for the clergy and its consequent destruction 
of any hereditary character in the priesthood, Ca- 
tholicism struck the most signal blow at the system 
of caste in the West. Tet the doctrine from 
which the blow comes is by its nature favourable 



THE GENERAL HISTOBY OF BEUGION. 405 

to theocracy, to establish which was the final object 
of the papacy in its degeneracy. 

Monotheism ultimately became thoroughly hostile 
to all intellectual progress, but it prepared the way 
for a general advance in this direction by com- 
pleting the elaboration of logic. Fetichism had 
taken the first step, it had founded the logic of 
feeHngs. The second step, the logic of images, was 
due to polytheism. But its development, so &r 
as it was spontaneous, was only complete tmder 
monotheism by the habitual use of the aid of signs. 
Though this final step is, in the main, common to 
Islamism and Catholicism, it is more peculiarly 
attributable to Catholicism, if we consider the habit 
of discussion to which the separation of the two 
powers gave rise in all classes of society. 

A review of these points of contrast tends greatly 
to increase the admiration and respect of true phi- 
losophers for the noble members of a priesthood 
which during several centuries could find such 
powerftil resources in a fidth which was radically 
defective, and which yet was the only one suited to 
this period of transition. Whilst we allow this, 
however, we must not foi^et, that whatever pro- 
gress was made in the Middle Ages was due to 
the joint action of the two heterogeneous elements 
which must never be separated in our view of 
medieval Europe, Catholicism and feudalism. 

Over and above its immediate services, the 
admirable transitional organization of the Middle 
Ages called into existence all the essential germs of 



406 CONCLUSION. 

the final state. Nay, we find in it the rudiments 
of the true order of society, under each of its chief 
aspects, the temporal order as well as the spiritual. 
The outline is as complete as the received belief and 
the circumstances of the time allowed. Positivism 
then at the present day adopts the program of the 
Middle Ages, and aims at carrying it out. For 
success in this work it trusts to the combination of 
a better fidth with a less unfavourable form of 
activity. Feudalism now finds no special sup- 
porters, and its influence is depreciated in our 
historical estimate of the medieval period. Catho- 
licism alone is studied by the retrograde school, and 
its share in the joint result is unduly exaggerated. 
On a searching and accurate examination, however, 
we can trace the influence of chivalry even in the 
modifications which were introduced into Catho- 
licism, the last provisional form of man's belief. It is 
to the feudal feeling that we owe the first conception 
of the worship of woman, the necessary prelude to 
the religion of Humanity. It was to the same feel- 
ing that was really due, in the time of the Crusades, 
the change by which in Western monotheism the 
Virgin Mary nearly took the place of God. 

In the very process, however, of assigning to 
their true authors the results of the Middle Ages, 
we are led to see how profoundly precarious, by its 
very constitution, was the Catholic-feudal system, 
the last form of the r%gvme based on theology and 
war. The sole compensation for the imperfections 
of the Catholic doctrine lay in the priesthood. The 



THE GEKEBAIi HISTORY OF BEUGION. 407 

adequacy of the priesthood depended on its keeping 
its progressive character. This it could only do so 
long as it discharged a social and moral office. Now 
the very discharge of this office led to a progress in 
Western Europe which was incompatible with the 
Catholic faith^ and ultimately at variance with the 
constitution of the Catholic clergy in its retrograde 
state. This is shown by the failure of the admirable 
attempt at regeneration made by St» Francis and 
St. Dominic, in the thirteenth century. In a word, 
the results attained in the Middle Age$ imperatively 
called for a new system from the mon^nt that 
Islamism and Catholicism finally neutriQized each 
other's influence. For instance, the Emancipation 
from all theological belief, long limited to certain 
individuals, spread widely in conseqiienoe of the 
Crusades. The impulse was given by jfti^r^nights 
Templars, who had been brought vijji «K|i4r Witact 
Teith the Mussulmen. ^/'-^'^ '4**^^ 

At the opening then of the fourte^aftR%il^^ 
begins the vast revolution in Western ^^Eu:.**>p6,tc 
end which is the mission of Positivism; \At tlt«J 
date above mentioned, the whole moveiheijt o^'tM 
human mind was thoroughly hostile to the e: 
order, though it was impossible that'the new systenK 
oould as yet be seen. After Catholkism, no other ^" 
theological organization was pOBfidMe; just as, after 
feudalism, no further modificaticn of the military 
system was possible. The anticipations of Caesar 
and Trajan were becoming fisicts. The tendency of 
which they had had a premature presentiment was 



L 



408 • COKCLUSIOK. 

beginning to be .distinctly recognised, tbe tendency 
of Western Europe definitively to accept a Positive 
fjEuth and a peaceful activity. But for the attain- 
ment of this end it was necessary that science, 
industry, and even art should undergo a long 
elaboration. And, in the main, the process must be 
one of dut^iiJj ant I dispersive in character, so that its 
social boaiing ^vm not seen. We thus see the 
origip of the t\\o characteristics of the last transi- 
tion 4 p^^i>d of human society. Taken as a whole, 
it irf ^ peiiml oi' growing anarchy; taken in its 

eraJ poota, 11 is one of increasing organization. 

y/it ^'>mm* — Now that I see, my father, the 
direct conoexion of the present with the past, I 
wimfc kft#Tf the general course of the movement to 
be whh to fa]h>w the simultaneous growth of 
anaicliy m^^ reorg^mization. 

p^, ijdi^t — The negative progress, that of 
fUiurcLy liBfi a Diore distinct character than the 
o^i< c, 4iiy laughter. We must distinguish its tw;o 
•bases. In the one, the work of decompo- 
Lconscious; in the other, it becomes more 
i«|^:|flfov^'fl^stematic. The fii*st phase includes the 
" vsQftr^^nM^ and fifteenth centuries, the other the 
;iireeH(eJlowii>j^/: fMse two periods also differ^ if 
we look to tm4-p<>sitnv9 side of the movement, the 
process of repr j^ vi^aiion ; but the difference is lees 
marked. Tl\i/ v. hc4^ of Western Europe was 
affected by tb ? ^ £p >ja t»fneous decomposition. When 
systematic, Ifhe tr UTj4ph of the negative movement 
was confine4 ^ *^ ^ JjTorth. 




THE GENEBAL HISTOBT OF BEUGIOK. 409 

From its coinineiicement the direction of the re- 
volutionary movement was in the hands of two 
classes. Closely connected with one another, they 
trace their origin to the old powers, but they 
shortly became their rivals. These classes are the 
metaphysicians and lawyers; they constitute re- 
spectively the spiritual and temporal element in 
the negative system. Its most prominent organs, 
particularly in France, were the universities and 
the parliaments. The legists are more entitled to 
respect than the metaphysicians. Both are actuated 
by one spirit, but in the legists it is modified by the 
wholesome influence of social considerations. The 
metaphysicians never were anything, as regards 
theology^ but inconsistent destructives. The law- 
yers, and above all, the judges, not to mention 
their temporary or special services, always had a 
tendency to follow in the track of Bome, and con- 
struct a moral system on a basis exclusively human. 

During the thirteenth and fourteenth centuries, 
the whole medieval regime was thoroughly.broken 
up by conflicts between its component parts, its 
doctrinal system remaining intact. The chief 
struggle naturally was between the temporal and 
spiritual powers. Their harmony had always been 
precarious, a series of oscillations between theocracy 
and the empire. The popes in the thirteenth 
century strove in vain to establish an absolute 
dominion. Throughout Europe, and in France 
more than elsewhere, the kings organized a suc- 
cessful resistance. In the next century they Anally 



410 CONCLUSION. 

annihilated the power of the papacy in Western 
'Europe. This decisive revolution was completed 
in the fifteenth century, when, in every case, the 
national clergy became subordinate to the temporal 
authority. The Pope became a mere illusion as a 
spiritual centre; he sunk into an lialian prince. 
With its independence, the priesthood lost its mo- 
rality, its public morality first, then its private. 
To ensure its material existence, it placed its teach- 
ing at the service of the stronger. 

Side by side with this change in spiritual mat- 
ers, in the temporal order the struggle which had 
begun in the Middle Ages between the local and 
central powers in the State, was continued on a 
larger scale. In every case the power which had 
originally been the weaker got the upper hand, by 
the instinctive aid of the classes whose origin dates 
from the abolition of ser&ge. The normal issue is, 
that royalty should prevail and the aiistocracy 
succumb. The contrary result is to be looked on 
as an exception. Yenice was the first instance of 
it; England the most complete and important. In 
both forms alike, the combination of political con- 
centration with the humiliation of the priesthood led 
to the same result in every state of Western Europe. 
This result was the formation of a real dictatorship, 
as the only method of checking the temporal 
anarchy which was the consequence of the spirii^jiial 
disorganization. The eminent Louis XI. was the 
best type of this exceptignal magistracy; he was 
the only statesman who could clearly discern 



THE OENEBAL HISTOBT OF BELIOION. 411 

and wisely guide the whole moyement of modiem 
lEurope. 

- If we turn to the positive side of the progress, its 
most important feature during this first period is, 
the growth of industry. The way had been pre- 
pared by the organization of the labouring classes, 
both in town and country, in the Middle Ages. In 
tihe period under consideration three important 
events gave a decisive impulse to the industrial 
xnovement. There is nothing fortuitous in their 
occurring at this particular time. First, by thd 
invention of gunpowder the transitional institutio|^ 
of standing armies became perfect, and Western 
Europe was able to dispense with a military educa- 
tion which was adverse to the new form of action. 
Next, printing connected science with industry, 
by enabling men to gratify the ardent desire for 
knowledge which was then universal. Lastly, the 
discovery of America and the passage by the Cape 
of Gk»od Hope to India gave an opening for a 
vast extension of commercial relations. Under this 
impulse the new form of European existence 
took shape and consistency. ^ The intellectual 
xnovement produced no great effects as yet, except 
in poetry. The fourteenth century opens with the 
unrivalled epic of Dante ; in the fifteenth we have 
an admirable mystical composition. On the other 
hand, the accumulation of usefiil materials of all 
kinds prepares the way for the subsequent scien- 
tific development. 

This simultaneous advance of the intellect and 



418 CQNOLtTfllON. 

activity does but place in a dearer light the 
lamentable neglect of moral improvement. The 
attention to this had been general in the Middle 
Ages, and is their chief merit. The ardour of 
Western Europe for intellectual and practical pro- 
gress was mainly the consequence of an universal 
and irregular devdopment of pride and vanity, not 
unfrequently in conjunction with the basest selfish- 
ness* The development of the esthetic Acuities, it 
must be allowed, though not clear from revolu- 
tionary tendencies, unconsciously kept alive better 
Q^ntiments. But moral culture became more and 
more exclusively confined to the affective sex Kot 
carried away by the stream of scientific and prac- 
tical advance, it was reserved for women, amid mo- 
dem anarchy, to hand down to us the more impor- 
tant results of the Middle Ages, in spite of the 
aversion felt for those resulta But the holy provi- 
dence of woman could not arrest the decline of the 
power of love. The gradual weakening of this, 
the only sound basis of all human discipline, coin- 
cided with the rapid increase of strength in the 
new forces, both spiritual and tempcntd^ which 
are required for the final state of the Western 
world. 

The Woman. — The initial stage of the twolbld 
movement of modem times is now clear to me, my 
father. Would you give me a similar view of its 
systematic period ? 

The Priest, — Hitherto, my daughter, the doc- 
trines of the old re^me have been unassailedj they 



THE GENERAL HISTOBT OF BEUGION. 413 

are now the object of a direct attack on purely 
uegatiye principles. That the anarchy should 
spread thus far was indispensable as well as inevi- 
table, for m no other way could the necessity of a 
real reorganization be evident. The want had not 
been felt previously, owing to the appearance of life 
which the old system wore afler all its social bases 
had been irrevocably destroyed. But to form a 
sound judgment on the work of this period, we 
must divide it into two parts. The first begins 
with the sixteenth century, and ends at the point 
at which the monarchy in France assumes a retro- 
grade attitude, an event which coincides with the 
triumph of the aristocracy in England. The second 
division brings us to the close of the eighteenth 
century, to the actual commencement therefore of 
the revolutionary crisis; which, after the lapse of 
two generations, is yet convulsing Europe with its 
deplorable vicissitudes. 

The necessity of such a division of the period 
depends principally on the increase of system on 
the negative side. At the outset it seemed that 
the negative doctrines might be compatible with 
the fundamental conditions of the theological 
regime, but later it became evident that they were 
inoompatible. 

We may mark these two successive stages of the 
negative movement by the terms Protestant and 
Deist. Infinitely varied as are the sects of Protes- 
tantism, they all adhere to the Christian doctrine of 
a revelation. And this is sufficient to distinguish 



414 CONCLUSION* 

tliem from the more complete emancipation which 
is iinplied in DeiMii. -c^- 

A.^ the very commencement of the second phase of 
modem history, the negative doctrine broaches di- 
rectly its anarchical principle,by its assertion of abso- 
lute individualism. This follows from its allowing 
that every one, without exacting any conditions of 
competence, may decide every question. Once allow 
this, and all spiritual authority is at an end. The 
living rise in open insurrection against the dead, 
as is evidenced by the blind reprobation for the 
whole medieval system, for which the irrational 
admiration of antiquity was but a poor compensa- 
tion. Protestantism lent its influence to widen the 
fatal breach in the continuity of the race which 
Catholicism had begun. 

T?ie Womcm. — Allow me for a moment, my father, 
to interrtrpfc- you, that I may express the profound 
dislike I have ever felt for Protestantism. Whilst 
professing to reform Western monotheism, it 
stripped it of its best institutions. Thus it sup- 
pressed purgatory, the worship of the Yj ign and 
the Saints, the system of the confessional, and per- 
verted the mysterious sacrament which was dear to 
the hearts of the Western nation& as the sublime 
condensation of their whole religion. Hence it was 
that my sex, which had aided so powerfully the . 
growth of Catholicism, took, as a general rule, no 
active part in the Protestaik reformation. For it 
found its tenderness rejected^ and the compensation 
it received was the permission to interpret writings 



\ 



THE OENERAL HISTOBY OF BELIGION. 415 

w^hich are iinintelligible^and dangerous. Protes-' 
tantism would have grievously lowered the institu- 
tion of marriage as it existed in Western Europe, 
by re-establishing divorce; but the state of manners 
and feelings instinctively rejected so retrograde a 
movement, even when it was accepted officially. 

The Priest — Your just dislike of Protestantism, 
my daughter, is a spontaneous explanation of the 
great disagreement of Western Europe in regard to 
it. Its purely negative doctrine became a source of 
division in nations, in cities, and even in families. 
Its success, partial as it was, shows however that 
it met some important wants, wants both of the 
intellect and of society. ^TDhe anarchical" character of 
its principles did not prevent Protestantism from 
aiding, at its commencement, the progress of science 
and the development of industry, for it gave a 
stimulus to individual effort and it set aside oppres- 
sive rules. We owe to it two revolutions — ^that of 
Holland against the tyranny of Spain; that of 
England, to secure internal reform. The second 
was premature, and therefore ultimately failed. 
But it did not fail till it had given indications, 
under the admirable dictatorship of Cromwell, of 
the inevitable tendency of the European movement. 
From this time forward the requirements of order 
and those of progress, both equally imperative, 
* became absolutely irreconcileable. The nations of 
Western Europe ranged themselves on one side or 
the other, according as they felt more strongly the 
^''^^d of order or of progress." There was imminent 



416 COKCLU8ION. 

danger of aniversal oppression had Protestantism 
nowhere gained the ascendancy. For the retro- 
grade clergy of Catholicism were busy everywhere, 
trying to rouse the governments of Europe against 
a movement, the tendency of which could no longer 
be doubted. We may be glad, however, that the 
greater part of the Western world was preserved 
from Protestantism. Had it been universally ac- 
cepted, that acceptance would have been deemed a 
satisfactory issue of the general revolutionary move- 
ment. The essential conditions of regeneration 
would in no way have been complied with, for 
Protestantism proclauns the permanent fusion of 
the spiritual and temporal power. This view of 
the two systems leads us to feel equal sympathy 
with the great men who on either side took a noble 
part in this immense struggle, the necessary pre- 
liminary to a true reorganization. 

Great as were the obstacles arising from the Pro- 
testant movement, in the second period of modem 
history we see peiifected the temporal dictatorship, the 
origin of which ^|s)trao0able to the first. The growth 
of its pctj4«r coincides witn the formation of the great 
nationalities, a prohri^onal result of the disruption 
of the union ejffected^'^by Catholicism in the Middle 
Ages. / p^t this political anomaly led to no great 
social results ^C^alue anywhere but in France, 
and even in Fm,nce such results were necessarily 
temporary. Since the time of Charlemagne, there 
has been a^i^creasing tendency to invest France 
with the general direction of the European move- 



THE GENEBAL HISTOBY OF BEUGI027. 417 

ment. It was necessary then that she should be- 
come a very compact power, yet large enough to 
turn the scale by its influence, and to overcome all 
aggression from the retrograde side. In the other 
nations of Europe, the dictatorial concentration of 
power was but the blind and perilous imitation of 
an exceptional policy required in France. 

In this second period, the scientific character and 
philosophical tendency of the positive movement 
became clearer. Cosmology took a decisive step in 
advance by establishing the theory of the earth's 
motion. Then followed shortly the systematization 
of celestial geometry, and the fotmdation of celestial 
mechanics. Such theQries showed that the scien- 
tific spirit was radically at variance with theology 
and metaphysics. The tendency to construct di- 
rectly a philosophy which should be thoroughly 
positive became strongly marked. Bacon and Des- 
cartes both lent their aid in this direction, and 
pointed out the preparation required for the con- 
struction of a positive synthesis. During this 
decisive movement, the progress of poetry and the 
other ^e arts was a worthy continuation of that 
made in the preceding period, which in its turn had 
been due to the Middle Ages. In the absence of all 
philosophical guidance and of any social purpose, 
the poetry of Western Europe produced, in the 
course of five centuries, more real masterpieces 
than the whole of antiquity. As for the progress 
of industry, to extend it became more and more 
the object of the various governments, though they 



418 coKOLunoK. 

still looked on it as sabordinate to i¥ar. We can 
eyen then trace the tendency of the masteors to 
separate themselves from their workmen, and to 
make common cause with a degenerate aristocrat^. 

The Wmnam. — ^I wish now, my &iher, to form 
an idea of the character and object of the last period 
of modem history. 

The Priest, — ^Its necessity, my daughter, lay in 
the general results of the preceding period. Protes- 
tantism and Catholicism had given up all idea of 
universal supremacy. Western Europe was di- 
vided between them, as the Soman empire 'wsa 
divided between the Goran and the Bibla limits 
ing ourselves to the leading nations, this diviaioii of 
the West into Catholic and Protestant, coincides 
naturally with the division of the dictatorship 
into aristocratic and monarchical This division 
had been the result of the preceding period. By 
this coincidence it became more marked. In the 
Protestant nations the aristocratic form prevailed; 
in Catholic countries, the monarchical. 

Under both forms equally, the dictatorship had 
become hostile to the movement of emancipation, 
for it threatened both alike with an entire subver- 
sion. Monarchy, more especially in France, had 
been progressive so long as it had a powerful oppo- 
sition to overcome. When the opposition ceased, 
and the struggle was over, its retrograde tenden- 
cies became manifest. As early as the second 
half of the reign of Louis XIV., it gradually 
rallied around it all the fragments of the older 



THE GENEBAL HISTOBT OF BEUOIOK. 419 

order. The object of the union was to arrest a 
social movement which it could not but consider as 
simply anarchical. And in its aristocratical and Pro- 
testant form, the dictatorsbip, especially in England, 
was a still more formidable enemy to the move- 
ment in Western Europe than in its monarchical 
and Catholic form. It was more formidable, be- 
cause it found more aid in the nation. Protestant- 
ism, so long as it had had to struggle, had been 
favourable to liberty. As soon as it became esta- 
blished officially, it exerted itself to put a stop to 
jforther emancipation. This is the tendency of every 
system which refuses to adopt the separation of the 
spiritual and temporal powers. In England, it led 
to the prevalence of a systematic hypocrisy, more 
skilfully organized and more pernicious in its re- 
sults than that with which it taunted ^^uitism, 
the latest form of expiring Catholicism. Nor was 
this all. A still more important source of corrup- 
tion was opened by Protestantism. I mean the 
development on the largest scale of the system of 
national selfishness. Yenice had displayed the 
same quality, but simply in its rudimentary state. 
The English nation gave it too a cordial welcome, 
and the result was to isolate England from Western 
Europe. 

In such a position of affairs, an explosion was at 
once indispensable and inevitable. It was negative 
in character, and is the distinctive event which 
marks the eighteenth century. A real reorganiza- 
tion was impossible without it, nay, the very idea 
E E 2 



420 * coKCiiX7Sioir. 

of 8uoh a reorganization was impossible. The critical 
doctrines which had their origin in the fundamental 
principle proclaimed by the two Protestant revolu- 
tions, had already been co-ordinated by the meta- 
physicians w&o succeeded Bacon and Descartes. 
They had gained universal acceptance^ owing to 
the assiduous exertions of the literary class. This 
class had hitherto been subaltern ; it now assumed 
the position of leader. In the direction of the 
revolutionaiy movement, the liUh'cUeur replaced 
the doctor of medieval times, just as the advocate 
stepped into the place of the judge. Two genera- 
tions witnessed and exhausted the ascendancy of 
these inconsequent reasoners, who wished to destroy 
the altar and maintain the throne, or conversely. 
But pure destructives, such as Yoltaire and Bona* 
seau, whb are already nearly forgotten, can never 
be the philosophical representatives of the eighteenth 
century. Its great school is that of Diderot and 
Hume, of which Fontenelle was the precursor, Con- 
dorcet the complement. This school accepted the 
system of destruction, but accepted it only with 
this object, that it might be able to gain as clear a 
conception as possible of the final regeneration. 
Among statesmen, Frederic the Great of Prussia 
represents this school. Even at that early period, it 
was only the narrower order of mind that could think 
it possible by any conceivable modification of the older 
order to meet the want of an entire renovation. 

It was during the revolutionary crisis that on 
the positive side of the movement, we see cos- 



THE GENERAL HISTOBT OF RELIGION. 421 

mology completed by the foundation of chemistry. 

With this signal advance end the services of the 

analytical spirit and of the academical rigime* 

Their predominance continued. But such blind 

persistence became at once an obstacle, and an 

obstacle of growing importance, to the progress 

of future scientific labours, the presiding E^irit of 

-w^hich should be synthetic. In the industrial de- 

fMtrtment we see the banking class rising to the 

ascendancy, which is naturally its due ; for its 

ascendancy is the sole condition under which the 

systematization of our industrial action is possible. 

At the same time, war became the minister of com^ 

merce. The colonial disputes were the occasion of 

the change. The great extension of machinery 

gave its last cliaracteristic to modem industry. But 

it also gave occasion to a lamentable increase, on 

the part of the masters, of neglect of all the social 

conditions of industrial enterprise. The workmen 

came more and more to be looked on simply as a 

source of profit, to the exclusion of all ideas of 

government or direction. 

,^t is easy then to understand the stormy cha- 
racter of the crisis ; of the vast revolution which was 
{•the final issue of the whole five centuries which lie 
between us and the Middle Ages. That stormy 
character was the necessary result of the &btal in- 
equality in the rate of progress of the positive and 
negative movements. The two together make up 
the whole movement of Western Europe. The 
negative movement had been very rapid, and the 



42S CONCLUSION. 

positive bad not been able to. satisfy its demand for 
organization. WHilst the negative was destroying 
all general conceptions, the positive had only some 
partial ones to offer in exchange. The leadership 
in the work of modem regeneration, and that at 
the time of its greatest diffictdty, had devolved on 
the clays least qualified for the post, the class of 
mere writers* The sole object of their aspirations 
4 was the pedantocracy dreamed of bj their Greek 
masters. JThey would concentrate all power in 
their own persons. ^ 

The Woman. — Your explanation of the revolu- 
tionary crisis as a whole makes it clear to me. But 
I should like, my father, to know in outline the 
course it has taken, with a view to a right estimate 
of its actual state, which is the last object of this 
concluding conversation. 

The Frie8t,~S^ the first place, my da t igb teg, I 
would draw your attention to the abolition of the 
French monarchy. This was a necessary step. The 
monarchy was the centre, the condensed expression 
of the whole regime in its decay. The funeral of 
Louis XIY. might have opened men's eyes. But 
there was at that time no true theory of history to 
guide men to the right interpretation. What occurred 
at that funeral was a clear indication of the irre- 
mediable degeneracy of the government, of the 
thorough hostility of the people. 

After a few years of hesitation under the Consti> 
tuent Assembly, hesitation due to the prevalence of 
metaphysical theories, a decisive shock overthrew for 



THE GENERAL HI8T0BY OF RELIGION. i23 

ever the retrograde institutioii of monarchy, the last 
vestige of the caste system. The theocratic consecra- 
tion given it by the servile clergy of modem times 
points to it as such. The glorious Convention, the 
only assembly that enjoys a real popularity in France, 
vhen it overthrew the monarchy as a preliminary 
step to social regeneration, had no power io supply 
any deficiencies in the intellectual movement of 
Western Europe. It was without the requisites for 
a really organic policy. It was competent to direct in 
an heroic manner the defence of the French He- 
public, but it could not do more than Express in 
vague form the program of social wants ;. and even 
tliis wsiS obscured by a metaphysical i^ilosophy, 
whicji has always been incapable of any construction 
whatever. 

The political triumph of the negative doctrine 
brought to light its thoroughly subversive tenden- 
cie& This soon led to a retrograde reaction. The 
reaction began under the ephemei'al ascendancy of 
a bloodthinMiy deism in the person of Robespierre. 
It took larger proportions on the official restoration 
of Catholicism under the military tyranny of Buona- 
parte. But the primary tendencies of modern civili- 
zation arei^uch as to reject alike theology and war. 
Thougb every egoistic instinct was at that timestimu- 
iated to an unparalleled extent, the military spirit 
was yet obliged, in its last orgies, to rest on a system 
of compulsory recruitment The imiversal adoption 
of conscription is a sign that the abolition of standing 
armies is approaching. Their substitute will be a 



424 COKCLUSION. 

police force. The expedients to which a retrograde 
policj has since been driven to avert such a result 
have all &iled ; it has been found as impossible to 
revive a warlike spirit as a theological one. Even 
the plea of progress has been put forward in vain^ 
and the flEiilure has been the more marked as there 
are no general convictions leading men to a just 
reprobation of such conduct. The expedition to 
Algiers was the most immoral of these expedients ; 
'and I venture in this place, in the name of true 
Positivists, solemnly to proclaim mj wish, that the 
Arabs maj forcibly expel the French, unless the 
French consent to a^ act of noble restitution. It is 
a matter of pride to me to think that, in early years^ 
I ardently wished success to the heroic defenoe of 
Spain* 

The retrograde movement under the first N^kk 
leon drew its apparent strength solely from war. The 
extent isf its £ulure was evident on the final resto- 
ration of peace. In the absence, however, of all 
organic views, metaphysical empiricism attempted 
a solution. It found it in an imitation of the 
English parliamentary system ; «but seeing that that 
system was only adapted to the transition state if 
England, it urged its universal adoption* The 
attempt was successful for a gejaeration,' and only 
served to give some regularity to a wretched * 
series of oscillations between anarchy and retro^ 
gression. In. this process the sole merit of either 
party lay in its excluding its rivaL 

It became more and ndore clear that in this long 



THE OENERAL HISTOBY OF RELIGION. 425 

period of fluctuation the received theories were all 
equally powerless. The spiritual anarchy reached 
■its height. All the previous convictions of men, 
iRrhether of the revolutionary or retrograde school, 
liad lost their hold. If discipline is partial, it 
cannot be real and lasting. If it is to be universal, 
it must rest on one principle-^— the constant supre- 
macy of the heart over the intellect. But the 
pnnciple had been losing ground ever since the 
close of the Middle Ages. It had the support of 
women ; but this holy support was powei'less, for 
Western Europe, in its madness, paid less and less 
respect to women. The result was that even in the 
scientiflo sphere, the provisional order, which Bacon 
and Descartes had tried to institute, was set aside, 
and free course given on empirical grounds to 
the unconnected study of special sciences. All 
philosophical control was scorned by those who 
engaged in such pursuits. Each encyclopeiUc phase 
ought to be kept within certain limits — ^limits to be 
£xed by the wants of the next phase above it. 
Instead 4(fliii% every exertion was made to give each 
an indefinite extensifMi by lw>]Ating it from the whole. 
Jit eac!^ *^>^' ^ ^ubB process, the Whole was more 
completelyflost'sigfat o£ The laovement became 
retrograde as well as anarchicftL For it threatened 
to destroy even the great results of former labours, 
while it gave increased power to academical medio^ 
crity. In the domain of art we find anarchy and 
retrogression still more rampant. Art is, by its 
nature, eminently synthetical ; it rejects analytical 



436 COKCLT78ION. 

einpiziciBm. more abeolutelj than sdenoe does. Tet 
even in poetry the degradation ytba so great that n 
ihe learned could appreciate nothing but style. To 
such an eictent was this carried, that they often 
placed real master-pieces below compositionB which 
were both poor and immoraJLA , 

The Wonum, — ^Your picture is a sad c(ne, my 
fibther, but I cannot dispute its accuracy. I cannot 
see in it any point with which I can connect the 
final solution whicH it has been the aim of this 
Catechism to set forth. 

The Priest. — ^We may trace the origin *of this 
solution, my daughter, to the completion of tfae 
vast preparation of the race. The objectiTe and 
introductory period had begun with Thales and 
Pythagoras; it had been continued during the 
whole of the medieval period ; it had never ceased 
to advance during the anarchy of modwn Europe. 
At the beginning of the French Bevolution, it, had 
been completed, so far as cosmology was concerned, 
by the recent creation of chemistry. Bichat and 
Gall had taken a decisive 6te{U^H|Sii^V<^9 ^^ 
by founding bidfigy^-iKfiiiiA ihf: <*i||H"^l^ ^^ 
By the introduction of ^l^k«gi«lH||l^wentific 
bebis for the egtire renovalio^j^M^i^' t^WiIbsopB»L 
spirit was laid. \ Tb§.^l»fluit of the whole positive 
movement was to fiAcilitate the advent of sodologf 
— an advent which had been heralded by Oondorcet ' 
in his attempt to bring the future into eystematzc 
subordination >to the past. The attempt fsdled, hut 
is not the less immortal It was made at a time 



. THE GENERAL HISTOBT OF BELIOION. 427 

when men's minds were in' a state most entii^y 
ayerse to all sound historical conceptions. 

By the universal adoption of an exclusivelj human 
point of view, it was possible for a subjectiTe synthesis - 
to construct a philosophy which should be proof 
against all objections. The next step after tlie 
synthesis was to found the final religion. To this 
I was led as soon as the renovation of the intellect 
had been followed by a regeneration of the moral 
nature^ Henceforth the medieval period receives 
its due4ribute of admiration, while antiquity meets 
with a more thorough appreciation. The cultivation 
of the feeling? is found to be quitQ compatible with 
that of the intellect and the activity.^ 

All noble hearts and &11' great intellects may for 
the future converge. They accept this termination 
of the long and difficult initiation through which 
Humanity has had to pass, under the sway of 
powers which have been constantly on the decline — 
theology and war. The movements of modem 
times are no longer profoundly unequal. The posi- 
tive movement is at length able to meet all the 
demands, intellectual and social, to which thp 
negative movement can give rise^ nor can it meet 
them solely in reference to the future, but also in 
the present, though I am not here concerned with 
the present. The relative finally takes the place . 
of the absolute ; altruism tends to control egoism ; i 
systematic progress is substituted for spontaneou»i-^' 
growth. In a word. Humanity definitively occu- ' - 
pies the place of God, but she does not forget 



428 coHCLUsioir. 

the services which the idea of God provisionally 
rendered. 

Here then, my beloved daughter, you have my 
last explanations as to the advent of the universal 
religion, which during so many centuries has been 
the object of the common aspirations of the West 
and the East. Its acceptance finds great obstacles^ 
especially in France, in the prejudices and passions 
which, under dilBTerent forms, are averse to all sound 
discipline. But its efficacy will soon be felt by 
women and proletaries in the South more than in 
the North, For its best recommendation, how- 
ever, it must look to the priests of Positivism. 
They must prove their exclusive competence to 
bind together into one body all honest and intelli- 
gent men, by a noble acceptance of the inheritance 
of the past. * 



Table A. 
SYSTEM OF SOCIOLATRY, 

fler as the Basis • > . "'^ J (The Family, Coun- 

t^^ M theXd J SOCIAL WOBBHIP, X" try, Humiiity.) 

Etmbraciag in a series of Eighty-one Annual Festivals the Worship of Humanity 
under all its aspects. 



r v«r v««'« mv f Synthetical Festival of the 
New Year s Day ... ^ •'Q.peat Being. 









IstMonth. HUMANITY. < frebgious. 

I Weekly Festivals of J historical. 
L the Social Union. "1 national. 
r complete. Vjuiuiicipal. 

2ndMonth.MAEEIAGE.] ^^^ 

V. subjective. 

3rd Month. ThePATEB-3 *^"*P^®*® {artificisa. 

NAL BELATION. ..|i,^^piete {J^^*^. 



5 1 8th Month. POLYTHE- 
g ISM 

K J 



9th Month. MONOTHE- 
ISM 



catholic . 



4th Month. The FILIAL^ «^^ ^,hAi„L>in«M 

BELATION ^Sauesubdmswfu. 

6th Month. The FBAO «^^^ ^^^i^i«-- 
TEBNAL BELATION. j *«"•* ntbdwuums, 
6th Month. The BELA--\ . f complete. 

TION OF MA8TEB t P®"^""«^* tincomplete. 

AND SEEVANT ) temporary Same tubcUvinon. 

jr» ~ /- . (• nomad ....FestwalofiheAnmalt. 

^ r »r*i,iwr^«fh ™psTTrmaM3^ "" l8«dentary..l?fe.«raZ<ifJP«r«. 
f 7thMonth. FBTICHI8M J ) Bacevdoik.Fe>twal qfthe 8m, 

I (^ systematic... |,j^tary ,..Fe»twdl qflron, 

conservativc.^MtttJai of Castes. 

( e8thetic.j5bmer,.J?«c%2««,P%M2«w. 

„*»ii-«*«.i scien- ^ Thales, Pythagoras, 

intellectual .1 ^^^^^ I AHstotley Hn>pocrates, 

{SaUmw) I phiioso- f Archimedes, ApoUo- 

l^phic. J nius, Hipparehus. 

social... Scipio, Cassar, Trajan. 

'theocratic Abraham, Moses, Solomon, 

est. Paul. 
Charlemagne, 
Alfred. 
MUdebrand, 
&o4frey qfBouiOon, 
^St. Bernard, 
I Mahometan {Lepantoy Mahomet, 
tDante. 

Lmetaphysioal ^Descartes. 

( mother. (.Frederic II. 

10th Month. WOMEN. J wife. 
Moral Providence. / daughter. 
^ sister. 

iiaMonth.ThePEiE8T-C^'^^::::::;:;;:::::lSS^^L«. 

HOOD J , n -i; f secondary. 

Intellectual Providence. Cdefimtive^pj^^jp^-; pestival qf Old Men. 

mhMonth. ThePATBI-C^,^/- FestivaK^the Znigkts. 

^i^^^- v^"- j:'*;'^**' / manufactures. 
Material Providence. L agriculture. 
,», ,r XI. mi- -D-Dr* C&otive.FesivDalqf Inventors: Outemberg, Colum- 
^^?b,.3?A°S?A'mS**® ) affective. [bus, Vaueanson, Watt, Montgoyier. 

LET AKIAl Jfi. "J contemplative. 

General Providence. C passive^ St. Francis qf Assist. 

COMPLEMENTABY DAY Festival of all the Dead. 

The additional Day in LEAP YE AB8... General Festival of Holy Wombk. 
4^me vol. PoUUque Positive, p. 160. 

Paris, Saturday, 7 Archimedes, 66. (1 April, 1864.) 



IMPULSION. 
(thx hbabt.) 

Decrease of energy, in- 
crease of dienity, from 
the back or uie nead to 
the front, from the 
lower part to the hi^^er, 
from the sides to the 
middle. 



oomfsu 

(THB IITTELIi 

Knowled^, ov 
for the sake* 
viaion^ with 
to provisioi. 




foApov neqii'sepisnedoxj 
'raoxojv EAixaaisy oi 



sjEon. 

ITU 
•OXTIS 



uoy oji aaaao in s^ohi osy 'iioiio 
(XOV OX '3NIHJ 



DOGMATICAL DIVISION. 



II 



.S 




(jepJO 
) Xjuoji pun i«pog) 

' 'xHaosoiiH^ iyHO]f|[ 

JO 



JO 



'KoisiAia TfoiaoiSiH 



"^•^ 




19 I 



■ S 6 8 2 § s 



M 



r 



•Ho: 




Tu iesc , 
W edB 1 
T :mrs 

! Satun • ^ 
Sundaj ..j ; 

I- 



H ISll'i^af.5 ' '^o: 



THE BORROWER WILL BE CHARGED 
AN OVERDUE FEE IF THIS BOOK IS 
NOT RETURNED TO THE LIBRARY ON 
OR BEFORE THE LAST DATE STAMPED 
BELOW. NON-RECEIPT OF OVERDUE 
NOTICES DOES NOT EXEMPT THE 
BORROWER FROM OVERDUE FEES. 



STALU 









I 



\ 



